Mississippi, session 2026, HB1172.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MISSISSIPPI: SECTION 1.  Section 73-77-5, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 73-77-5.  * * *Absent applicable state law Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, no person shall be disqualified from pursuing, practicing, or engaging in any occupation for which a license is required solely or in part because of a prior conviction of a crime, unless the crime for which an applicant was convicted directly relates to the duties and responsibilities for the licensed occupation.  The provisions of this section shall not apply to the admission or reinstatement of any person to The Mississippi Bar as an attorney in good standing authorized to practice law. SECTION 2.  Section 73-77-7, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 73-77-7.  (1)  * * *Absent applicable state law Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, licensing authorities shall not have in any rulemaking for their qualifications for licensure vague or generic terms including, but not limited to, "moral turpitude," "any felony," and "good character."  * * *Absent applicable state law Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, licensing authorities may only consider criminal records that are specific and directly related to the duties and responsibilities for the licensed occupation when evaluating applicants.  Anywhere the terms "felony," "moral turpitude," "good character" or other such vague or generic terms are used in any statute or rule for the qualifications or disqualifications for licensure, they shall mean a disqualifying crime under the Fresh Start Act. (2)  The licensing authority shall use the clear and convincing standard of proof in examining the factors to determine whether an applicant with a disqualifying criminal conviction will be denied a license.  * * *Absent applicable state law Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, the licensing authority shall make its determination based on the following factors: (a)  The nature and seriousness of the crime for which the individual was convicted; (b)  The passage of time since the commission of the crime; (c)  The relationship of the crime to the ability, capacity, and fitness required to perform the duties and discharge the responsibilities of the occupation; and (d)  Any evidence of rehabilitation or treatment undertaken by the individual that might mitigate against a direct relation. Nothing in this section shall preclude any board, commission or other licensing entity from granting licenses to individuals convicted of disqualifying convictions, after considering the factors listed under this subsection (2). (3)  All licensing authorities shall meet the requirements listed in subsection (1) by one hundred twenty (120) days after July 1, * * *2019 2026. (4)  For licensing authorities, the requirements listed in subsections (1) and (2) also apply to any new occupational licenses created after July 1, * * *2019 2026. (5)  The licensing authority shall adopt necessary rules for the implementation of this section. (6)  The provisions of this section shall not apply to the admission or reinstatement of any person to The Mississippi Bar as an attorney in good standing authorized to practice law. (7)  For any board, commission or other licensing entity with an existing procedure for hearings and appeals following the denial of a license codified in rules or statute on July 1, 2026, those existing procedures for hearings and appeals shall supersede the provisions of this section. SECTION 3.  Section 73-77-9, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 73-77-9.  (1)  * * *Absent applicable state law Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, an individual with a criminal record may petition a licensing authority at any time for a determination of whether the individual's criminal record will disqualify the individual from obtaining a license.  This petition shall include details on the individual's criminal record.  The licensing authority shall inform the individual of his standing within thirty (30) days of receiving the petition from the applicant. The licensing authority may charge a fee to recoup its costs not to exceed Twenty-five Dollars ($25.00) for each petition. (2)  If a licensing authority denies an individual a license solely or in part because of the individual's prior conviction of a crime, the licensing authority shall notify the individual in writing of the following: (a)  The grounds and reasons for the denial or disqualification; (b)  That the individual has the right to a hearing to challenge the licensing authority's decision; (c)  The earliest date the person may reapply for a license; and (d)  That evidence of rehabilitation may be considered upon reapplication. Nothing in this section shall preclude any board, commission or other licensing entity from granting licenses to individuals convicted of disqualifying convictions, after considering the factors listed in Section 73-77-7 (2). (3)  * * * If an applicant's criminal history does not require a denial of a license under applicable state law, Any written determination by the licensing authority that an applicant's criminal conviction is directly related to the duties and responsibilities for the licensed occupation must be documented in written findings for each of the preceding factors under subsection (2) by clear and convincing evidence sufficient for a reviewing court. (4)  In any administrative hearing or civil litigation authorized under this section, the licensing authority shall carry the burden of proof on the question of whether the applicant's criminal conviction directly relates to the occupation for which the license is sought. (5)  The licensing authority shall adopt necessary rules for the implementation of this section. (6)  The provisions of this section shall not apply to the admission or reinstatement of any person to The Mississippi Bar as an attorney in good standing authorized to practice law. (7)  For any board, commission or other licensing entity with an existing procedure for hearings and appeals following the denial of a license codified in rules or statute on July 1, 2026, those existing procedures for hearings and appeals shall supersede the provisions of this section. SECTION 4.  Section 9-13-109, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 9-13-109.  Every applicant for certification shall have reached the age of majority * * *, be of good moral character and be a resident citizen of the State of Mississippi.  Further, every applicant shall meet the criteria established by the board for certification or shall meet the requirements of Section 9-13-109. SECTION 5.  Section 19-5-353, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 19-5-353.  (1)  The initial minimum standard of training for local public safety and 911 telecommunicators shall be determined by the Board of Emergency Telecommunications Standards and Training.  All courses approved for minimum standards shall be taught by instructors certified by the course originator as instructors for such courses. (2)  The minimum standards may be changed at any time by the Board of Emergency Telecommunications Standards and Training, but shall always include at least two (2) hours of training related to handling complaints and/or calls of human trafficking and commercial sexual exploitation of children as defined in Section 43-21-105, communicating with such victims and requiring the local public safety and 911 telecommunicators to contact the Department of Child Protection Services when human trafficking or commercial sexual exploitation is suspected. (3)  Changes in the minimum standards may be made upon request from any bona fide public safety, emergency medical or fire organization operating within the State of Mississippi. Requests for change shall be in writing submitted to either the State Law Enforcement Training Academy; the State Fire Academy; the Mississippi Chapter of the Associated Public Safety Communications Officers, Incorporated; the Mississippi Chapter of the National Emergency Number Association; the Mississippi State Board of Health, Emergency Medical Services Division; the Mississippi Justice Information Center; the Mississippi Sheriff's Association; the Mississippi Fire Chief's Association; the Mississippi Association of Chiefs of Police; or Mississippians for Emergency Medical Services. (4)  The minimum standards in no way are intended to restrict or limit any additional training which any department or agency may wish to employ, or any state or federal required training, but to serve as a basis or foundation for basic training. (5)  Persons in the employment of any public safety, fire, 911 PSAP or emergency medical agency as a telecommunicator on July 1, 1993, shall have three (3) years to be certified in the minimum standards courses provided they have been employed by such agency for a period of more than one (1) year prior to July 1, 1993. (6)  Persons having been employed by any public safety, fire, 911 PSAP or emergency medical agency as a telecommunicator for less than one (1) year prior to July 1, 1993, shall be required to have completed all the requirements for minimum training standards, as set forth in Sections 19-5-351 through 19-5-361, within one (1) year from July 1, 1993.  Persons certified on or before July 1, 1993, in any course or courses chosen shall be given credit for these courses, provided the courses are still current and such persons can provide a course completion certificate. (7)  Any person hired to perform the duties of a telecommunicator in any public safety, fire, 911 PSAP or emergency medical agency after July 1, 1993, shall complete the minimum training standards as set forth in Sections 19-5-351 through 19-5-361 within twelve (12) months of their employment or within twelve (12) months from the date that the Board of Emergency Telecommunications Standards and Training shall become operational. (8)  Professional certificates remain the property of the board, and the board reserves the right to either reprimand the holder of a certificate, suspend a certificate upon conditions imposed by the board, or cancel and recall any certificate when: (a)  The certificate was issued by administrative error; (b)  The certificate was obtained through misrepresentation or fraud; * * *(c)  The holder has been convicted of any crime involving moral turpitude; ( * * *dc)  The holder has been convicted of a * * *felony disqualifying crime as provided in the Fresh Start Act; or ( * * *ed)  Other due cause as determined by the board. When the board believes there is a reasonable basis for either the reprimand, suspension, cancellation of, or recalling the certification of a telecommunicator, notice and opportunity for a hearing shall be provided.  Any telecommunicator aggrieved by the findings and order of the board may file an appeal with the chancery court of the county in which such person is employed from the final order of the board.  Any telecommunicator whose certification has been cancelled pursuant to Sections 19-5-351 through 19-5-361 may reapply for certification but not sooner than two (2) years after the date on which the order of the board canceling such certification became final. (9)  Any state agency, political subdivision or "for-profit" ambulance, security or fire service company that employs a person as a telecommunicator who does not meet the requirements of Sections 19-5-351 through 19-5-361, or that employs a person whose certificate has been suspended or revoked under provisions of Sections 19-5-351 through 19-5-361, is prohibited from paying the salary of such person, and any person violating this subsection shall be personally liable for making such payment. (10)  These minimum standards and time limitations shall in no way conflict with other state and federal training as may be required to comply with established laws or regulations. SECTION 6.  Section 21-27-131, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 21-27-131.  No person may drive or operate motor vehicles for hire in any city or town in this state unless he shall first have been licensed so to do as follows:  he shall make application to the mayor of such municipality in writing, accompanied by a statement of some reputable citizen thereof, that the applicant is over the age of eighteen (18) years, an experienced driver, * * *of good moral character, and physically and mentally capacitated to drive and operate such motor vehicle.  The mayor shall place such application before the board of aldermen, or other governing authorities, whereupon inquiry may be made by such governing authorities into the * * *moral character and mental and physical fitness of the applicant.  If the permit shall be granted the applicant shall receive a certificate of such permit, signed by the mayor, together with an identification badge, and the name of the municipality thereon, and which shall be worn so that the same will be displayed while engaged in or about such occupation.  The governing authorities of the municipality may require the applicant to give a reasonable bond, of not more than Five Hundred Dollars ($500.00), to guarantee the faithful observance of the law as well as the rules and regulations which may be prescribed by the said municipality, and they may also require a reasonable fee, for such permit and badge.  In the event the governing authority of such municipality refuse to grant such permit to an applicant, an appeal may be taken to the circuit court, in the manner provided by law for appealing from other orders of the governing authorities of municipalities, and the questions to be tried upon appeal will be as to the age and experience and the * * * moral, mental and physical fitness of the said applicant to pursue such vocation in such municipality. SECTION 7.  Section 21-27-151, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 21-27-151.  No person may drive or operate any bus of a transportation system for the transportation of passengers within any city or town in this state, where the operation of such bus is subject to regulation by the authorities of such city or town under Section 21-27-121, unless he shall first have been licensed so to do as follows:  he shall make application to the mayor of such municipality in writing, accompanied by a statement of some reputable citizen thereof, that the applicant is over the age of eighteen (18) years, an experienced driver, * * * of good moral character, and physically and mentally capacitated to drive and operate such motor vehicle.  The mayor shall place such application before the board of aldermen, or other governing authorities, whereupon inquiry may be made by such governing authorities into the * * * moral character and mental and physical fitness of the applicant.  If the permit shall be granted the applicant shall receive a license, signed by the mayor, together with a metallic badge, which shall have a number and the name of the municipality thereon, and which shall be worn so that the same will be displayed while engaged in or about such occupation.  The governing authorities of the municipality may require the applicant to give a reasonable bond, of not more than Five Hundred Dollars ($500.00), to guarantee the faithful observance of the law as well as the rules and regulations which may be prescribed by the said municipality, and they may also require a reasonable fee, not to exceed Five Dollars ($5.00) for such license, which said license fee shall be paid into the general fund of such municipality.  In the event the governing authority of such municipality refuse to grant such license to an applicant, an appeal may be taken to the circuit court, in the manner provided by law for appealing from other orders of the governing authorities of municipalities, and the questions to be tried upon appeal will be as to the age and experience and the * * * moral, mental and physical fitness of the said applicant to pursue such vocation in such municipality. SECTION 8.  Section 25-53-51, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 25-53-51.  (1)  To qualify for the position of information confidentiality officer a person must: (a)  Be an employee of a state agency or institution in a position such that his duties require him to handle or process or supervise the handling or processing of data in conjunction with the use of automated information technology equipment for an agency or institution other than that for whom he is regularly employed. (b)  Have been continuously employed for a period of at least one hundred eighty (180) days by such agency or institution or have successfully been cleared for employment through an investigation that shall consist of a determination * * *as to good moral character and that the prospective employee has not been convicted of a * * *felony disqualifying crime as provided in the Fresh Start Act.  In order to determine the applicant's suitability for employment at the Mississippi Department of Information Technology Services, the applicant shall be fingerprinted.  If no disqualifying record is identified at the state level, the fingerprints shall be forwarded by the Mississippi Department of Public Safety to the Federal Bureau of Investigation for a national criminal history record check.  A prospective employee may be provisionally employed based on a reference check by the employing agency pending final receipt of the results of a national criminal history record check for a period not to exceed one hundred eighty (180) days. (c)  Successfully complete a suitable instructional course on the subjects of information security, privacy and confidentiality and protection, to be developed and taught under the supervision of the executive director.  An employee may work in a provisional capacity under the direct supervision of an information confidentiality officer as part of an on-the-job training program while completing instructional requirements, for a period not to exceed ninety (90) days. (d)  Be duly sworn to the following oath:  "I, ______, do solemnly swear to protect and uphold the confidentiality of all information that may come to my knowledge that is designated as 'confidential information' by another state agency or institution for which I may handle or process in the normal course of my duties.  I swear to exercise reasonable care in the handling and processing of all such designated data and further that I will not reveal or otherwise divulge information from such data obtained.  I understand that proven violation of this oath will subject me to forfeiture of my bond and dismissal from employment." (2)  In order to maintain appropriate liability insurance necessary to cover damages for any nonmalicious act, the Department of Information Technology Services will work in conjunction with the Tort Claims Board. (3)  In order to clear vendors, such as maintenance personnel, security personnel, cleaning personnel, contractors and other vendors with a valid need to gain access into the State Data Centers and campus, the department shall determine these individuals have not been convicted of a * * *felony disqualifying crime as provided in the Fresh Start Act through a fingerprint-based criminal history background check.  If no disqualifying record is identified at the state level, the fingerprints shall be forwarded by the Department of Public Safety to the Federal Bureau of Investigation for a national criminal history record check. SECTION 9.  Section 27-109-5, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 27-109-5.  (1)  Any person who the tax commission determines is qualified to receive a license or is found suitable under the provisions of this chapter, having due consideration for the proper protection of the health, safety, morals, good order and general welfare of the inhabitants of the State of Mississippi and the declared policy of this state, may be issued a state privilege license for the operation of a cruise vessel.  The burden of proving his qualification to receive any license or be found suitable is on the applicant. (2)  An application to receive a license shall not be granted unless the commission is satisfied that the applicant is: (a)  A person of * * *good character, honesty and integrity; (b)  A person whose prior activities, criminal record, if any, reputation, habits and associations do not pose a threat to the public interest of this state or to the effective regulation and control of cruise vessels, or create or enhance the dangers of unsuitable, unfair or illegal practices, methods and activities in the operation of cruise vessels or the carrying on of the business and financial arrangements incidental thereto; and (c)  In all other respects qualified to be licensed or found suitable consistently with the declared policy of the state. (3)  A license to operate a cruise vessel shall not be granted unless the applicant has satisfied the commission that: (a)  He has adequate business probity, competence and experience, in the operation of cruise vessels or generally; and (b)  The proposed financing of the entire operation is: (i)  Adequate for the nature of the proposed operation; and (ii)  From a suitable source.  Any lender or other source of money or credit which the commission finds does not meet the standards set forth in subsection (2) may be deemed unsuitable. SECTION 10.  Section 27-115-55, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 27-115-55.  (1)  The Legislature * * * hereby recognizes that to conduct a successful lottery, the corporation must develop and maintain a statewide network of lottery retailers that will serve the public convenience and promote the sale of tickets, while ensuring the integrity of the lottery operations, games and activities. (2)  To govern the selection of lottery retailers, the board shall, by administrative rules and regulations, develop a list of objective criteria upon which the selection of lottery retailers shall be based.  In developing these criteria, the board shall consider such factors as the applicant's financial responsibility, location and security of the applicant's place of business or activity, integrity, and reputation; however, the board shall not consider political affiliation, activities or monetary contributions to political organizations or candidates for any public office.  The criteria shall include, but not be limited to, the following: (a)  The applicant shall be current in payment of all taxes, interest and penalties owed to any taxing political subdivision where the lottery retailer will sell lottery tickets. (b)  The applicant shall be current in filing all applicable tax returns and in payment of all taxes, interest and penalties owed to the State of Mississippi, excluding items under formal appeal pursuant to applicable statutes, before a license is issued and before each renewal. (c)  No person shall be selected as a lottery retailer for the sale of lottery tickets who: (i)  Has been convicted of a criminal offense related to the security or integrity of the lottery in this or any other jurisdiction. (ii)  Has been convicted of any illegal gambling activity, false statements, false swearing or perjury in this or any other jurisdiction, or convicted of a * * *felony disqualifying crime as provided in the Fresh Start Act. (iii)  Has been found to have violated the provisions of this chapter or any administrative rules and regulations adopted under this chapter, unless either ten (10) years have passed since the violation, or the president and the board find the violation both minor and unintentional in nature. (iv)  Is a vendor or an employee or agent of any vendor doing business with the corporation. (v)  Resides in the same household as an officer or board member of the corporation. (vi)  Has made a statement of material fact to the corporation, knowing such statement to be false. SECTION 11.  Section 37-3-2, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 37-3-2.  (1)  There is established within the State Department of Education the Commission on Teacher and Administrator Education, Certification and Licensure and Development.  It shall be the purpose and duty of the commission to make recommendations to the State Board of Education regarding standards for the certification and licensure and continuing professional development of those who teach or perform tasks of an educational nature in the public schools of Mississippi. (2)  (a)  The commission shall be composed of fifteen (15) qualified members.  The membership of the commission shall be composed of the following members to be appointed, three (3) from each of the four (4) congressional districts, as such districts existed on January 1, 2011, in accordance with the population calculations determined by the 2010 federal decennial census, including:  four (4) classroom teachers; three (3) school administrators; one (1) representative of schools of education of public institutions of higher learning located within the state to be recommended by the Board of Trustees of State Institutions of Higher Learning; one (1) representative from the schools of education of independent institutions of higher learning to be recommended by the Board of the Mississippi Association of Independent Colleges; one (1) representative from public community and junior colleges located within the state to be recommended by the Mississippi Community College Board; one (1) local school board member; and four (4) laypersons.  Three (3) members of the commission, at the sole discretion of the State Board of Education, shall be appointed from the state at large. (b)  All appointments shall be made by the State Board of Education after consultation with the State Superintendent of Public Education.  The first appointments by the State Board of Education shall be made as follows:  five (5) members shall be appointed for a term of one (1) year; five (5) members shall be appointed for a term of two (2) years; and five (5) members shall be appointed for a term of three (3) years.  Thereafter, all members shall be appointed for a term of four (4) years. (3)  The State Board of Education when making appointments shall designate a chairman.  The commission shall meet at least once every two (2) months or more often if needed.  Members of the commission shall be compensated at a rate of per diem as authorized by Section 25-3-69 and be reimbursed for actual and necessary expenses as authorized by Section 25-3-41. (4)  (a)  An appropriate staff member of the State Department of Education shall be designated and assigned by the State Superintendent of Public Education to serve as executive secretary and coordinator for the commission.  No less than two (2) other appropriate staff members of the State Department of Education shall be designated and assigned by the State Superintendent of Public Education to serve on the staff of the commission. (b)  An Office of Educator Misconduct Evaluations shall be established within the State Department of Education to assist the commission in responding to infractions and violations, and in conducting hearings and enforcing the provisions of subsections (11), (12), (13), (14) and (15) of this section, and violations of the Mississippi Educator Code of Ethics. (5)  It shall be the duty of the commission to: (a)  Set standards and criteria, subject to the approval of the State Board of Education, for all educator preparation programs in the state; (b)  Recommend to the State Board of Education each year approval or disapproval of each educator preparation program in the state, subject to a process and schedule determined by the State Board of Education; (c)  Establish, subject to the approval of the State Board of Education, standards for initial teacher certification and licensure in all fields; (d)  Establish, subject to the approval of the State Board of Education, standards for the renewal of teacher licenses in all fields; (e)  Review and evaluate objective measures of teacher performance, such as test scores, which may form part of the licensure process, and to make recommendations for their use; (f)  Review all existing requirements for certification and licensure; (g)  Consult with groups whose work may be affected by the commission's decisions; (h)  Prepare reports from time to time on current practices and issues in the general area of teacher education and certification and licensure; (i)  Hold hearings concerning standards for teachers' and administrators' education and certification and licensure with approval of the State Board of Education; (j)  Hire expert consultants with approval of the State Board of Education; (k)  Set up ad hoc committees to advise on specific areas; (l)  Perform such other functions as may fall within their general charge and which may be delegated to them by the State Board of Education; and (m)  Establish standards, subject to the approval of the State Board of Education, for supplemental endorsements, provided that the standards allow teachers as many options as possible to receive a supplemental endorsement, including, but not limited to, the option of taking additional coursework or earning at least the minimum qualifying score or higher on the required licensure subject assessment relevant to the endorsement area for which the licensure is sought.  The subject assessment option shall not apply to certain subject areas, including, but not limited to, Early/Primary Education PreK-3, Elementary Education, or Special Education, except by special approval by the State Board of Education. (6)  (a)  Standard License - Approved Program Route.  An educator entering the school system of Mississippi for the first time and meeting all requirements as established by the State Board of Education shall be granted a standard five-year license. Persons who possess two (2) years of classroom experience as an assistant teacher or who have taught for one (1) year in an accredited public or private school shall be allowed to fulfill student teaching requirements under the supervision of a qualified participating teacher approved by an accredited college of education.  The local school district in which the assistant teacher is employed shall compensate such assistant teachers at the required salary level during the period of time such individual is completing student teaching requirements.  Applicants for a standard license shall submit to the department: (i)  An application on a department form; (ii)  An official transcript of completion of a teacher education program approved by the department or a nationally accredited program, subject to the following: Licensure to teach in Mississippi prekindergarten through kindergarten classrooms shall require completion of a teacher education program or a Bachelor of Science degree with child development emphasis from a program accredited by the American Association of Family and Consumer Sciences (AAFCS) or by the National Association for Education of Young Children (NAEYC) or by the National Council for Accreditation of Teacher Education (NCATE).  Licensure to teach in Mississippi kindergarten, for those applicants who have completed a teacher education program, and in Grade 1 through Grade 4 shall require the completion of an interdisciplinary program of studies.  Licenses for Grades 4 through 8 shall require the completion of an interdisciplinary program of studies with two (2) or more areas of concentration.  Licensure to teach in Mississippi Grades 7 through 12 shall require a major in an academic field other than education, or a combination of disciplines other than education. Students preparing to teach a subject shall complete a major in the respective subject discipline.  All applicants for standard licensure shall demonstrate that such person's college preparation in those fields was in accordance with the standards set forth by the National Council for Accreditation of Teacher Education (NCATE) or the National Association of State Directors of Teacher Education and Certification (NASDTEC) or, for those applicants who have a Bachelor of Science degree with child development emphasis, the American Association of Family and Consumer Sciences (AAFCS).  Effective July 1, 2016, for initial elementary education licensure, a teacher candidate must earn a passing score on a rigorous test of scientifically research-based reading instruction and intervention and data-based decision-making principles as approved by the State Board of Education; (iii)  A copy of test scores evidencing satisfactory completion of nationally administered examinations of achievement, such as the Educational Testing Service's teacher testing examinations; (iv)  Any other document required by the State Board of Education; and (v)  From and after July 1, 2020, no teacher candidate shall be licensed to teach in Mississippi who did not meet the following criteria for entrance into an approved teacher education program: 1.  An ACT Score of twenty-one (21) (or SAT equivalent); or 2.  Achieve a qualifying passing score on the Praxis Core Academic Skills for Educators examination as established by the State Board of Education; or 3.  A minimum GPA of 3.0 on coursework prior to admission to an approved teacher education program. (b)  (i)  Standard License - Nontraditional Teaching Route.  From and after July 1, 2020, no teacher candidate shall be licensed to teach in Mississippi under the alternate route who did not meet the following criteria: 1.  An ACT Score of twenty-one (21) (or SAT equivalent); or 2.  Achieve a qualifying passing score on the Praxis Core Academic Skills for Educators examination as established by the State Board of Education; or 3.  A minimum GPA of 3.0 on coursework prior to admission to an approved teacher education program. (ii)  Beginning July 1, 2020, an individual who has attained a passing score on the Praxis Core Academic Skills for Educators or an ACT Score of twenty-one (21) (or SAT equivalent) or a minimum GPA of 3.0 on coursework prior to admission to an approved teacher education program and a passing score on the Praxis Subject Assessment in the requested area of endorsement may apply for admission to the Teach Mississippi Institute (TMI) program to teach students in Grades 7 through 12 if the individual meets the requirements of this paragraph (b).  The State Board of Education shall adopt rules requiring that teacher preparation institutions which provide the Teach Mississippi Institute (TMI) program for the preparation of nontraditional teachers shall meet the standards and comply with the provisions of this paragraph. 1.  The Teach Mississippi Institute (TMI) shall include an intensive eight-week, nine-semester-hour summer program or a curriculum of study in which the student matriculates in the fall or spring semester, which shall include, but not be limited to, instruction in education, effective teaching strategies, classroom management, state curriculum requirements, planning and instruction, instructional methods and pedagogy, using test results to improve instruction, and a one (1) semester three-hour supervised internship to be completed while the teacher is employed as a full-time teacher intern in a local school district.  The TMI shall be implemented on a pilot program basis, with courses to be offered at up to four (4) locations in the state, with one (1) TMI site to be located in each of the three (3) Mississippi Supreme Court districts. 2.  The school sponsoring the teacher intern shall enter into a written agreement with the institution providing the Teach Mississippi Institute (TMI) program, under terms and conditions as agreed upon by the contracting parties, providing that the school district shall provide teacher interns seeking a nontraditional provisional teaching license with a one-year classroom teaching experience. The teacher intern shall successfully complete the one (1) semester three-hour intensive internship in the school district during the semester immediately following successful completion of the TMI and prior to the end of the one-year classroom teaching experience. 3.  Upon completion of the nine-semester-hour TMI or the fall or spring semester option, the individual shall submit his transcript to the commission for provisional licensure of the intern teacher, and the intern teacher shall be issued a provisional teaching license by the commission, which will allow the individual to legally serve as a teacher while the person completes a nontraditional teacher preparation internship program. 4.  During the semester of internship in the school district, the teacher preparation institution shall monitor the performance of the intern teacher.  The school district that employs the provisional teacher shall supervise the provisional teacher during the teacher's intern year of employment under a nontraditional provisional license, and shall, in consultation with the teacher intern's mentor at the school district of employment, submit to the commission a comprehensive evaluation of the teacher's performance sixty (60) days prior to the expiration of the nontraditional provisional license.  If the comprehensive evaluation establishes that the provisional teacher intern's performance fails to meet the standards of the approved nontraditional teacher preparation internship program, the individual shall not be approved for a standard license. 5.  An individual issued a provisional teaching license under this nontraditional route shall successfully complete, at a minimum, a one-year beginning teacher mentoring and induction program administered by the employing school district with the assistance of the State Department of Education. 6.  Upon successful completion of the TMI and the internship provisional license period, applicants for a Standard License - Nontraditional Route shall submit to the commission a transcript of successful completion of the twelve (12) semester hours required in the internship program, and the employing school district shall submit to the commission a recommendation for standard licensure of the intern.  If the school district recommends licensure, the applicant shall be issued a Standard License - Nontraditional Route which shall be valid for a five-year period and be renewable. 7.  At the discretion of the teacher preparation institution, the individual shall be allowed to credit the twelve (12) semester hours earned in the nontraditional teacher internship program toward the graduate hours required for a Master of Arts in Teacher (MAT) Degree. 8.  The local school district in which the nontraditional teacher intern or provisional licensee is employed shall compensate such teacher interns at Step 1 of the required salary level during the period of time such individual is completing teacher internship requirements and shall compensate such Standard License - Nontraditional Route teachers at Step 3 of the required salary level when they complete license requirements. (iii) Implementation of the TMI program provided for under this paragraph (b) shall be contingent upon the availability of funds appropriated specifically for such purpose by the Legislature.  Such implementation of the TMI program may not be deemed to prohibit the State Board of Education from developing and implementing additional alternative route teacher licensure programs, as deemed appropriate by the board.  The emergency certification program in effect prior to July 1, 2002, shall remain in effect. (iv)  A Standard License - Approved Program Route shall be issued for a five-year period, and may be renewed.  Recognizing teaching as a profession, a hiring preference shall be granted to persons holding a Standard License - Approved Program Route or Standard License - Nontraditional Teaching Route over persons holding any other license. (c)  Special License - Expert Citizen.  In order to allow a school district to offer specialized or technical courses, the State Department of Education, in accordance with rules and regulations established by the State Board of Education, may grant a five-year expert citizen-teacher license to local business or other professional personnel to teach in a public school or nonpublic school accredited or approved by the state.  Such person shall be required to have a high school diploma, an industry-recognized certification related to the subject area in which they are teaching and a minimum of five (5) years of relevant experience but shall not be required to hold an associate or bachelor's degree, provided that he or she possesses the minimum qualifications required for his or her profession, and may begin teaching upon his employment by the local school board and licensure by the Mississippi Department of Education.  If a school board hires a career technical education pathway instructor who does not have an industry certification in his or her area of expertise but does have the required experience, the school board shall spread their decision on the minutes at their next meeting and provide a detailed explanation for why they hired the instructor.  Such instructor shall present the minutes of the school board to the State Department of Education when he or she applies for an expert citizen license.  The board shall adopt rules and regulations to administer the expert citizen-teacher license.  A Special License - Expert Citizen may be renewed in accordance with the established rules and regulations of the State Department of Education. (d)  Special License - Nonrenewable.  The State Board of Education is authorized to establish rules and regulations to allow those educators not meeting requirements in paragraph (a), (b) or (c) of this subsection (6) to be licensed for a period of not more than three (3) years, except by special approval of the State Board of Education. (e)  Nonlicensed Teaching Personnel.  A nonlicensed person may teach for a maximum of three (3) periods per teaching day in a public school district or a nonpublic school accredited/approved by the state.  Such person shall submit to the department a transcript or record of his education and experience which substantiates his preparation for the subject to be taught and shall meet other qualifications specified by the commission and approved by the State Board of Education.  In no case shall any local school board hire nonlicensed personnel as authorized under this paragraph in excess of five percent (5%) of the total number of licensed personnel in any single school. (f)  Special License - Transitional Bilingual Education.  Beginning July 1, 2003, the commission shall grant special licenses to teachers of transitional bilingual education who possess such qualifications as are prescribed in this section.  Teachers of transitional bilingual education shall be compensated by local school boards at not less than one (1) step on the regular salary schedule applicable to permanent teachers licensed under this section.  The commission shall grant special licenses to teachers of transitional bilingual education who present the commission with satisfactory evidence that they (i) possess a speaking and reading ability in a language, other than English, in which bilingual education is offered and communicative skills in English; (ii) are in good health * * * and sound moral character; (iii) possess a bachelor's degree or an associate's degree in teacher education from an accredited institution of higher education; (iv) meet such requirements as to courses of study, semester hours therein, experience and training as may be required by the commission; and (v) are legally present in the United States and possess legal authorization for employment.  A teacher of transitional bilingual education serving under a special license shall be under an exemption from standard licensure if he achieves the requisite qualifications therefor.  Two (2) years of service by a teacher of transitional bilingual education under such an exemption shall be credited to the teacher in acquiring a Standard Educator License.  Nothing in this paragraph shall be deemed to prohibit a local school board from employing a teacher licensed in an appropriate field as approved by the State Department of Education to teach in a program in transitional bilingual education. (g)  In the event any school district meets the highest accreditation standards as defined by the State Board of Education in the accountability system, the State Board of Education, in its discretion, may exempt such school district from any restrictions in paragraph (e) relating to the employment of nonlicensed teaching personnel. (h)  Highly Qualified Teachers.  Beginning July 1, 2006, any teacher from any state meeting the federal definition of highly qualified, as described in the No Child Left Behind Act, must be granted a standard five-year license by the State Department of Education. (7)  Administrator License.  The State Board of Education is authorized to establish rules and regulations and to administer the licensure process of the school administrators in the State of Mississippi.  There will be four (4) categories of administrator licensure with exceptions only through special approval of the State Board of Education. (a)  Administrator License - Nonpracticing.  Those educators holding administrative endorsement but having no administrative experience or not serving in an administrative position on January 15, 1997. (b)  Administrator License - Entry Level.  Those educators holding administrative endorsement and having met the department's qualifications to be eligible for employment in a Mississippi school district.  Administrator License - Entry Level shall be issued for a five-year period and shall be nonrenewable. (c)  Standard Administrator License - Career Level.  An administrator who has met all the requirements of the department for standard administrator licensure. (d)  Administrator License - Nontraditional Route.  The board may establish a nontraditional route for licensing administrative personnel.  Such nontraditional route for administrative licensure shall be available for persons holding, but not limited to, a master of business administration degree, a master of public administration degree, a master of public planning and policy degree or a doctor of jurisprudence degree from an accredited college or university, with five (5) years of administrative or supervisory experience.  Successful completion of the requirements of alternate route licensure for administrators shall qualify the person for a standard administrator license. Individuals seeking school administrator licensure under paragraph (b), (c) or (d) shall successfully complete a training program and an assessment process prescribed by the State Board of Education.  All applicants for school administrator licensure shall meet all requirements prescribed by the department under paragraph (b), (c) or (d), and the cost of the assessment process required shall be paid by the applicant. (8)  Reciprocity.  The department shall grant a standard five-year license to any individual who possesses a valid standard license from another state, or another country or political subdivision thereof, within a period of twenty-one (21) days from the date of a completed application.  The issuance of a license by reciprocity to a military-trained applicant, military spouse or person who establishes residence in this state shall be subject to the provisions of Section 73-50-1 or 73-50-2, as applicable. (9)  Renewal and Reinstatement of Licenses.  The State Board of Education is authorized to establish rules and regulations for the renewal and reinstatement of educator and administrator licenses.  Effective May 15, 1997, the valid standard license held by an educator shall be extended five (5) years beyond the expiration date of the license in order to afford the educator adequate time to fulfill new renewal requirements established pursuant to this subsection.  An educator completing a master of education, educational specialist or doctor of education degree in May 1997 for the purpose of upgrading the educator's license to a higher class shall be given this extension of five (5) years plus five (5) additional years for completion of a higher degree.  For all license types with a current valid expiration date of June 30, 2021, the State Department of Education shall grant a one-year extension to June 30, 2022.  Beginning July 1, 2022, and thereafter, applicants for licensure renewal shall meet all requirements in effect on the date that the complete application is received by the State Department of Education. (10)  All controversies involving the issuance, revocation, suspension or any change whatsoever in the licensure of an educator required to hold a license shall be initially heard in a hearing de novo, by the commission or by a subcommittee established by the commission and composed of commission members, or by a hearing officer retained and appointed by the commission, for the purpose of holding hearings.  Any complaint seeking the denial of issuance, revocation or suspension of a license shall be by sworn affidavit filed with the Commission on Teacher and Administrator Education, Certification and Licensure and Development.  The decision thereon by the commission, its subcommittee or hearing officer, shall be final, unless the aggrieved party shall appeal to the State Board of Education, within ten (10) days, of the decision of the commission, its subcommittee or hearing officer.  An appeal to the State Board of Education shall be perfected upon filing a notice of the appeal and by the prepayment of the costs of the preparation of the record of proceedings by the commission, its subcommittee or hearing officer.  An appeal shall be on the record previously made before the commission, its subcommittee or hearing officer, unless otherwise provided by rules and regulations adopted by the board.  The decision of the commission, its subcommittee or hearing officer shall not be disturbed on appeal if supported by substantial evidence, was not arbitrary or capricious, within the authority of the commission, and did not violate some statutory or constitutional right.  The State Board of Education in its authority may reverse, or remand with instructions, the decision of the commission, its subcommittee or hearing officer.  The decision of the State Board of Education shall be final. (11)  (a)  The State Board of Education, acting through the commission, may deny an application for any teacher or administrator license for one or more of the following: (i)  Lack of qualifications which are prescribed by law or regulations adopted by the State Board of Education; (ii)  The applicant has a physical, emotional or mental disability that renders the applicant unfit to perform the duties authorized by the license, as certified by a licensed psychologist or psychiatrist; (iii)  The applicant is actively addicted to or actively dependent on alcohol or other habit-forming drugs or is a habitual user of narcotics, barbiturates, amphetamines, hallucinogens or other drugs having similar effect, at the time of application for a license; (iv)  Fraud or deceit committed by the applicant in securing or attempting to secure such certification and license; (v)  Failing or refusing to furnish reasonable evidence of identification; (vi)  The applicant has been convicted, has pled guilty or entered a plea of nolo contendere to a * * *felony, as defined by federal or state law disqualifying crime as provided in the Fresh Start Act.  For purposes of this subparagraph (vi) of this paragraph (a), a "guilty plea" includes a plea of guilty, entry of a plea of nolo contendere, or entry of an order granting pretrial or judicial diversion; (vii)  The applicant or licensee is on probation or post-release supervision for a * * *felony or conviction, as defined by federal or state law disqualifying crime as provided in the Fresh Start Act.  However, this disqualification expires upon the end of the probationary or post-release supervision period. (b)  The State Board of Education, acting through the commission, shall deny an application for any teacher or administrator license, or immediately revoke the current teacher or administrator license, for one or more of the following: (i)  If the applicant or licensee has been convicted, has pled guilty or entered a plea of nolo contendere to a sex offense as defined by federal or state law.  For purposes of this subparagraph (i) of this paragraph (b), a "guilty plea" includes a plea of guilty, entry of a plea of nolo contendere, or entry of an order granting pretrial or judicial diversion; (ii)  The applicant or licensee is on probation or post-release supervision for a sex offense conviction, as defined by federal or state law; (iii)  The license holder has fondled a student as described in Section 97-5-23, or had any type of sexual involvement with a student as described in Section 97-3-95; or (iv)  The license holder has failed to report sexual involvement of a school employee with a student as required by Section 97-5-24. (12)  The State Board of Education, acting through the commission, may revoke, suspend or refuse to renew any teacher or administrator license for specified periods of time or may place on probation, reprimand a licensee, or take other disciplinary action with regard to any license issued under this chapter for one or more of the following: (a)  Breach of contract or abandonment of employment may result in the suspension of the license for one (1) school year as provided in Section 37-9-57; (b)  Obtaining a license by fraudulent means shall result in immediate suspension and continued suspension for one (1) year after correction is made; (c)  Suspension or revocation of a certificate or license by another state shall result in immediate suspension or revocation and shall continue until records in the prior state have been cleared; (d)  The license holder has been convicted, has pled guilty or entered a plea of nolo contendere to a * * *felony, as defined by federal or state law disqualifying crime as provided in the Fresh Start Act.  For purposes of this paragraph, a "guilty plea" includes a plea of guilty, entry of a plea of nolo contendere, or entry of an order granting pretrial or judicial diversion; (e)  The license holder knowingly and willfully committing any of the acts affecting validity of mandatory uniform test results as provided in Section 37-16-4(1); (f)  The license holder has engaged in unethical conduct relating to an educator/student relationship as identified by the State Board of Education in its rules; (g)  The license holder served as superintendent or principal in a school district during the time preceding and/or that resulted in the Governor declaring a state of emergency and the State Board of Education appointing a conservator; (h)  The license holder submitted a false certification to the State Department of Education that a statewide test was administered in strict accordance with the Requirements of the Mississippi Statewide Assessment System; or (i)  The license holder has failed to comply with the Procedures for Reporting Infractions as promulgated by the commission and approved by the State Board of Education pursuant to subsection (15) of this section. For purposes of this subsection, probation shall be defined as a length of time determined by the commission, its subcommittee or hearing officer, and based on the severity of the offense in which the license holder shall meet certain requirements as prescribed by the commission, its subcommittee or hearing officer.  Failure to complete the requirements in the time specified shall result in immediate suspension of the license for one (1) year. (13)  (a)  Dismissal or suspension of a licensed employee by a local school board pursuant to Section 37-9-59 may result in the suspension or revocation of a license for a length of time which shall be determined by the commission and based upon the severity of the offense. (b)  Any offense committed or attempted in any other state shall result in the same penalty as if committed or attempted in this state. (c)  A person may voluntarily surrender a license.  The surrender of such license may result in the commission recommending any of the above penalties without the necessity of a hearing.  However, any such license which has voluntarily been surrendered by a licensed employee may only be reinstated by a majority vote of all members of the commission present at the meeting called for such purpose. (14)  (a)  A person whose license has been suspended or surrendered on any grounds, except * * * criminal grounds because of a disqualifying crime as provided in the Fresh Start Act, may petition for reinstatement of the license after one (1) year from the date of suspension or surrender, or after one-half (1/2) of the suspended or surrendered time has lapsed, whichever is greater.  A person whose license has been suspended or revoked on any grounds or violations under subsection (12) of this section may be reinstated automatically or approved for a reinstatement hearing, upon submission of a written request to the commission.  A license suspended, revoked or surrendered * * *on criminal grounds because of a disqualifying crime as provided in the Fresh Start Act may be reinstated upon petition to the commission filed after expiration of the sentence and parole or probationary period imposed upon conviction.  A revoked, suspended or surrendered license may be reinstated upon satisfactory showing of evidence of rehabilitation.  The commission shall require all who petition for reinstatement to furnish evidence satisfactory to the commission of good * * *character, good mental, emotional and physical health and such other evidence as the commission may deem necessary to establish the petitioner's rehabilitation and fitness to perform the duties authorized by the license. (b)  A person whose license expires while under investigation by the Office of Educator Misconduct for an alleged violation may not be reinstated without a hearing before the commission if required based on the results of the investigation. (15)  Reporting procedures and hearing procedures for dealing with infractions under this section shall be promulgated by the commission, subject to the approval of the State Board of Education.  The revocation or suspension of a license shall be effected at the time indicated on the notice of suspension or revocation.  The commission shall immediately notify the superintendent of the school district or school board where the teacher or administrator is employed of any disciplinary action and also notify the teacher or administrator of such revocation or suspension and shall maintain records of action taken.  The State Board of Education may reverse or remand with instructions any decision of the commission, its subcommittee or hearing officer regarding a petition for reinstatement of a license, and any such decision of the State Board of Education shall be final. (16)  An appeal from the action of the State Board of Education in denying an application, revoking or suspending a license or otherwise disciplining any person under the provisions of this section shall be filed in the Chancery Court of the First Judicial District of Hinds County, Mississippi, on the record made, including a verbatim transcript of the testimony at the hearing.  The appeal shall be filed within thirty (30) days after notification of the action of the board is mailed or served and the proceedings in chancery court shall be conducted as other matters coming before the court.  The appeal shall be perfected upon filing notice of the appeal and by the prepayment of all costs, including the cost of preparation of the record of the proceedings by the State Board of Education, and the filing of a bond in the sum of Two Hundred Dollars ($200.00) conditioned that if the action of the board be affirmed by the chancery court, the applicant or license holder shall pay the costs of the appeal and the action of the chancery court. (17)  All such programs, rules, regulations, standards and criteria recommended or authorized by the commission shall become effective upon approval by the State Board of Education as designated by appropriate orders entered upon the minutes thereof. (18)  The granting of a license shall not be deemed a property right nor a guarantee of employment in any public school district.  A license is a privilege indicating minimal eligibility for teaching in the public school districts of Mississippi.  This section shall in no way alter or abridge the authority of local school districts to require greater qualifications or standards of performance as a prerequisite of initial or continued employment in such districts. (19)  In addition to the reasons specified in subsections (12) and (13) of this section, the board shall be authorized to suspend the license of any licensee for being out of compliance with an order for support, as defined in Section 93-11-153.  The procedure for suspension of a license for being out of compliance with an order for support, and the procedure for the reissuance or reinstatement of a license suspended for that purpose, and the payment of any fees for the reissuance or reinstatement of a license suspended for that purpose, shall be governed by Section 93-11-157 or 93-11-163, as the case may be.  Actions taken by the board in suspending a license when required by Section 93-11-157 or 93-11-163 are not actions from which an appeal may be taken under this section.  Any appeal of a license suspension that is required by Section 93-11-157 or 93-11-163 shall be taken in accordance with the appeal procedure specified in Section 93-11-157 or 93-11-163, as the case may be, rather than the procedure specified in this section.  If there is any conflict between any provision of Section 93-11-157 or 93-11-163 and any provision of this chapter, the provisions of Section 93-11-157 or 93-11-163, as the case may be, shall control. (20)  The Department of Education shall grant and renew all licenses and certifications of teachers and administrators within twenty-one (21) days from the date of a completed application if the applicant has otherwise met all established requirements for the license or certification. SECTION 12.  Section 41-29-303, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 41-29-303.  No license shall be issued under Section 41-29-301 * * * unless and until the applicant therefor has furnished proof satisfactory to the State Board of Pharmacy that the applicant is * * * of good moral character or, if the applicant be an association or corporation, that the managing officers are of good moral character, and that the applicant is properly equipped as to land, buildings, and paraphernalia to carry on the business described in his application.  No license shall be granted to any person who has within five (5) years been convicted of a willful violation of any law of the United States, or of any state, relating to opium, coca leaves, or other narcotic drugs, or to any person who is a narcotic drug addict.  The state board of pharmacy may suspend or revoke any license for cause. SECTION 13.  Section 43-1-4, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 43-1-4.  The Department of Human Services shall have the following powers and duties: (a)  To provide basic services and assistance statewide to needy and disadvantaged individuals and families. (b)  To promote integration of the many services and programs within its jurisdiction at the client level thus improving the efficiency and effectiveness of service delivery and providing easier access to clients. (c)  To develop a statewide comprehensive service delivery plan in coordination with the Board of Health, the Board of Mental Health, and the Department of Finance and Administration.  Such plan shall be developed and presented to the Governor by January 1, 1990. (d)  To employ personnel and expend funds appropriated to the department to carry out the duties and responsibilities assigned to the department by law. (e)  To fingerprint and conduct a background investigation on every employee, contractor, subcontractor and volunteer (i) who has direct access to clients of the department who are children or vulnerable adults, (ii) who is in a position of fiduciary responsibility, (iii) who is in a position with access to Federal Tax Information (FTI), or (iv) who is otherwise required by federal law or regulations to undergo a background investigation.  Every such employee, contractor, subcontractor and volunteer shall provide a valid current social security number and/or driver's license number which shall be furnished to conduct the background investigation for determination * * *as to good moral character and to ensure that no person placed in any position referenced in this paragraph has  * * *a felony conviction been convicted of a disqualifying crime as provided in the Fresh Start Act that would prevent employment or access to Federal Tax Information according to department policy.  If no disqualifying record is identified at the state level, the fingerprints shall be forwarded to the Federal Bureau of Investigation for a fingerprint-based national criminal history record check.  The department shall be the recipient of the results of any background investigation and/or criminal history record check performed in accordance with this paragraph. SECTION 14.  Section 43-26-1, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 43-26-1.  (1)  There is created a Mississippi Department of Child Protection Services. (2)  The Chief Administrative Officer of the Department of Child Protection Services shall be the Commissioner of Child Protection Services who shall be appointed by the Governor with the advice and consent of the Senate.  The commissioner shall possess the following qualifications: (a)  A bachelor's degree from an accredited institution of higher learning and ten (10) years' experience in management, public administration, finance or accounting; or (b)  A master's or doctoral degree from an accredited institution of higher learning and five (5) years' experience in management, public administration, finance, law or accounting. (3)  The Department of Child Protection Services shall provide the services authorized by law to every individual determined to be eligible therefor, and in carrying out the purposes of the department, the commissioner is authorized: (a)  To formulate the policy of the department regarding child welfare services within the jurisdiction of the department; (b)  To adopt, modify, repeal and promulgate, after due notice and hearing, and where not otherwise prohibited by federal or state law, to make exceptions to and grant exemptions and variances from, and to enforce rules and regulations implementing or effectuating the powers and duties of the department under any and all statutes within the department's jurisdiction; (c)  To apply for, receive and expend any federal or state funds or contributions, gifts, devises, bequests or funds from any other source; (d)  To enter into and execute contracts, grants and cooperative agreements with any federal or state agency or subdivision thereof, or any public or private institution located inside or outside the State of Mississippi, or any person, corporation or association in connection with carrying out the programs of the department; and (e)  To discharge such other duties, responsibilities, and powers as are necessary to implement the programs of the department. (4)  The commissioner shall establish the organizational structure of the Department of Child Protection Services, which shall include the creation of any units necessary to implement the duties assigned to the department and consistent with specific requirements of law. (5)  The commissioner shall appoint heads of offices, bureaus, and divisions, as defined in Section 7-17-11, who shall serve at the pleasure of the commissioner.  The salary and compensation of such office, bureau and division heads shall be subject to the rules and regulations adopted and promulgated by the State Personnel Board. The commissioner shall have the authority to organize offices as deemed appropriate to carry out the responsibilities of the department. (6)  The Department of Child Protection Services shall be responsible for the development, execution, and provision of services in the following areas: (a)  Protective services for children; (b)  Foster care; (c)  Adoption services; (d)  Special services; (e)  Interstate compact; (f)  Licensure; (g)  Prevention services; and (h)  Such other services as may be designated.  Services enumerated under Section 43-15-13 et seq., for the foster care program shall be provided by qualified staff with appropriate case loads. (7)  The Department of Child Protection Services shall have the following powers and duties: (a)  To provide basic services and assistance statewide to needy and disadvantaged individuals and families; (b)  To promote integration of the many services and programs within its jurisdiction at the client level thus improving the efficiency and effectiveness of service delivery and providing easier access to clients; (c)  To employ personnel and expend funds appropriated to the department to carry out the duties and responsibilities assigned to the department by law; (d)  To fingerprint and conduct a background investigation on every employee, contractor, subcontractor and volunteer: (i)  Who has direct access to clients of the department who are children or vulnerable adults; (ii)  Who is in a position of fiduciary responsibility; (iii)  Who is in a position with access to Federal Tax Information (FTI); or (iv)  Who is otherwise required by federal law or regulations to undergo a background investigation. Every such employee, contractor, subcontractor and volunteer shall provide a valid current social security number and/or driver's license number, which shall be furnished to conduct the background investigation for determination as to good moral character and to ensure that no person placed in any position referenced in this paragraph (d) has * * *a felony conviction been convicted of a disqualifying crime as provided in the Fresh Start Act that would prevent employment or access to Federal Tax Information according to department policy.  If no disqualifying record is identified at the state level, the fingerprints shall be forwarded to the Federal Bureau of Investigation for a fingerprint-based national criminal history record check.  The department shall be the recipient of the results of any background investigation and/or criminal history record check performed in accordance with this paragraph; (e)  To establish and maintain programs not inconsistent with the terms of this chapter and the rules, regulations and policies of the Department of Child Protection Services, and publish the rules and regulations of the department pertaining to such programs; (f)  To provide all other child welfare programs and services previously provided by the Department of Human Services or a division thereof; and (g)  Make such reports in such form and containing such information as the federal government may, from time to time, require, and comply with such provisions as the federal government may, from time to time, find necessary to assure the correctness and verification of such reports. (8)  The Mississippi Department of Child Protection Services shall submit a copy of the federal Annual Progress and Services Report (APSR) to the Chair of the Senate Public Health and Welfare Committee, the Chair of the Senate Appropriations Committee, the Chair of the House Public Health and Human Services Committee, the Chair of the House Appropriations Committee, the Lieutenant Governor, the Speaker of the House of Representatives, and the Governor by December 1 of each year. (9)  (a)  The Commissioner of Child Protection Services shall hire a Coordinator of Services for Victims of Human Trafficking and Commercial Sexual Exploitation within the Department of Child Protection Services whose duties shall include, but not be limited to, the following: (i)  To form specialized human trafficking and commercial sexual exploitation assessment teams to respond on an as-needed basis to act as an emergency, separate and specialized response and assessment team to rapidly respond to the needs of children who are victims of human trafficking and commercial sexual exploitation; (ii)  To identify victims of human trafficking and commercial sexual exploitation; (iii)  To monitor, record and distribute federal human trafficking funds received by the Department of Child Protection Services; (iv)  To employ staff to investigate allegations of human trafficking and commercial sexual exploitation; and (v)  To develop and coordinate services within the Department of Child Protection Services and with outside service providers for victims of human trafficking and commercial sexual exploitation. (b)  The Commissioner of Child Protection Services shall develop standard operating procedures for the investigation, custody and services provided to alleged victims of human trafficking and commercial sexual exploitation. (c)  The Commissioner shall require two (2) hours of training regarding the subject of identifying, assessing, and providing comprehensive services to a child who has experienced or is alleged to have experienced commercial sexual exploitation or human trafficking.  The training must be incorporated into the pre-service training requirements of all Mississippi Department of Child Protection Services family specialists, adoption specialists, licensure specialists, direct supervisors of family protection specialists, direct supervisors of adoption specialists, and direct supervisors of licensure specialists. (10)  This section shall stand repealed on July 1, 2028. SECTION 15.  Section 45-3-9, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 45-3-9.  (1)  The chief of patrol, directors, inspectors, assistant inspectors, patrol officers and investigators of the department shall be selected after an examination as to physical and mental fitness, knowledge of traffic laws, rules and regulations of this state, the laws of the state pertaining to arrest, and the rules and regulations of the Mississippi Department of Public Safety and Public Service Commission, such examination to be prescribed by the commissioner.  At the time of appointment they shall be citizens of the United States and the State of Mississippi, * * *of good moral character, and shall be not less than twenty-one (21) years of age and shall have a high school diploma or High School Equivalency Diploma. (2)  Sworn agents of the Mississippi Bureau of Narcotics who are employed as enforcement troopers shall retain all compensatory, personal and sick leave accrued pursuant to Sections 25-3-92, 25-3-93 and 25-3-95. SECTION 16.  Section 45-3-47, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 45-3-47.  (1)  The selection program for such training school shall consist of application, examination, investigation and interview: (a)  Application. The commissioner shall prescribe an application that shall contain a case history of the applicant, fingerprints, picture of the applicant, certified copies of birth certificate and transcript of school records.  Said application shall include certified copies of any discharge from the services of the United States government. (b)  Examination. The commissioner shall adopt a standardized test for applicants and each shall be required to take the prescribed examination on a competitive basis.  The commissioner shall further require a physical examination by a staff of competent doctors to determine that each applicant selected is in good physical condition, including height-weight ratio as recommended by the United States Air Force, with no deformities. (c)  Investigation. The commissioner shall require an investigation of each applicant to determine that he or she is * * * of good moral character, between the ages of twenty-three (23) and thirty-two (32), that he or she has completed a high school education, and that he or she is honest, reliable, loyal and above reproach. (d)  Interview. The commissioner shall require an interview of each applicant considered for patrol service to be conducted and may require an interview with his family if necessary to determine that the applicant fulfills the requirements as prescribed in paragraph (c), as well as any other rules and regulations that may be prescribed.  The commissioner may at his discretion require the services of psychiatrists, doctors, police officers or other professional people in conducting such interviews. (2)  Before any person may be selected to attend a school or be appointed as a member of the Mississippi Highway Safety Patrol, the applicant must fulfill all the requirements as prescribed in this section and meet the standards prescribed in this section and meet the standards prescribed by the department, and may be required to submit to a polygraph examination in connection with the employment application. (3)  All applications, birth certificates, transcripts and other records submitted by an applicant shall become the property of the State of Mississippi and the Department of Public Safety, shall be held confidential and shall not be discoverable by judicial process.  Such records may be destroyed after five (5) years from the time of application. SECTION 17.  Section 45-4-9, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 45-4-9.  (1)  (a)  After January 1, 2000, no person shall be appointed or employed as a jail officer or a part-time jail officer unless that person has been certified as being qualified under subsection (3) of this section. (b)  No person who is required to be certified shall be appointed or employed as a jail officer by any sheriff or police department for a period to exceed two (2) years without being certified.  The prohibition against the appointment or employment of a jail officer for a period not to exceed two (2) years may not be nullified by terminating the appointment or employment of such a person before the expiration of the time period and then rehiring the person for another period. Any person who, due to illness or other events beyond his control, as may be determined by the Board on Jail Officer Standards and Training, does not attend the required school or training as scheduled, may serve with full pay and benefits in such a capacity until he can attend the required school or training. (c)  No person shall serve as a jail officer in any full-, part-time, reserve or auxiliary capacity during a period when that person's certification has been suspended, cancelled or recalled pursuant to this chapter. (2)  Jail officers serving under permanent appointment on January 1, 2000, shall not be required to meet certification requirements of this section as a condition of continued employment; nor shall failure of any such jail officer to fulfill such requirements make that person ineligible for any promotional examination for which that person is otherwise eligible.  If any jail officer certified under this chapter leaves his employment and does not become employed as a jail officer within two (2) years from the date of termination of his prior employment, he shall be required to comply with board policy as to rehiring standards in order to be employed as a jail officer. (3)  In addition to the other requirements of this section, the Board on Jail Officer Standards and Training, by rules and regulations consistent with other provisions of law, shall fix other qualifications for the employment of jail officers, including education, physical and mental standards, citizenship, * * *good moral character, experience and such other matters as relate to the competence and reliability of persons to assume and discharge the responsibilities of jail officers, and the board shall prescribe the means for presenting evidence of fulfillment of these requirements. Additionally, the board shall fix qualifications for the appointment or employment of part-time jail officers to essentially the same standards and requirements as jail officers.  The board shall develop and implement a part-time jail officer training program that meets the same performance objectives and has essentially the same or similar content as the programs approved by the board for full-time jail officers. (4)  (a)  The Board on Jail Officer Standards and Training shall issue a certificate evidencing satisfaction of the requirements of subsections (1) and (3) of this section to any applicant who presents such evidence as may be required by its rules and regulations of satisfactory completion of a program or course of instruction in another jurisdiction equivalent in content and quality to that required by the board for approved jail officer education and training programs in this state. (b)  The Board on Jail Officer Standards and Training shall issue a certificate to any person who successfully completes the Mississippi Department of Corrections' training program for correctional officers of regional jails. (c)  The Board on Jail Officer Standards and Training shall develop and train persons seeking certification as a correctional officer in the prevention of racial profiling.  The provisions of this paragraph shall apply to all recruits who begin training on or after January 1, 2005. (5)  Professional certificates remain the property of the board, and the board reserves the right to either reprimand the holder of a certificate, suspend a certificate upon conditions imposed by the board, or cancel and recall any certificate when: (a)  The certificate was issued by administrative error; (b)  The certificate was obtained through misrepresentation or fraud; * * *  (c)  The holder has been convicted of any crime involving moral turpitude; ( * * *dc)  The holder has been convicted of a * * *felony disqualifying crime as provided in the Fresh Start Act; or ( * * *ed)  Other due cause as determined by the board. (6)  When the board believes there is a reasonable basis for either the reprimand, suspension, cancellation of, or recalling the certification of a jail officer, notice and opportunity for a hearing shall be provided in accordance with law prior to such reprimand, suspension or revocation. (7)  Any jail officer aggrieved by the final findings and order of the board may file an appeal with the chancery court of the county in which the person is employed.  The appeal must be filed within thirty (30) days of the final order. (8)  Any jail officer whose certification has been cancelled may reapply for certification, but not sooner than two (2) years after the date on which the order canceling the certification becomes final. SECTION 18.  Section 45-6-11, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 45-6-11.  (1)  Law enforcement officers already serving under permanent appointment on July 1, 1981, and personnel of the Division of Community Services under Section 47-7-9 serving on July 1, 1994, shall not be required to meet any requirement of subsections (3) and (4) of this section as a condition of continued employment; nor shall failure of any such law enforcement officer to fulfill such requirements make that person ineligible for any promotional examination for which that person is otherwise eligible.  * * *Provided, However, if any law enforcement officer certified under the provisions of this chapter leaves his or her employment as such and does not become employed as a law enforcement officer within two (2) years from the date of termination of his or her prior employment, he or she shall be required to comply with board policy as to rehiring standards in order to be employed as a law enforcement officer; except, that, if any law enforcement officer certified under this chapter leaves his or her employment as such to serve as a sheriff, he or she may be employed as a law enforcement officer after he or she has completed his or her service as a sheriff without being required to comply with board policy as to rehiring standards.  Part-time law enforcement officers serving on or before July 1, 1998, shall have until July 1, 2001, to obtain certification as a part-time officer. (2)  (a)  Any person who has twenty (20) years of law enforcement experience and who is eligible to be certified under this section shall be eligible for recertification after leaving law enforcement on the same basis as someone who has taken the basic training course.  Application to the board to qualify under this paragraph shall be made no later than June 30, 1993. (b)  Any person who has twenty-five (25) years of law enforcement experience, whether as a part-time, full-time, reserve or auxiliary officer, and who has received certification as a part-time officer, may be certified as a law enforcement officer as defined in Section 45-6-3(c) without having to meet further requirements.  Application to the board to qualify under this paragraph shall be made no later than June 30, 2009. (3)  (a)  No person shall be appointed or employed as a law enforcement officer or a part-time law enforcement officer unless that person has been certified as being qualified under the provisions of subsection (4) of this section. (b)  No person shall be appointed or employed as a law enforcement trainee in a full-time capacity by any law enforcement unit for a period to exceed one (1) year.  No person shall be appointed or employed as a law enforcement trainee in a part-time, reserve or auxiliary capacity by any law enforcement unit for a period to exceed two (2) years.  The prohibition against the appointment or employment of a law enforcement trainee in a full-time capacity for a period not to exceed one (1) year or a part-time, reserve or auxiliary capacity for a period not to exceed two (2) years may not be nullified by terminating the appointment or employment of such a person before the expiration of the time period and then rehiring the person for another period.  Any person, who, due to illness or other events beyond his control, could not attend the required school or training as scheduled, may serve with full pay and benefits in such a capacity until he can attend the required school or training. (c)  No person shall serve as a law enforcement officer in any full-time, part-time, reserve or auxiliary capacity during a period when that person's certification has been suspended, cancelled or recalled pursuant to the provisions of this chapter. (4)  In addition to the requirements of subsections (3), (7) and (8) of this section, the board, by rules and regulations consistent with other provisions of law, shall fix other qualifications for the employment of law enforcement officers, including minimum age, education, physical and mental standards, citizenship, * * *good moral character, experience and such other matters as relate to the competence and reliability of persons to assume and discharge the responsibilities of law enforcement officers, and the board shall prescribe the means for presenting evidence of fulfillment of these requirements.  Additionally, the board shall fix qualifications for the appointment or employment of part-time law enforcement officers to essentially the same standards and requirements as law enforcement officers.  The board shall develop and implement a part-time law enforcement officer training program that meets the same performance objectives and has essentially the same or similar content as the programs approved by the board for full-time law enforcement officers and the board shall provide that such training shall be available locally and held at times convenient to the persons required to receive such training. (5)  Any elected sheriff, constable, deputy or chief of police may apply for certification.  Such certification shall be granted at the request of the elected official after providing evidence of satisfaction of the requirements of subsections (3) and (4) of this section.  Certification granted to such elected officials shall be granted under the same standards and conditions as established by law enforcement officers and shall be subject to recall as in subsection (7) of this section. (6)  The board shall issue a certificate evidencing satisfaction of the requirements of subsections (3) and (4) of this section to any applicant who presents such evidence as may be required by its rules and regulations of satisfactory completion of a program or course of instruction in another jurisdiction or military training equivalent in content and quality to that required by the board for approved law enforcement officer education and training programs in this state, and has satisfactorily passed any and all diagnostic testing and evaluation as required by the board to ensure competency. (7)  Professional certificates remain the property of the board, and the board reserves the right to either reprimand the holder of a certificate, suspend a certificate upon conditions imposed by the board, or cancel and recall any certificate when: (a)  The certificate was issued by administrative error; (b)  The certificate was obtained through misrepresentation or fraud; * * *  (c)  The holder has been convicted of any crime involving moral turpitude; ( * * *dc)  The holder has been convicted of a * * *felony disqualifying crime as provided in the Fresh Start Act; ( * * *ed)  The holder has committed an act of malfeasance or has been dismissed from his employing law enforcement agency; or ( * * *fe)  Other due cause as determined by the board. (8)  When the board believes there is a reasonable basis for either the reprimand, suspension, cancellation of, or recalling the certification of a law enforcement officer or a part-time law enforcement officer, notice and opportunity for a hearing shall be provided in accordance with law prior to such reprimand, suspension or revocation. (9)  Any full- or part-time law enforcement officer aggrieved by the findings and order of the board may file an appeal with the chancery court of the county in which such person is employed from the final order of the board.  Such appeals must be filed within thirty (30) days of the final order of the board. (10)  Any full- or part-time law enforcement officer whose certification has been cancelled pursuant to this chapter may reapply for certification, but not sooner than two (2) years after the date on which the order of the board cancelling such certification becomes final. (11)  (a)  Any full- or part-time law enforcement officer, who is certified as required by the provisions under this chapter, and such officer resigns from his or her law enforcement agency, then the agency that the officer has resigned from shall notify the board in writing and by email within seventy-two (72) hours of the officer's resignation. (b)  If any full- or part-time law enforcement officer is terminated or resigns due to disciplinary action, the law enforcement agency shall notify the board within seventy-two (72) hours of the termination or resignation, as the case may be, and the agency shall provide in writing and by email to the board, the explanation for the termination or resignation of the officer.  The required explanation of such termination or resignation shall be submitted, along with the required notification, within the same seventy-two (72) hour time frame as required under this subsection. (c)  If a law enforcement agency fails to adhere to the reporting requirements of this subsection, as determined by the board, then such agency, during the time of noncompliance: (i)  Shall not be eligible for state grants or other subsidiary funding provided by the state; and (ii)  Shall not receive reimbursement for continuing education requirements as provided under Section 45-6-19. (d)  When the board determines that a law enforcement agency failed to adhere to the reporting requirements of this subsection, notice and opportunity for a hearing shall be provided by the board in accordance with law prior to the failure of the reporting. (e)  Any law enforcement agency that is aggrieved by any order or ruling made under the provisions of this subsection has the same rights and procedure of appeal as from any other order or ruling of the board. (f)  The board is authorized to institute and promulgate all rules necessary for implementing the requirements set out under this subsection (11). SECTION 19.  Section 51-5-3, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 51-5-3.  In order to be licensed as a water well contractor in the State of Mississippi, the applicant must be qualified as set out below: (a)  Be at least twenty-one (21) years of age; * * *(b)  Be of good moral character; ( * * *cb)  Demonstrate to the satisfaction of the commission a reasonable knowledge of this chapter and the rules and regulations adopted by the commission under the provisions of this chapter; ( * * *dc)  Possess the necessary drilling equipment, or present to the commission sufficient evidence to show that he has access to the use of such equipment at any time he needs it; and ( * * *ed)  Have not less than three (3) years' experience in the work for which he is applying for a license. SECTION 20.  Section 51-9-173, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 51-9-173.  For purposes of this article, unless the context requires otherwise, the following terms shall have the meanings ascribed herein: (a) "District" means the Pearl River Valley Water Supply District. (b)  "Qualified person" means a person who: (i)  Has met all the educational and training requirements of a course of study prescribed and conducted by the Mississippi Law Enforcement Officers' Training Academy; and (ii)  * * *Is of good moral character and Has not been convicted of * * *any a disqualifying crime * * *involving moral turpitude as provided in the Fresh Start Act. SECTION 21.  Section 65-1-129, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 65-1-129.  For purposes of Sections 65-1-129 through 65-1-137, unless the context requires otherwise, the following terms shall have the meanings ascribed herein: (a)  "Highway Commission" means the Mississippi State Highway Commission. (b)  "Qualified person" means a person who: (i)  Has met all the educational and training requirements of a course of study prescribed and conducted by the Mississippi Law Enforcement Officers' Training Academy; and (ii)  * * *Is of good moral character and Has not been convicted of * * *any a disqualifying crime * * *involving moral turpitude as provided in the Fresh Start Act. SECTION 22.  Section 65-1-173, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 65-1-173.  For the purpose of enforcing and investigating all violations of the railroad laws, and the rules, regulations and general orders of the Mississippi Transportation Commission promulgated thereunder, the commission is * * *hereby authorized to employ five (5) inspectors and one (1) railway safety coordinator.  The salaries of the inspectors and the safety coordinator shall be fixed by the commission, subject to the state personnel system law as provided under Section 25-9-101 et seq.  The inspectors shall devote their full time to the performance of their duties and shall take an oath faithfully to perform the duties of their positions.  The commission shall require bonds to be carried on such employees as the commission may deem necessary, the cost thereof to be paid by the commission. The inspectors shall be selected after an examination, as prescribed by the commission, as to physical and mental fitness, knowledge of the railroad laws, the rules and regulations of the commission, the laws of this state pertaining to arrest and any other examination as may be prescribed by the commission.  An inspector, at the time of appointment, shall be a citizen of the State of Mississippi, * * *of good moral character, and shall not be less than twenty-one (21) years of age. The inspectors of the Mississippi Transportation Commission may enter upon private property upon which a railroad facility is located that is connected to but not a part of the general railroad system of transportation, at reasonable times and in a reasonable manner to perform an inspection, investigation or surveillance of facilities, equipment, records and operations relating to the packaging, loading or transportation of hazardous materials or other materials to determine whether the railroad facility complies with the applicable federal or state safety statutes, rules, regulations or orders.  Any inspection, investigation or surveillance performed on the site of a manufacturing facility shall be performed in compliance with the safety rules or regulations of the facility. SECTION 23.  Section 67-3-19, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 67-3-19.  Where application is made for a permit to engage in the business of a retailer of light wine, light spirit product or beer, the applicant shall show in his application that he possesses the following qualifications: (a)  Applicant must be a person at least twenty-one (21) years of age * * *, of good moral character and a resident of the State of Mississippi. (b)  Applicant shall not have been convicted of a * * *felony disqualifying crime as provided in the Fresh Start Act, or of pandering or of keeping or maintaining a house of prostitution, or have been convicted within two (2) years of the date of his application of any violation of the laws of this state or the laws of the United States relating to alcoholic liquor. (c)  Applicant shall not have had revoked, except for a violation of Section 67-3-52, within two (2) years next preceding his application, any license or permit issued to him pursuant to the laws of this state, or any other state, to sell alcoholic liquor of any kind. (d)  Applicant shall be the owner of the premises for which the permit is sought or the holder of an existing lease thereon. (e)  Applicant shall not be residentially domiciled with any person whose permit has been revoked for cause, except for a violation of Section 67-3-52, within two (2) years next preceding the date of the present application for a permit. (f)  The applicant has not had any license or permit to sell beer, light spirit product or light wine at retail revoked, within five (5) years next preceding his application, due to a violation of Section 67-3-52. (g)  Applicant shall not employ any person whose permit has been revoked when such person owned or operated the business on the premises for which a permit is sought or allow such person to have any financial interest in the business of the applicant, until such person is qualified to obtain a permit in his own name. (h)  The applicant is not indebted to the State of Mississippi for any taxes. (i)  If applicant is a partnership, all members of the partnership must be qualified to obtain a permit.  Each member of the partnership must be a resident of the State of Mississippi. (j)  If applicant is a corporation, all officers and directors thereof, and any stockholder owning more than five percent (5%) of the stock of such corporation, and the person or persons who shall conduct and manage the licensed premises for the corporation shall possess all the qualifications required herein for any individual permittee.  However, the requirements as to residence shall not apply to officers, directors and stockholders of such corporation. Any misstatement or concealment of fact in an application shall be grounds for denial of the application or for revocation of the permit issued thereon. The commissioner may refuse to issue a permit to an applicant for a place that is frequented by known criminals, prostitutes, or other law violators or troublemakers who disturb the peace and quietude of the community and frequently require the assistance of peace officers to apprehend such law violators or to restore order.  The burden of proof of establishing the foregoing shall rest upon the commissioner. SECTION 24.  Section 73-1-13, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 73-1-13.  (1)  The board shall adopt rules and regulations for the eligibility, examination and registration of applicants desiring to practice architecture in accordance with this chapter and may amend, modify or repeal such rules and regulations. The board shall receive applications for registration as an architect only on forms prescribed and furnished by the board and upon receipt of such application may approve such applicant, providing such applicant meets the following requirements: (a)  The applicant must have a professional degree in architecture from a school or college of architecture on the list of accredited schools of architecture issued by the National Architectural Accrediting Board; (b)  The applicant must have been enrolled for a minimum of one (1) year in, and have completed all requirements of, a practical work internship program patterned after the National Council of Architectural Registration Boards intern-architect development program that will be prepared, adopted and approved by the board and must have received from the board a certification by the board that the applicant has met or exceeded the work requirements of the board.  The internship work program shall include, but not be limited to, the following subjects: (i)  Design and construction documents; (ii)  Construction administration; (iii)  Office management; and (iv)  Related special activities. (c)  The applicant must have passed the applicable National Council of Architectural Registration Board's examination; (d)  The applicant must have satisfied the board as to the applicant's good standing in the profession * * * and his moral character.  Any of the following acts shall preclude an applicant's eligibility as a candidate for registration: (i)  Conviction by any court for commission of any * * * felony or any crime involving moral turpitude disqualifying crime as provided in the Fresh Start Act; (ii)  Conviction by any court of a misdemeanor involving fraud, deceit or misrepresentation; (iii)  Misstatement or misrepresentation of fact by the applicant in connection with the applicant's application for registration in this state or another jurisdiction; (iv)  Violation of any of the rules of conduct required of applicants or architects as adopted by board; (v)  Practicing architecture, or holding himself out as capable of practicing architecture, in this state in violation of the chapter. The board may admit an applicant otherwise precluded from consideration because of the prohibitions imposed in this paragraph (d) if the board determines that the applicant has shown clear and convincing evidence of rehabilitation and reform.  Such decision is in the sole discretion of the board and upon such terms, conditions and evidence as the board may require. Additionally, notwithstanding the provisions of paragraph (b) of this subsection, if the applicant can provide sufficient and satisfactory evidence that he is unable to obtain the intern-architect development program certification, the board may accept in lieu thereof certification by the applicant that he has completed not less than three (3) continuous years of actual engagement in architectural work in the office or offices of a licensed architect or architects.  Such certification shall be on such terms, conditions and requirements as the board may establish. (2)  The board may require that the applicant appear before the board for a personal interview. SECTION 25.  Section 73-2-7, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 73-2-7.  In order to qualify for a license as a landscape architect, an applicant must: (a)  Submit evidence of his * * *good moral character and integrity to the examining board. (b)  Have received a degree in landscape architecture from a college or university having a minimum four-year curriculum in landscape architecture approved by the board or have completed seven (7) years of work in the practice of landscape architecture of a grade and character suitable to the board.  Graduation in a curriculum other than landscape architecture from a college or university shall be equivalent to two (2) years' experience of the seven (7) specified above in this section, except that no applicant shall receive credit for more than two (2) years' experience for any scholastic training. (c)  Pass such written examination as required in Section 73-2-9. Each application or filing made under this section shall include the social security number(s) of the applicant in accordance with Section 93-11-64, Mississippi Code of 1972. SECTION 26.  Section 73-2-16, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 73-2-16.  (1)  The board shall also have the power to revoke, suspend or annul the certificate or registration of a landscape architect or reprimand, censure or otherwise discipline a landscape architect. (2)  The board, upon satisfactory proof and in accordance with the provisions of this chapter, may take the disciplinary actions against any registered landscape architect for any of the following reasons: (a)  Violating any of the provisions of Sections 73-2-1 through 73-2-21 or the implementing bylaws, rules, regulations or standards of ethics or conduct duly adopted and promulgated by the board pertaining to the practice of landscape architecture; (b)  Fraud, deceit or misrepresentation in obtaining a certificate of registration; (c)  Gross negligence, malpractice, incompetency or misconduct in the practice of landscape architecture; (d)  Any professional misconduct, as defined by the board through bylaws, rules and regulations and standards of conduct and ethics (professional misconduct shall not be defined to include bidding on contracts for a price); (e)  Practicing or offering to practice landscape architecture on an expired license or while under suspension or revocation of a license unless said suspension or revocation be abated through probation; (f)  Practicing landscape architecture under an assumed or fictitious name; (g)  Being convicted by any court of a * * *felony, except conviction of culpable negligent manslaughter, disqualifying crime as provided in the Fresh Start Act, in which case the record of conviction shall be conclusive evidence; (h)  Willfully misleading or defrauding any person employing him as a landscape architect by any artifice or false statement; (i)  Having undisclosed financial or personal interest which compromises his obligation to his client; (j)  Obtaining a certificate by fraud or deceit; or (k)  Violating any of the provisions of this chapter. (3)  Any person may prefer charges against any other person for committing any of the acts set forth in subsection (2).  Such charges need not be sworn to, may be made upon actual knowledge, or upon information and belief, and shall be filed with the board. In the event any person licensed under Sections 73-2-1 through 73-2-21 is expelled from membership in any Mississippi or national professional landscape architectural society or association, the board shall thereafter cite said person to appear at a hearing before the board and to show cause why disciplinary action should not be taken against that person. The board shall investigate all charges filed with it and, upon finding reasonable cause to believe that the charges are not frivolous, unfounded or filed in bad faith, may, in its discretion, cause a hearing to be held, at a time and place fixed by the board, regarding the charges and may compel the accused by subpoena to appear before the board to respond to said charges. No disciplinary action taken hereunder may be taken until the accused has been furnished both a statement of the charges against him and notice of the time and place of the hearing thereof, which shall be personally served on the accused or mailed by registered or certified mail, return receipt requested, to the last known business or residence address of the accused not less than thirty (30) days prior to the date fixed for the hearing. (4)  At any hearing held under the provisions of this section, the board shall have the power to subpoena witnesses and compel their attendance and require the production of any books, papers or documents.  The hearing shall be conducted before the full board with the president of the board serving as the presiding judge.  Counsel for the board shall present all evidence relating to the charges.  All evidence shall be presented under oath, which may be administered by any member of the board, and thereafter the proceedings may, if necessary, be transcribed in full by the court reporter and filed as part of the record in the case.  Copies of such transcription may be provided to any party to the proceedings at a cost to be fixed by the board. All witnesses who shall be subpoenaed and who shall appear in any proceedings before the board shall receive the same fees and mileage as allowed by law in judicial civil proceedings, and all such fees shall be taxed as part of the costs of the case. Where in any proceedings before the board any witness shall fail or refuse to attend upon subpoena issued by the board, shall refuse to testify or shall refuse to produce any books and papers, the production of which is called for by the subpoena, the attendance of such witness and the giving of his testimony and the production of the books and papers shall be enforced by any court of competent jurisdiction of this state in the manner provided for the enforcement of attendance and testimony of witnesses in civil cases in the courts of this state. The accused shall have the right to be present at the hearing in person, by counsel or other representative, or both.  The accused shall have the right to present evidence and to examine and cross-examine all witnesses.  The board is authorized to continue or recess the hearing as may be necessary. (5)  At the conclusion of the hearing, the board may either decide the issue at that time or take the case under advisement for further deliberation.  The board shall render its decision not more than forty-five (45) days after the close of the hearing, and shall forward to the last known business or residence address of the accused by certified or registered mail, return receipt requested, a written statement of the decision of the board. If a majority of the board finds the accused guilty of the charges filed, the board may:  (a) issue a public or private reprimand; (b) suspend or revoke the license of the accused, if the accused is a registrant; or (c) in lieu of or in addition to such reprimand, suspension or revocation, assess and levy upon the guilty party a monetary penalty of not less than One Hundred Dollars ($100.00) nor more than Five Thousand Dollars ($5,000.00) for each violation. (6)  A monetary penalty assessed and levied under this section shall be paid to the board upon the expiration of the period allowed for appeal of such penalties under this section, or may be paid sooner if the guilty party elects.  Money collected by the board under this section shall be deposited to the credit of the board's general operating fund. When payment of a monetary penalty assessed and levied by the board in accordance with this section is not paid when due, the board shall have the power to institute and maintain proceedings in its name for enforcement of payment in the chancery court of the county and judicial district of the residence of the guilty party and if the guilty party be a nonresident of the State of Mississippi, such proceedings shall be in the Chancery Court of the First Judicial District of Hinds County, Mississippi. (7)  When the board has taken a disciplinary action under this section, the board may, in its discretion, stay such action and place the guilty party on probation for a period not to exceed one (1) year upon the condition that the guilty party shall not further violate either the law of the State of Mississippi pertaining to the practice of landscape architecture or the bylaws, rules and regulations, or standards of conduct and ethics promulgated by the board. (8)  The board, in its discretion, may assess and tax any part or all of the costs of any disciplinary proceedings conducted under this section against the accused, if the accused is found guilty of the charges. (9)  The power and authority of the board to assess and levy the monetary penalties provided for in this section shall not be affected or diminished by any other proceeding, civil or criminal, concerning the same violation or violations except as provided in this section. (10)  The board, for sufficient cause, may reissue a revoked license of registration whenever a majority of the board members vote to do so but in no event shall a revoked license be issued within two (2) years of the revocation.  A new license of registration required to replace a revoked, lost, mutilated or destroyed license may be issued, subject to the rules of the board, for a charge not to exceed Twenty-five Dollars ($25.00). (11)  The board may direct the advisory committee to review and investigate any charges brought against any landscape architect under this chapter and to hold the hearings provided for in this section and to make findings of fact and recommendations to the board concerning the disposition of such charges. (12)  Nothing herein contained shall preclude the board or advisory committee from initiating proceedings in any case.  The advisory committee shall furnish legal advice and assistance to the board whenever such service is requested. (13)  In addition to the reasons specified in subsection (2) of this section, the board shall be authorized to suspend the license of any licensee for being out of compliance with an order for support, as defined in Section 93-11-153.  The procedure for suspension of a license for being out of compliance with an order for support, and the procedure for the reissuance or reinstatement of a license suspended for that purpose, and the payment of any fees for the reissuance or reinstatement of a license suspended for that purpose, shall be governed by Section 93-11-157 or 93-11-163, as the case may be.  If there is any conflict between any provision of Section 93-11-157 or 93-11-163 and any provision of this chapter, the provisions of Section 93-11-157 or 93-11-163, as the case may be, shall control. SECTION 27.  Section 73-4-17, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 73-4-17.  There shall be two (2) classes of auctioneers' licenses, which shall be auctioneer and auction firm.  All applicants for a license under this chapter shall possess the following minimum qualifications: (a)  Applicants shall have attained the age of eighteen (18) years by the issuance date of the license. (b)  Applicants shall have obtained at a minimum a high school diploma or G.E.D. equivalent and shall be graduates of an auctioneering school approved by the commission. (c)  Each applicant for a license under this chapter shall demonstrate to the commission that he is * * *of good moral character and worthy of public trust through background information to be provided on his application form and two (2) letters of reference from persons not related to the applicant who have known the applicant at least three (3) years.  The commission may require additional information or a personal interview with the applicant to determine if such applicant should be granted a license. (d)  Each applicant for a license under this chapter shall take and successfully complete an examination as prescribed by the commission.  The examination shall include questions on ethics, reading comprehension, writing, spelling, elementary arithmetic, elementary principals of land economics, general knowledge of bulk sales law, contracts of sale, agency, leases, brokerage, knowledge of various goods commonly sold at auction, ability to call bids, knowledge of sale preparation and proper sale advertising and sale summary, and knowledge of the provisions of this chapter and the commission's rules and regulations.  There shall be separate examinations for auctioneer and auction firm each based upon relevant subject matter appropriate to the license classification as set forth herein.  Examinations shall be administered at least once a year and may be administered quarterly at the commission's discretion provided there are at least twenty-five (25) examinees.  The commission shall ensure that the various forms of the test remain secure. (e)  In order to defray the cost of administration of the examinations, applicants for the examination shall pay fees as follows: (i)  Auctioneer.......................... $100.00. (ii)  Auction firm....................... $100.00. (f)  Each applicant desiring to sit for the examination for any license required under this chapter shall be required to furnish to the commission at least thirty (30) days prior to the examination evidence of a surety bond in the following minimum amounts: (i)  Auctioneer....................... $10,000.00. (ii)  Auction firm.................... $10,000.00. (g)  In addition to the bond required herein, applicants for the auction firm license shall furnish the commission with all relevant information concerning the premises to be licensed, to include location, whether the premises are owned or leased, and an affidavit that the proposed use of the premises as an auction firm does not violate zoning or any other use restrictions.  A separate license shall be required for each business location of the owner of multiple auction galleries. (h)  Except as provided in Section 33-1-39, all licenses granted pursuant to this chapter shall be for a term of two (2) years and shall expire on the first day of March at the end of such two-year term.  The biennial license fees shall be set from time to time by the commission with a maximum fee of Two Hundred Dollars ($200.00). License fees shall not be prorated for any portion of a year but shall be paid for the entire biennial period regardless of the date of the application. Individuals failing to submit license renewal fees on or before March 1 of the year for renewal shall be required to successfully pass the next administration of the examination in order to renew a license. (i)  Each application or filing made under this section shall include the social security number(s) of the applicant in accordance with Section 93-11-64, Mississippi Code of 1972. (j)  A licensee shall keep such books, accounts and records as will enable the commission to determine whether such licensee is in compliance with the provisions of this chapter, and rules and regulations made pursuant thereto, and any other law, rule and regulation applicable to the conduct of such business.  The commission and its employees or representatives shall have the right to enter and make inspections of any place where the auction business is carried on and inspect and copy any record pertaining to the auction business under this chapter.  The commission may conduct or cause to be conducted an examination or audit of the books and records of any licensee at any time the commission deems proper, the cost of the examination or audit to be borne by the licensee.  The refusal of access to the books and records shall be cause for the revocation of its license. SECTION 28.  Section 73-4-25, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 73-4-25.  (1)  The commission may refuse to issue or renew a license, place a licensee on probation or administrative supervision, suspend or revoke any license, or may reprimand or take any other action in relation to a license, including the imposition of a fine not to exceed Five Thousand Dollars ($5,000.00) for each violation upon a licensee, or applicant for licensure, under this chapter for any of the following reasons: (a)  Knowingly filing or causing to be filed a false application. (b)  Failure to enter into a written contract with a seller or consignor prior to placing or permitting advertising for an auction sale to be placed. (c)  Failure by the licensee to give the seller or consignor a signed receipt for items received for sale at auction, either by item or lot number at the time the goods are received, unless the goods are to remain in the possession of the seller or consignor. (d)  Failure to give the seller or consignor a statement or lot description, selling price, purchaser's identity and the net proceeds due to the seller or consignor. (e)  Failure to place funds received from an auction sale in an escrow or trust account, and failure to make timely settlement on escrowed funds.  Absent a written agreement to the contrary, five (5) business days shall be deemed timely for settlement on personal property. (f)  Permitting an unlicensed auctioneer to call for bids in an auction sale. (g)  Having been convicted of or pled guilty to a * * *felony disqualifying crime as provided in the Fresh Start Act in the courts of this state or any other state, territory or country.  Conviction, as used in this paragraph, shall include a deferred conviction, deferred prosecution, deferred sentence, finding or verdict of guilt, an admission of guilt or a plea of nolo contendere. (h)  Any course of intentional, willful or wanton conduct by a licensee or such licensee's employees which misleads or creates a false impression among the seller, buyer, bidders and the auctioneer in the advertising, conducting and closing of an auction sale. (i)  A continued and flagrant course of misrepresentation or making false promises, either by the licensee, an employee of the licensee, or by someone acting on behalf of and with the licensee's consent. (j)  Any failure to account for or to pay over within a reasonable time funds belonging to another which have come into the licensee's possession through an auction sale. (k)  Any false, misleading or untruthful advertising. (l)  Any act of conduct in connection with a sales transaction which demonstrates bad faith or dishonesty. (m)  Knowingly using false bidders, cappers or pullers, or knowingly making a material false statement or representation. (n)  Commingling the funds or property of a client with the licensee's own or failing to maintain and deposit in a trust or escrow account in an insured bank or savings and loan association located in Mississippi funds received for another person through sale at auction. (o)  Failure to give full cooperation to the commission and/or its designees, agents or other representatives in the performance of official duties of the commission.  Such failure to cooperate includes, but is not limited to: (i)  Failure to properly make any disclosures or to provide documents or information required by this chapter or by the commission; (ii)  Not furnishing, in writing, a full and complete explanation covering the matter contained in a complaint filed with the commission; (iii)  Failure, without good cause, to cooperate with any request by the board to appear before it; (iv)  Not providing access, as directed by the commission, for its authorized agents or representatives seeking to perform reviews, audits or inspections at facilities or places utilized by the license holder in the auction business; (v)  Failure to provide information within the specified time allotted and as required by the board and/or its representatives or designees; (vi)  Failure to cooperate with the board or its designees or representatives in the investigation of any alleged misconduct or willfully interfering with a board investigation. (p)  A demonstrated lack of financial responsibility. (q)  Having had a license for the practice of auctioneering or the auction business suspended or revoked in any jurisdiction, having voluntarily surrendered a license in any jurisdiction, having been placed on probation in any jurisdiction, having been placed under disciplinary order(s) or other restriction in any manner for auctioneering or the auction business (a certified copy of the order of suspension, revocation, probation or disciplinary action shall be prima facie evidence of such action). (r)  Any violation of this chapter or any violation of a rule or regulation duly adopted by the commission. (2)  In addition to the acts specified in subsection (1) of this section, the commission shall be authorized to suspend the license of any licensee for being out of compliance with an order for support, as defined in Section 93-11-153.  The procedure for suspension of a license for being out of compliance with an order for support, and the procedure for the reissuance or reinstatement of a license suspended for that purpose, and the payment of any fees for the reissuance or reinstatement of a license suspended for that purpose, shall be governed by Section 93-11-157 or 93-11-163.  If there is any conflict between any provision of Section 93-11-157 or 93-11-163 and any provision of this chapter, the provisions of Section 93-11-157 or 93-11-163, as the case may be, shall control. SECTION 29.  Section 73-6-13, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 73-6-13.  (1)  Any adult * * *of good moral character who has (a) graduated from a school or college of chiropractic recognized by the State Board of Chiropractic Examiners, preceded by the successful completion of at least two (2) academic years at an accredited institution of higher learning, or accredited junior college, and (b) successfully completed parts 1, 2, 3 and 4 and the physical modality section of the examination prepared by the National Board of Chiropractic Examiners, shall be entitled to take the examination for a license to practice chiropractic in Mississippi.  The State Board of Chiropractic Examiners shall keep on file a list of schools or colleges of chiropractic which are so recognized.  No chiropractic school shall be approved unless it is recognized and approved by the Council on Chiropractic Education, its successor or an equivalent accrediting agency, offers an accredited course of study of not less than four (4) academic years of at least nine (9) months in length, and requires its graduates to receive not less than forty (40) clock hours of instruction in the operation of x-ray machinery and not less than forty (40) clock hours of instruction in x-ray interpretation and diagnosis. (2)  Except as otherwise provided in this section, the State Board of Health shall prescribe rules and regulations for the operation and use of x-ray machines. (3)  The examination to practice chiropractic used by the board shall consist of testing on the statutes and the rules and regulations regarding the practice of chiropractic in the State of Mississippi. (4)  Reciprocity privileges for a chiropractor from another state shall be granted at the board's option on an individual basis and by a majority vote of the State Board of Chiropractic Examiners to an adult * * * of good moral character who (a) is currently an active competent practitioner for at least eight (8) years and holds an active chiropractic license in another state with no disciplinary proceeding or unresolved complaint pending anywhere at the time a license is to be issued by this state, (b) demonstrates having obtained licensure as a chiropractor in another state under the same education requirements which were equivalent to the education requirements in this state to obtain a chiropractic license at the time the applicant obtained the license in the other state, (c) satisfactorily passes the examination administered by the State Board of Chiropractic Examiners, and (d) meets the requirements of Section 73-6-1(3) pertaining to therapeutic modalities.  The issuance of a license by reciprocity to a military-trained applicant, military spouse or person who establishes residence in this state shall be subject to the provisions of Section 73-50-1 or 73-50-2, as applicable. SECTION 30.  Section 73-6-19, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 73-6-19.  (1)  The board shall refuse to grant a certificate of licensure to any applicant or may cancel, revoke or suspend the certificate upon the finding of any of the following facts regarding the applicant or licensed practitioner: (a)  Failure to comply with the rules and regulations adopted by the State Board of Chiropractic Examiners; (b)  Violation of any of the provisions of this chapter or any of the rules and regulations of the State Board of Health pursuant to this chapter with regard to the operation and use of x-rays; (c)  Fraud or deceit in obtaining a license; (d)  Addiction to the use of alcohol, narcotic drugs, or anything which would seriously interfere with the competent performance of his professional duties; (e)  Conviction by a court of competent jurisdiction of a * * *felony, other than manslaughter or any violation of the United States Internal Revenue Code disqualifying crime as provided in the Fresh Start Act; (f)  Unprofessional and unethical conduct; (g)  Contraction of a contagious disease which may be carried for a prolonged period; (h)  Failure to report to the Mississippi Department of Human Services or the county attorney any case wherein there are reasonable grounds to believe that a child or vulnerable adult has been abused by its parent or person responsible for such person's welfare; (i)  Advising a patient to use drugs, prescribing or providing drugs for a patient, or advising a patient not to use a drug prescribed by a licensed physician or dentist; (j)  Professional incompetency in the practice of chiropractic; (k)  Having disciplinary action taken by his peers within any professional chiropractic association or society; (l)  Offering to accept or accepting payment for services rendered by assignment from any third-party payor after offering to accept or accepting whatever the third-party payor covers as payment in full, if the effect of the offering or acceptance is to eliminate or give the impression of eliminating the need for payment by an insured of any required deductions applicable in the policy of the insured; (m)  Associating his practice with any chiropractor who does not hold a valid chiropractic license in Mississippi, or teach chiropractic manipulation to nonqualified persons under Section 73-6-13; (n)  Failure to make payment on chiropractic student loans; (o)  Failure to follow record-keeping requirements prescribed in Section 73-6-18; (p)  If the practitioner is certified to provide animal chiropractic treatment, failure to follow guidelines approved by the Mississippi Board of Veterinary Medicine; or (q)  Violation(s) of the provisions of Sections 41-121-1 through 41-121-9 relating to deceptive advertisement by health care practitioners. (2)  Any holder of such certificate or any applicant therefor against whom is preferred any of the designated charges shall be furnished a copy of the complaint and shall receive a formal hearing in Jackson, Mississippi, before the board, at which time he may be represented by counsel and examine witnesses.  The board is authorized to administer oaths as may be necessary for the proper conduct of any such hearing.  In addition, the board is authorized and empowered to issue subpoenas for the attendance of witnesses and the production of books and papers.  The process issued by the board shall extend to all parts of the state.  Where in any proceeding before the board any witness shall fail or refuse to attend upon subpoena issued by the board, shall refuse to testify, or shall refuse to produce any books and papers, the production of which is called for by the subpoena, the attendance of such witness and the giving of his testimony and the production of the books and papers shall be enforced by any court of competent jurisdiction of this state in the manner provided for the enforcement of attendance and testimony of witnesses in civil cases in the courts of this state. (3)  In addition to any other investigators the board employs, the board shall appoint one or more licensed chiropractors to act for the board in investigating the conduct relating to the competency of a chiropractor, whenever disciplinary action is being considered for professional incompetence and unprofessional conduct. (4)  Whenever the board finds any person unqualified to practice chiropractic because of any of the grounds set forth in subsection (1) of this section, after a hearing has been conducted as prescribed by this section, the board may enter an order imposing one or more of the following: (a)  Deny his application for a license or other authorization to practice chiropractic; (b)  Administer a public or private reprimand; (c)  Suspend, limit or restrict his license or other authorization to practice chiropractic for up to five (5) years; (d)  Revoke or cancel his license or other authorization to practice chiropractic; (e)  Require him to submit to care, counseling or treatment by physicians or chiropractors designated by the board, as a condition for initial, continued or renewal of licensure or other authorization to practice chiropractic; (f)  Require him to participate in a program of education prescribed by the board; or (g)  Require him to practice under the direction of a chiropractor designated by the board for a specified period of time. (5)  Any person whose application for a license or whose license to practice chiropractic has been cancelled, revoked or suspended by the board within thirty (30) days from the date of such final decision shall have the right of a de novo appeal to the circuit court of his county of residence or the Circuit Court of the First Judicial District of Hinds County, Mississippi.  If there is an appeal, such appeal may, in the discretion of and on motion to the circuit court, act as a supersedeas.  The circuit court shall dispose of the appeal and enter its decision promptly. The hearing on the appeal may, in the discretion of the circuit judge, be tried in vacation.  Either party shall have the right of appeal to the Supreme Court as provided by law from any decision of the circuit court. (6)  In a proceeding conducted under this section by the board for the revocation, suspension or cancellation of a license to practice chiropractic, after a hearing has been conducted as prescribed by this section, the board shall have the power and authority for the grounds stated in subsection (1) of this section, with the exception of paragraph (c) thereof, to assess and levy upon any person licensed to practice chiropractic in the state a monetary penalty in lieu of such revocation, suspension or cancellation, as follows: (a)  For the first violation, a monetary penalty of not less than Five Hundred Dollars ($500.00) nor more than One Thousand Dollars ($1,000.00) for each violation. (b)  For the second and each subsequent violation, a monetary penalty of not less than One Thousand Dollars ($1,000.00) nor more than Two Thousand Five Hundred Dollars ($2,500.00) for each violation. The power and authority of the board to assess and levy such monetary penalties under this section shall not be affected or diminished by any other proceeding, civil or criminal, concerning the same violation or violations.  A licensee shall have the right of appeal from the assessment and levy of a monetary penalty as provided in this section to the circuit court under the same conditions as a right of appeal is provided for in this section for appeals from an adverse ruling, or order, or decision of the board.  Any monetary penalty assessed and levied under this section shall not take effect until after the time for appeal has expired, and an appeal of the assessment and levy of such a monetary penalty shall act as a supersedeas. (7)  In addition to the grounds specified in subsection (1) of this section, the board shall be authorized to suspend the license of any licensee for being out of compliance with an order for support, as defined in Section 93-11-153.  The procedure for suspension of a license for being out of compliance with an order for support, and the procedure for the reissuance or reinstatement of a license suspended for that purpose, and the payment of any fees for the reissuance or reinstatement of a license suspended for that purpose, shall be governed by Section 93-11-157 or 93-11-163, as the case may be.  Actions taken by the board in suspending a license when required by Section 93-11-157 or 93-11-163 are not actions from which an appeal may be taken under this section.  Any appeal of a license suspension that is required by Section 93-11-157 or 93-11-163 shall be taken in accordance with the appeal procedure specified in Section 93-11-157 or 93-11-163, as the case may be, rather than the procedure specified in this section.  If there is any conflict between any provision of Section 93-11-157 or 93-11-163 and any provision of this chapter, the provisions of Section 93-11-157 or 93-11-163, as the case may be, shall control. SECTION 31.  Section 73-7-27, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 73-7-27.  (1)  Any complaint may be filed with the board by a member or agent of the board or by any person charging any licensee of the board with the commission of any of the offenses enumerated in subsection (2) of this section.  Such complaint shall be in writing, signed by the accuser or accusers, and verified under oath, and such complaints shall be investigated as set forth in Section 73-7-7.  After the investigation, the board may dismiss the complaint if the board, through its administrative review agents, determines that there is not substantial justification to believe that the accused licensee has committed any of the offenses enumerated or, the board may prepare a formal complaint proceeding against the licensee as hereinafter provided.  When used with reference to any complaint filed against a licensee herein, the term "not substantial justification" means a complaint that is frivolous, groundless in fact or law, or vexatious, as determined by unanimous vote of the board.  In the event of a dismissal, the person filing the accusation and the accused licensee shall be given written notice of the board's determination.  If the board determines there is reasonable cause to believe the accused has committed any of those offenses, the secretary of the board or the executive director shall give written notice of such determination to the accused licensee and set a day for a hearing as provided in subsection (3) of this section. (2)  The board shall have the power to revoke, suspend or refuse to issue or renew any license or certificate provided for in this chapter, and to fine, place on probation and/or otherwise discipline an applicant, student, licensee or holder of a certificate, upon proof that such person:  (a) has not complied with or has violated any of the rules and regulations promulgated by the board; (b) has not complied with an order, decision, or ruling of the board; (c) has committed fraud or dishonest conduct in the taking of the examination herein provided for; (d) has been convicted of a * * *felony disqualifying crime as provided in the Fresh Start Act; (e) has committed grossly unprofessional or dishonest conduct; (f) is addicted to the excessive use of intoxicating liquors or to the use of drugs to such an extent as to render him or her unfit to practice in any of the practices or occupations set forth in this chapter; (g) has advertised by means of knowingly false or deceptive statements; (h) has failed to display the license or certificate issued to him or her as provided for in this chapter; or (i) has been convicted of violating any of the provisions of this chapter.  A conviction of violating any of the provisions of this chapter shall be grounds for automatic suspension of the license or certificate of such person. (3)  (a)  The board shall not revoke, suspend or refuse to issue or renew any license or certificate, or fine, place on probation or otherwise discipline any applicant, licensee or holder of a certificate in a disciplinary matter except after a hearing of which the applicant or licensee or holder of the certificate affected shall be given at least twenty (20) days' notice in writing, specifying the reason or reasons for denying the applicant a license or certificate of registration, or in the case of any other disciplinary action, the offense or offenses of which the licensee or holder of a certificate of registration is charged.  Such notice may be served by mailing a copy thereof by United States first-class certified mail, postage prepaid, to the last-known residence or business address of such applicant, licensee or holder of a certificate.  The hearing on such charges shall be at such time and place as the board may prescribe.  The provisions of this paragraph (a) shall not apply to the board's collection of a civil penalty or fine imposed by the board under paragraph (b) of this subsection. (b)  Any civil penalty or fine imposed by the board under this chapter resulting from an inspection or audit shall become due and payable when the applicant, licensee or holder of a certificate incurring the penalty receives a notice in writing from the board of the penalty.  The notice shall be sent by registered or certified mail or by personal service.  The person to whom the notice is addressed shall have thirty (30) days from the date of the notice in which to make written application for a hearing.  Any person who makes the application for a hearing shall be entitled to a hearing.  The hearing shall be conducted as a contested case hearing.  When an order assessing a civil penalty under this section becomes final by operation of law or on appeal, unless the amount of penalty is paid within thirty (30) days after the order becomes final, it may be recorded with the circuit clerk in any county of this state.  The clerk shall then record the name of the person incurring the penalty and the amount of the penalty in his lien record book. (c)  The board may temporarily suspend a license under this chapter without any hearing, simultaneously with the institution of proceedings under this section, if it finds that the evidence in support of the board's determination is clear, competent and unequivocal that the licensee's continuation in practice would constitute an imminent danger to public health and safety. (4)  At such hearings, all witnesses shall be sworn by a court reporter, and stenographic notes of the proceedings shall be taken.  Any party to the proceedings, at the request of such party, shall be furnished with a copy of such stenographic notes upon payment to the board of such fees as it shall prescribe, not exceeding, however, the actual costs of transcription. (5)  The board is authorized and empowered to issue subpoenas for the attendance of witnesses and the production of books and papers.  The process issued by the board shall extend to all parts of the state and such process shall be served by any person designated by the board for such service.  The person serving such process shall receive such compensation as may be allowed by the board, not to exceed the fee prescribed by law for similar services.  All witnesses who shall be subpoenaed, and who shall appear in any proceedings before the board, shall receive the same fees and mileage as allowed by law. (6)  Where in any proceeding before the board any witness shall fail or refuse to attend upon subpoena issued by the board, shall refuse to testify, or shall refuse to produce any books and papers, the production of which is called for by the subpoena, the attendance of such witness and the giving of his testimony and the production of the books and papers shall be enforced by any court of competent jurisdiction of this state, in the same manner as are enforced for the attendance and testimony of witnesses in civil cases in the courts of this state. (7)  The board shall conduct the hearing in an orderly and continuous manner, granting continuances only when the ends of justice may be served.  The board shall, within sixty (60) days after conclusion of the hearing, reduce its decision to writing and forward an attested true copy thereof to the last-known residence or business address of such applicant, licensee or holder of a certificate, by way of United States first-class certified mail, postage prepaid. (8)  Any and all parties to the hearing shall have the right of appeal from an adverse ruling, or order, or decision of the board to the Chancery Court of the First Judicial District of Hinds County, Mississippi, upon forwarding notice of appeal to the board within thirty (30) days after the decision of the board is mailed in the manner here contemplated.  The appellant shall, together with the notice of appeal, first pay the costs for the transcription of the record of the hearing(s) and proceeding(s) before the board in which the adverse ruling, order or decision of the board was made.  Any fine imposed by the board under the provisions of this chapter shall not take effect until after the time for appeal has expired, and an appeal of the imposition of such a fine shall act as a supersedeas bond.  The appeal shall thereupon be heard in due course by the court, which shall review the record and make its determination thereon. (9)  The board, in its discretion, may assess and charge any part or all of the costs of any disciplinary proceedings conducted under this section against the accused if the accused is found guilty of the charges. (10)  Any fine imposed by the board upon a licensee or holder of a certificate shall be in accordance with the following class designation of fines: (a)  Class A - No violations or the violations are minor health and safety violations that are detrimental to public safety and welfare.  Violations under this class shall be set at no less than Fifty Dollars ($50.00) but no more than Two Hundred Dollars ($200.00); (b)  Class B - Class B violations are major health and safety concerns that are detrimental to public safety and welfare and shall be set at no less than Two Hundred Fifty Dollars ($250.00) but no more than Seven Hundred Fifty Dollars ($750.00); (c)  Class C - Class C violations shall be set at no less than Eight Hundred Dollars ($800.00) but no more than One Thousand Dollars ($1,000.00) and are violations specific to the following: (i)  Unlicensed practice or the use of fraudulent statements to obtain any benefits or privileges under this chapter or practicing one (1) of the professions regulated by the board without a license.  These violations will be handled in accordance with the requirements of Section 73-7-27 or Section 73-7-37 when applicable; and (ii)  Extremely dangerous to the health and safety of the public. The power and authority of the board to impose such fines under this section shall not be affected or diminished by any other proceeding, civil or criminal, concerning the same violation or violations. (11)  In addition to the reasons specified in subsection (2) of this section, the board shall be authorized to suspend the license of any licensee for being out of compliance with an order for support, as defined in Section 93-11-153.  The procedure for suspension of a license for being out of compliance with an order for support, and the procedure for the reissuance or reinstatement of a license suspended for that purpose, and the payment of any fees for the reissuance or reinstatement of a license suspended for that purpose, shall be governed by Section 93-11-157 or 93-11-163, as the case may be.  Actions taken by the board in suspending a license when required by Section 93-11-157 or 93-11-163 are not actions from which an appeal may be taken under this section.  Any appeal of a license suspension that is required by Section 93-11-157 or 93-11-163 shall be taken in accordance with the appeal procedure specified in Section 93-11-157 or 93-11-163, as the case may be, rather than the procedure specified in this section.  If there is any conflict between any provision of Section 93-11-157 or 93-11-163 and any provision of this chapter, the provisions of Section 93-11-157 or 93-11-163, as the case may be, shall control. SECTION 32.  Section 73-9-23, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 73-9-23.  (1)  No person who desires to practice dentistry or dental hygiene in the State of Mississippi shall be licensed until that person has passed an examination by the board. Applicants for examination shall apply in writing to the board for an examination at least thirty (30) days before the examination and shall upon application pay a nonrefundable fee as elsewhere provided in this chapter. (2)  An applicant for licensure by examination as a dentist who is a graduate of a dental school accredited by the Commission on Dental Accreditation of the American Dental Association (ADA), or its successor commission, shall: (a)  Be * * *of good moral character, be possessed of a high school education, and have attained the age of twenty-one (21) years; (b)  Exhibit with the application a diploma or certificate of graduation from the ADA accredited dental school; and (c)  Have successfully completed Parts I and II of the National Board Examinations of the Joint Commission on National Dental Examinations, or its successor commission, unless the applicant graduated from an accredited dental school before 1960. (3)  An applicant for licensure by examination as a dentist who is a graduate of a non-ADA accredited foreign country dental school shall: (a)  * * *Be of good moral character and Have attained the age of twenty-one (21) years; (b)  Be proficient in oral and written communications in the English language; (c)  Have completed not less than six (6) academic years of postsecondary study and graduated from a foreign dental school that is recognized by the licensure authorities in that country; (d)  Have been licensed as a dentist or admitted to the practice of dentistry in the foreign country in which the applicant received foreign dental school training; (e)  Present documentation of having completed at least two (2) or more years of full-time postdoctoral dental education in a dental school accredited by the Commission on Dental Accreditation of the American Dental Association, or its successor commission, and has been certified by the dean of the accredited dental school as having achieved the same level of didactic and clinical competence as expected of a graduate of the school; and (f)  Have successfully completed Parts I and II of the National Board Examinations of the Joint Commission on National Dental Examinations, or its successor commission, unless the applicant graduated from an approved dental school before 1960. (4)  An applicant for licensure by examination as a dental hygienist who is a graduate of a dental hygiene school accredited by the Commission on Dental Accreditation of the American Dental Association (ADA), or its successor commission, shall: (a)  Be * * *of good moral character, be possessed of a high school education and have attained the age of eighteen (18) years; (b)  Exhibit with the application a diploma or certificate of graduation from the ADA accredited dental hygiene school; and (c)  Have successfully completed the National Board Dental Hygiene Examinations of the Joint Commission on National Dental Examinations, or its successor commission. (5)  An applicant for licensure by examination as a dental hygienist who is a graduate of a non-ADA accredited foreign country dental hygiene school shall: (a)  * * *Be of good moral character and Have attained the age of eighteen (18) years; (b)  Be proficient in oral and written communications in the English language; (c)  Have completed not less than two (2) academic years of postsecondary study and graduated from a foreign dental hygiene school that is recognized by the licensure authorities in that country; (d)  Have been licensed as a dental hygienist or admitted to the practice of dental hygiene in the foreign country in which the applicant received foreign dental hygiene school training; (e)  Present documentation of having completed at least one or more years of full-time postgraduate clinical education in a dental hygiene school accredited by the Commission on Dental Accreditation of the American Dental Association, or its successor commission, and has been certified by the dean of the accredited dental hygiene school as having achieved the same level of didactic and clinical competence as expected of a graduate of the school; and (f)  Have successfully completed the National Board Dental Hygiene Examinations of the Joint Commission on National Dental Examinations, or its successor commission. (6)  Applications shall be made in the form and content as required in this section and as shall be prescribed by the board, and each applicant shall submit upon request such proof as the board may require as to age * * *, character and qualifications.  Applications must be signed by two (2) citizens of the state of which the applicant is a resident * * *, attesting under oath that the applicant is of good moral character.  All applicants for licensure shall submit an endorsement from all states in which he or she is currently licensed or has ever been licensed to practice dentistry or dental hygiene.  The board may disallow the licensure examination to any applicant who has been found guilty of any of the grounds for disciplinary action as enumerated in Section 73-9-61. (7)  Examination shall be as elsewhere provided in this chapter and the board may by its rules and regulations prescribe reasonable professional standards for oral, written, clinical and other examinations given to applicants, and, if deemed necessary by the board, include a requirement that licensure examinations of applicants be conducted utilizing live human subjects.  Each applicant shall appear before the board and be examined to determine his or her learning and skill in dentistry or dental hygiene.  If found by the members of the board conducting the examination to possess sufficient learning and skill therein * * * and to be of good moral character, the board shall, as early as practicable, grant to the person a license to practice dentistry or dental hygiene, as the case may be, which shall be signed by each member of the board who attended the examination and approved the issuance of a license. (8)  The Board of Dental Examiners may, at its own discretion, accept certification of a licensure applicant, either dentist or dental hygienist, by the National Board Examinations of the Joint Commission on National Dental Examinations, or its successor commission, in lieu of the written examination.  However, in all such instances the board shall retain the right to administer such further written and practical examinations and demonstrations as it deems necessary. (9)  Each application or filing made under this section shall include the social security number(s) of the applicant in accordance with Section 93-11-64. SECTION 33.  Section 73-9-61, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 73-9-61.  (1)  Upon satisfactory proof, and in accordance with statutory provisions elsewhere set out for such hearings and protecting the rights of the accused as well as the public, the State Board of Dental Examiners may deny the issuance or renewal of a license or may revoke or suspend the license of any licensed dentist or dental hygienist practicing in the State of Mississippi, or take any other action in relation to the license as the board may deem proper under the circumstances, for any of the following reasons: (a)  Misrepresentation in obtaining a license, or attempting to obtain, obtaining, attempting to renew or renewing a license or professional credential by making any material misrepresentation, including the signing in his or her professional capacity any certificate that is known to be false at the time he or she makes or signs the certificate. (b)  Willful violation of any of the rules or regulations duly promulgated by the board, or of any of the rules or regulations duly promulgated by the appropriate dental licensure agency of another state or jurisdiction. (c)  Being impaired in the ability to practice dentistry or dental hygiene with reasonable skill and safety to patients by reason of illness or use of alcohol, drugs, narcotics, chemicals, or any other type of material or as a result of any mental or physical condition. (d)  Administering, dispensing or prescribing any prescriptive medication or drug outside the course of legitimate professional dental practice. (e)  Being convicted or found guilty of or entering a plea of nolo contendere to, regardless of adjudication, a violation of any federal or state law regulating the possession, distribution or use of any narcotic drug or any drug considered a controlled substance under state or federal law, a certified copy of the conviction order or judgment rendered by the trial court being prima facie evidence thereof, notwithstanding the pendency of any appeal. (f)  Practicing incompetently or negligently, regardless of whether there is actual harm to the patient. * * *  (g)  Being convicted or found guilty of or entering a plea of nolo contendere to, regardless of adjudication, a crime in any jurisdiction that relates to the practice of dentistry or dental hygiene, a certified copy of the conviction order or judgment rendered by the trial court being prima facie evidence thereof, notwithstanding the pendency of any appeal. ( * * *hg)  Being convicted or found guilty of or entering a plea of nolo contendere to, regardless of adjudication, a * * *felony disqualifying crime as provided in the Fresh Start Act in any jurisdiction, a certified copy of the conviction order or judgment rendered by the trial court being prima facie evidence thereof, notwithstanding the pendency of any appeal. ( * * *ih)  Delegating professional responsibilities to a person who is not qualified by training, experience or licensure to perform them. ( * * *ji)  The refusal of a licensing authority of another state or jurisdiction to issue or renew a license, permit or certificate to practice dentistry or dental hygiene in that jurisdiction or the revocation, suspension or other restriction imposed on a license, permit or certificate issued by the licensing authority that prevents or restricts practice in that jurisdiction, a certified copy of the disciplinary order or action taken by the other state or jurisdiction being prima facie evidence thereof, notwithstanding the pendency of any appeal. ( * * *kj)  Surrender of a license or authorization to practice dentistry or dental hygiene in another state or jurisdiction when the board has reasonable cause to believe that the surrender is made to avoid or in anticipation of a disciplinary action. ( * * *lk)  Any unprofessional conduct to be determined by the board on a case-by-case basis, which shall include, but not be restricted to, the following: * * *   (i)  Committing any crime involving moral turpitude. ( * * *iii) Practicing deceit or other fraud upon the public. ( * * *iiiii)  Practicing dentistry or dental hygiene under a false or assumed name. ( * * *iviii)  Advertising that is false, deceptive or misleading. ( * * *viv)  Announcing a specialized practice shall be considered advertising that tends to deceive or mislead the public unless the dentist announcing as a specialist conforms to other statutory provisions and the duly promulgated rules or regulations of the board pertaining to practice of dentistry in the State of Mississippi. ( * * *ml)  Failure to provide and maintain reasonable sanitary facilities and conditions or failure to follow board rules regarding infection control. ( * * *nm)  Committing any act which would constitute sexual misconduct upon a patient or upon ancillary staff.  For purposes of this subsection, the term sexual misconduct means: (i)  Use of the licensee-patient relationship to engage or attempt to engage the patient in sexual activity; or (ii)  Conduct of a licensee that is intended to intimidate, coerce, influence or trick any person employed by or for the licensee in a dental practice or educational setting for the purpose of engaging in sexual activity or activity intended for the sexual gratification of the licensee. ( * * *on)  Violation of a lawful order of the board previously entered in a disciplinary or licensure hearing; failure to cooperate with any lawful request or investigation by the board; or failure to comply with a lawfully issued subpoena of the board. ( * * *po)  Willful, obstinate and continuing refusal to cooperate with the board in observing its rules and regulations in promptly paying all legal license or other fees required by law. ( * * *qp)  Practicing dentistry or dental hygiene while the person's license is suspended. ( * * *rq)  Violation(s) of the provisions of Sections 41-121-1 through 41-121-9 relating to deceptive advertisement by health care practitioners. (2)  In lieu of revocation of a license as provided for above, the board may suspend the license of the offending dentist or dental hygienist, suspend the sedation permit of the offending dentist, or take any other action in relation to his or her license as the board may deem proper under the circumstances. (3)  When a license to practice dentistry or dental hygiene is revoked or suspended by the board, the board may, in its discretion, stay the revocation or suspension and simultaneously place the licensee on probation upon the condition that the licensee shall not violate the laws of the State of Mississippi pertaining to the practice of dentistry or dental hygiene and shall not violate the rules and regulations of the board and shall not violate any terms in relation to his or her license as may be set by the board. (4)  In a proceeding conducted under this section by the board for the denial, revocation or suspension of a license to practice dentistry or dental hygiene, the board shall have the power and authority for the grounds stated for that denial, revocation or suspension, and in addition thereto or in lieu of that denial, revocation or suspension may assess and levy upon any person licensed to practice dentistry or dental hygiene in the State of Mississippi, a monetary penalty, as follows: (a)  For the first violation of any of paragraph (a), (b), (c), (d), (f), ( * * *ih), ( * * *lk), ( * * *ml), ( * * *nm), ( * * *on) or ( * * *qp) of subsection (1) of this section, a monetary penalty of not less than Fifty Dollars ($50.00) nor more than Five Hundred Dollars ($500.00). (b)  For the second violation of any of paragraph (a), (b), (c), (d), (f), ( * * *ih), ( * * *lk), ( * * *ml), ( * * *nm), ( * * *on) or ( * * *qp) of subsection (1) of this section, a monetary penalty of not less than One Hundred Dollars ($100.00) nor more than One Thousand Dollars ($1,000.00). (c)  For the third and any subsequent violation of any of paragraph (a), (b), (c), (d), (f), ( * * *ih), ( * * *lk), ( * * *ml), ( * * *nm), ( * * *on) or ( * * *qp) of subsection (1) of this section, a monetary penalty of not less than Five Hundred Dollars ($500.00) and not more than Five Thousand Dollars ($5,000.00). (d)  For any violation of any of paragraphs (a) through ( * * *qp) of subsection (1) of this section, those reasonable costs that are expended by the board in the investigation and conduct of a proceeding for licensure revocation or suspension, including, but not limited to, the cost of process service, court reporters, expert witnesses and investigators. (5)  The power and authority of the board to assess and levy monetary penalties under this section shall not be affected or diminished by any other proceeding, civil or criminal, concerning the same violation or violations except as provided in this section. (6)  A licensee shall have the right of appeal from the assessment and levy of a monetary penalty as provided in this section under the same conditions as a right of appeal is provided elsewhere for appeals from an adverse ruling, order or decision of the board. (7)  Any monetary penalty assessed and levied under this section shall not take effect until after the time for appeal has expired.  In the event of an appeal, the appeal shall act as a supersedeas. (8)  A monetary penalty assessed and levied under this section shall be paid to the board by the licensee upon the expiration of the period allowed for appeal of those penalties under this section or may be paid sooner if the licensee elects.  With the exception of subsection (4)(d) of this section, monetary penalties collected by the board under this section shall be deposited to the credit of the General Fund of the State Treasury.  Any monies collected by the board under subsection (4)(d) of this section shall be deposited into the special fund operating account of the board. (9)  When payment of a monetary penalty assessed and levied by the board against a licensee in accordance with this section is not paid by the licensee when due under this section, the board shall have power to institute and maintain proceedings in its name for enforcement of payment in the chancery court of the county and judicial district of residence of the licensee, and if the licensee is a nonresident of the State of Mississippi, the proceedings shall be in the Chancery Court of the First Judicial District of Hinds County, Mississippi. (10)  In addition to the reasons specified in subsection (1) of this section, the board shall be authorized to suspend the license of any licensee for being out of compliance with an order for support, as defined in Section 93-11-153.  The procedure for suspension of a license for being out of compliance with an order for support, and the procedure for the reissuance or reinstatement of a license suspended for that purpose, and the payment of any fees for the reissuance or reinstatement of a license suspended for that purpose, shall be governed by Section 93-11-157 or 93-11-163, as the case may be.  If there is any conflict between any provision of Section 93-11-157 or 93-11-163 and any provision of this chapter, the provisions of Section 93-11-157 or 93-11-163, as the case may be, shall control. (11)  All grounds for disciplinary action, including imposition of fines and assessment of costs as enumerated above, shall also apply to any other license or permit issued by the board under this chapter or regulations duly adopted by the board. SECTION 34.  Section 73-11-51, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 73-11-51.  (1)  No person shall engage in the business or practice of funeral service, including embalming, and/or funeral directing or hold himself out as transacting or practicing or being entitled to transact or practice funeral service, including embalming, and/or funeral directing in this state unless duly licensed under the provisions of this chapter. (2)  The board is authorized and empowered to examine applicants for licenses for the practice of funeral service and funeral directing and shall issue the proper license to those persons who successfully pass the applicable examination and otherwise comply with the provisions of this chapter. (3)  To be licensed for the practice of funeral directing under this chapter, a person must furnish satisfactory evidence to the board that he or she: (a)  Is at least eighteen (18) years of age; (b)  Has a high school diploma or the equivalent thereof; (c)  Has served as a resident trainee for not less than twelve (12) months under the supervision of a person licensed for the practice of funeral service or funeral directing in this state; and (d)  Has successfully passed a written and/or oral examination as prepared or approved by the board * * *; and. * * *  (e)  Is of good moral character. (4)  To be licensed for the practice of funeral service under this chapter, a person must furnish satisfactory evidence to the board that he or she: (a)  Is at least eighteen (18) years of age; (b)  Has a high school diploma or the equivalent thereof; (c)  Has successfully completed twelve (12) months or more of academic and professional instruction from an institution accredited by the United States Department of Education for funeral service education and have a certificate of completion from an institution accredited by the American Board of Funeral Service Education or any other successor recognized by the United States Department of Education for funeral service education; (d)  Has served as a resident trainee for not less than twelve (12) months, either before or after graduation from an accredited institution mentioned above, under the supervision of a person licensed for the practice of funeral service in this state and in an establishment licensed in this state; and (e)  Has successfully passed the National Conference of Funeral Examiners examination and/or such other examination as approved by the board * * *; and. * * *  (f)  Is of good moral character. (5)  All applications for examination and license for the practice of funeral service or funeral directing shall be upon forms furnished by the board and shall be accompanied by an examination fee, a licensing fee and a nonrefundable application fee in amounts fixed by the board in accordance with Section 73-11-56.  The fee for an initial license, however, may be prorated in proportion to the period of time from the date of issuance to the date of biennial license renewal prescribed in subsection (8) of this section.  All applications for examination shall be filed with the board office at least sixty (60) days before the date of examination.  A candidate shall be deemed to have abandoned the application for examination if he does not appear on the scheduled date of examination unless such failure to appear has been approved by the board. (6)  The practice of funeral service or funeral directing must be engaged in at a licensed funeral establishment, at least one (1) of which is listed as the licensee's place of business; and no person, partnership, corporation, association or other organization shall open or maintain a funeral establishment at which to engage in or conduct or hold himself or itself out as engaging in the practice of funeral service or funeral directing until such establishment has complied with the licensing requirements of this chapter.  A license for the practice of funeral service or funeral directing shall be used only at licensed funeral establishments; however, this provision shall not prevent a person licensed for the practice of funeral service or funeral directing from conducting a funeral service at a church, a residence, public hall, lodge room or cemetery chapel, if such person maintains a fixed licensed funeral establishment of his own or is in the employ of or an agent of a licensed funeral establishment. (7)  Any person holding a valid, unrevoked and unexpired nonreciprocal license in another state or territory having requirements greater than or equal to those of this state as determined by the board may apply for a license to practice in this state by filing with the board a certified statement from the secretary of the licensing board of the state or territory in which the applicant holds his license certifying to his qualifications and good standing with that board.  He/she must also successfully pass a written and/or oral examination on the Mississippi Funeral Service licensing law and rules and regulations as prepared or approved by the board, and must pay a nonrefundable application fee set by the board.  If the board finds that the applicant has fulfilled aforesaid requirements and has fulfilled substantially similar requirements of those required for a Mississippi licensee, the board shall grant such license upon receipt of a fee in an amount equal to the renewal fee set by the board for a license for the practice of funeral service or funeral directing, as the case may be, in this state.  The board may issue a temporary funeral service or funeral directing work permit before a license is granted, before the next regular meeting of the board, if the applicant for a reciprocal license has complied with all requirements, rules and regulations of the board.  The temporary permit will expire at the next regular meeting of the board.  The issuance of a license or temporary permit by reciprocity to a military-trained applicant, military spouse or person who establishes residence in this state shall be subject to the provisions of Section 73-50-1 or 73-50-2, as applicable. (8)  (a)  Except as provided in Section 33-1-39, any person holding a license for the practice of funeral service or funeral directing may have the same renewed for a period of two (2) years by making and filing with the board an application on or before the due date.  Payment of the renewal fee shall be in an amount set by the board in accordance with Section 73-11-56.  The board shall mail the notice of renewal and the due date for the payment of the renewal fee to the last-known address of each licensee at least thirty (30) days before that date.  It is the responsibility of the licensee to notify the board in writing of any change of address.  An application will be considered late if the application and proper fees are not in the board's office or postmarked by the due date.  Failure of a license holder to receive the notice of renewal shall not exempt or excuse a license holder from the requirement of renewing the license on or before the license expiration date. (b)  If the renewal fee is not paid on or postmarked by the due date, the license of such person shall by operation of law automatically expire and become void without further action of the board.  The board may reinstate such license if application for licensure is made within a period of five (5) years, upon payment of the renewal fee for the current year, all renewal fees in arrears, and a reinstatement fee.  After a period of five (5) years, the licensee must make application, pay the current renewal fee, all fees in arrears, and pass a written and/or oral examination as prepared or approved by the board. (9)  No license shall be assignable or valid for any person other than the original licensee. (10)  The board may, in its discretion, if there is a major disaster or emergency where human death is likely to occur, temporarily authorize the practice of funeral directing and funeral service by persons licensed to practice in another state but not licensed to practice in this state.  Only persons licensed in this state, however, may sign death certificates. (11)  Any funeral service technology or mortuary science program accredited by the American Board of Funeral Service Education in the State of Mississippi, as well as students enrolled in such a program, shall be exempt from licensing under this chapter when embalming or otherwise preparing a deceased human body for disposition as part of a student practicum experience, when the student is directly supervised by an instructor or preceptor who holds a current funeral service license. This exemption shall apply to practicum experiences performed at an accredited institution of funeral service technology or mortuary science program or at a duly licensed funeral establishment or commercial mortuary service.  Nothing in this subsection shall be construed to allow any funeral service technology or mortuary science program, or those students enrolled in such a program, to engage in practicum experiences for remuneration. (12)  Each application or filing made under this section shall include the social security number(s) of the applicant in accordance with Section 93-11-64. SECTION 35.  Section 73-11-57, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 73-11-57.  (1)  The board, upon satisfactory proof at proper hearing and in accordance with the provisions of this chapter and the regulations of the board, may suspend, revoke, or refuse to issue or renew any license under this chapter, reprimand or place the holder of a license on a term of probation, and/or take any other action in relation to a license as the board may deem proper under the circumstances upon any of the following grounds: (a)  The employment of fraud or deception in applying for a license or in passing the examination provided for in this chapter; (b)  The erroneous issuance of a license to any person; (c)  The conviction of a * * *felony disqualifying crime as provided in the Fresh Start Act by any court in this state or any federal court or by the court of any other state or territory of the United States; having been convicted of or pled guilty to a * * *felony disqualifying crime as provided in the Fresh Start Act in the courts of this state or any other state, territory or country which would prevent a person from holding elected office.  Conviction, as used in this paragraph, shall include a deferred conviction, deferred prosecution, deferred sentence, finding or verdict of guilt, an admission of guilty, or a plea of nolo contendere; (d)  The practice of embalming under a false name or without a license for the practice of funeral service; (e)  The impersonation of another funeral service or funeral directing licensee; (f)  The permitting of a person other than a funeral service or funeral directing licensee to make arrangements for a funeral and/or form of disposition; (g)  Violation of any provision of this chapter or any rule or regulation of the board; (h)  Having had a license for the practice of funeral service or funeral directing suspended or revoked in any jurisdiction, having voluntarily surrendered his license in any jurisdiction, having been placed on probation in any jurisdiction, having been placed under disciplinary order(s) or other restriction in any manner for funeral directing and/or funeral service, or operating a funeral establishment (a certified copy of the order of suspension, revocation, probation or disciplinary action shall be prima facie evidence of such action); (i)  Solicitation of dead human bodies by the licensee, his agents, assistants or employees, whether such solicitation occurs after death or when death is imminent; if the person solicited has made known a desire not to receive the communication, or if the solicitation involves coercion, duress or harassment, or if the solicitation takes place at the residence of the client or prospective client and is uninvited by the client or prospective client and has not been previously agreed to by the client or prospective client; however, this shall not be deemed to prohibit general advertising; (j)  Employment directly or indirectly of any apprentice, agent, assistant, employee, or other person, on a part-time or full-time basis or on commission, for the purpose of calling upon individuals or institutions by whose influence dead human bodies may be turned over to a particular funeral establishment; (k)  Failure to give full cooperation to the board and/or its designees, agents or other representatives in the performance of official duties of the board.  Such failure to cooperate includes, but is not limited to: (i)  Not furnishing any relevant papers or documents requested by or for the board; (ii)  Not furnishing, in writing, an adequate explanation covering the matter contained in a complaint filed with the board; (iii)  Not responding without cause to subpoenas issued by the board, whether or not the licensee is the party charged in any preceding before the board; (iv)  Not reasonably providing access, as directed by the board for its authorized agents or representatives seeking to perform reviews or inspections at facilities or places utilized by the license holder in the practice of funeral service or funeral directing and/or in performing any other activity regulated by the board under this chapter; (v)  Failure to provide information within the specified time allotted and as required by the board and/or its representatives or designees; (vi)  Failure to cooperate with the board or its designees or representatives in the investigation of any alleged misconduct or interfering with a board investigation by willful misrepresentation of facts; (vii)  Deceiving or attempting to deceive the board regarding any matter under investigation, including altering or destroying any records; and (viii)  Failure, without good cause, to cooperate with any request by the board to appear before it; (l)  Knowingly performing any act that in any way assists an unlicensed person to practice funeral service or funeral directing; (m)  Knowingly making a false statement on death certificates; * * *  (n)  Conviction of a crime involving moral turpitude; ( * * *on)  Violating any statute, ordinance, rule or regulation of the state or any of its boards, agencies or political subdivisions affecting the registration of deaths or the handling, custody, care or transportation of dead human bodies; or ( * * *po)  Unprofessional conduct in the practice of funeral service or funeral directing which includes, but is not limited to: (i)  Retaining a dead human body for the payment of a fee for the performance of services that are not authorized; (ii)  Knowingly performing any act which in any way assists an unlicensed person to practice funeral service or funeral directing; (iii)  Being guilty of any dishonorable conduct likely to deceive, defraud or harm the public; (iv)  Any act or omission in the practice of funeral service or directing which constitutes dishonesty, fraud or misrepresentation with the intent to benefit the licensee, another person or funeral establishment, or with the intent to substantially injure another person, licensee or funeral establishment; or (v)  Any act or conduct, whether the same or of a different character than specified above, which constitutes or demonstrates bad faith, incompetency or untrustworthiness; or dishonest, fraudulent or improper dealing; or any other violation of the provisions of this chapter, the rules and regulations established by the board or any rule or regulation promulgated by the Federal Trade Commission relative to the practice of funeral service or funeral directing. (2)  Any person, including a member of the board, may initiate a complaint against a licensee of the board by filing with the board a written complaint on a form prescribed by the board. (a)  Upon receipt of a properly verified complaint, the board shall send a copy of the complaint to the affected licensee by certified mail to the address of such licensee appearing of record with the board.  The licensee shall answer the complaint in writing within twenty (20) days after receipt of the complaint.  The licensee shall mail a copy of his, her or its response to the board and the complainant.  Upon receipt of the licensee's response or lapse of twenty (20) days, the board is authorized to investigate a complaint that appears to show the existence of any of the causes or grounds for disciplinary action as provided in Section 73-11-57.  Upon finding reasonable cause to believe that the charges are not frivolous, unfounded or filed in bad faith, the board may, in its discretion, cause a hearing to be held, at a time and place fixed by the board, regarding the charges that a violation of this chapter has occurred. The board shall order a hearing for the licensee to appear and show cause why he/she should not be disciplined for a violation of this chapter. (b)  The board shall give the complainant and the affected licensee twenty (20) days' notice of any hearing upon a complaint.  Such notice shall be by United States certified mail. (c)  Any party appearing before the board may be accompanied by counsel. (d)  Before commencing a hearing, the chairman or designee of the board shall determine if all parties are present and ready to proceed.  If the complainant fails to attend a hearing without good cause shown, the complaint shall be dismissed summarily and all fees and expenses of convening the hearing shall be assessed to, and paid by, the complainant.  If any affected licensee fails to appear for a hearing without good cause shown, such licensee shall be presumed to have waived his right to appear before the board and be heard. (e)  Upon the chair's determination that all parties are ready to proceed, the chair or designee shall call the hearing to order and the complainant and the licensee may give opening statements.  The board may order the sequestration of nonparty witnesses. (f)  The complainant shall then present his, her or its complaint.  The licensee, any counsel and any member or designee of the board may ask questions of witnesses. (g)  The licensee shall then present his, her or its case in rebuttal.  The complainant, any counsel and any member or designee of the board may ask questions of witnesses. (h)  At the completion of the evidence, all parties may give closing statements. (i)  At the conclusion of the hearing, the board may either decide the issue at that time or take the case under advisement for further deliberation.  The board shall render its decision not more than ninety (90) days after the close of the hearing and shall forward the decision to the last-known business or residence address of the parties. (3)  The board, on its own motion, may file a formal complaint against a licensee. (4)  The board may temporarily suspend a license under this chapter without any hearing, simultaneously with the institution of proceedings under this section, if it finds that the evidence in support of the board's determination is clear, competent and unequivocal and that the licensee's continuation in practice would constitute an imminent danger to public health and safety. (5)  The board may, upon satisfactory proof that the applicant or licensee has been guilty of any of the offenses above enumerated, take the action authorized by this section against an applicant or licensee of the board upon a majority vote of the board members, after a hearing thereon.  The board is vested with full power and authority to hold and conduct such hearings, compel the attendance of witnesses and the production of books, records and documents, issue subpoenas therefor, administer oaths, examine witnesses, and do all things necessary to properly conduct such hearings.  The board may waive the necessity of a hearing if the person accused of a violation admits that he has been guilty of such offense. Any person who has been refused a license or whose license has been revoked or suspended may, within thirty (30) days after the decision of the board, file with the board a written notice stating that he feels himself aggrieved by such decision and may appeal therefrom to the circuit court of the county and judicial district of residence of the person, or if the person is a nonresident of the State of Mississippi, to the Circuit Court of the First Judicial District of Hinds County.  The circuit court shall determine the action of the board was in accord or consistent with law, or was arbitrary, unwarranted or an abuse of discretion.  The appeal shall be perfected upon filing notice of the appeal with the circuit court and by the prepayment of all costs, including the cost of the preparation of the record of the proceedings by the board.  An appeal from the circuit court judgment or decree may be reviewed by the Supreme Court as is provided by law for other appeals.  An appeal of a decision or order of the board does not act as a supersedeas. (6)  In addition to any other power that it has, the board may, upon finding that an applicant or licensee has committed any of the violations listed in Section 73-11-57(1), impose a monetary penalty as follows: (a)  For the first violation of any of the subparagraphs of subsection (1) of this section, a monetary penalty of not more than Five Hundred Dollars ($500.00). (b)  For the second violation of any of the subparagraphs of subsection (1) of this section, a monetary penalty of not more than One Thousand Dollars ($1,000.00). (c)  For the third and any subsequent violation of any of the subparagraphs of subsection (1) of this section, a monetary penalty of not more than Five Thousand Dollars ($5,000.00). (d)  For any violation of any of the subparagraphs of subsection (1) of this section, those reasonable costs that are expended by the board in the investigation and conduct of a proceeding for licensure revocation or suspension, including, but not limited to, the cost of process service, court reporters, expert witnesses and investigators. (7)  The power and authority of the board to assess and levy such monetary penalties hereunder shall not be affected or diminished by any other proceeding, civil or criminal, concerning the same violation or violations except as provided in this section. (8)  A licensee shall have the right of appeal from the assessment and levy of a monetary penalty as provided in this section under the same conditions as a right of appeal is provided elsewhere for appeals from an adverse ruling, order or decision of the board. (9)  Any monetary penalty assessed and levied under this section shall not take effect until after the time for appeal shall have expired. (10)  A monetary penalty assessed and levied under this section shall be paid to the board by the licensee upon the expiration of the period allowed for appeal of such penalties under this section or may be paid sooner if the licensee elects. With the exception of subsection (5)(d) of this section, monetary penalties collected by the board under this section shall be deposited in the State Treasury to the credit of the State Board of Funeral Service.  Any monies collected by the board under subsection (5)(d) of this section shall be deposited into the special fund operating account of the board. (11)  When payment of a monetary penalty assessed and levied by the board against a licensee in accordance with this section is not paid by the licensee when due under this section, the board shall have power to institute and maintain proceedings in its name for enforcement of payment in the chancery court of the county and judicial district of residence of the licensee, or if the licensee is a nonresident of the State of Mississippi, in the Chancery Court of the First Judicial District of Hinds County, Mississippi. (12)  In any administrative or judicial proceeding in which the board prevails, the board shall have the right to recover reasonable attorney fees. (13)  In addition to the reasons specified in subsection (1) of this section, the board shall be authorized to suspend the license of any licensee for being out of compliance with an order for support, as defined in Section 93-11-153.  The procedure for suspension of a license for being out of compliance with an order for support, and the procedure for the reissuance or reinstatement of a license suspended for that purpose, and the payment of any fees for the reissuance or reinstatement of a license suspended for that purpose, shall be governed by Section 93-11-157 or 93-11-163, as the case may be.  Actions taken by the board in suspending a license when required by Section 93-11-157 or 93-11-163 are not actions from which an appeal may be taken under this section.  Any appeal of a license suspension that is required by Section 93-11-157 or 93-11-163 shall be taken in accordance with the appeal procedure specified in Section 93-11-157 or 93-11-163, as the case may be, rather than the procedure specified in this section.  If there is any conflict between any provision of Section 93-11-157 or 93-11-163 and any provision of this chapter, the provisions of Section 93-11-157 or 93-11-163, as the case may be, shall control. SECTION 36.  Section 73-13-23, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 73-13-23.  (1)  (a)  The following shall be considered as minimum evidence satisfactory to the board that the applicant is qualified for licensure as a professional engineer: Graduation in an engineering curriculum of four (4) years or more from a school or college approved by the board as of satisfactory standing or graduation in an engineering, engineering technology, or related science curriculum of four (4) scholastic years from a school or college other than those approved by the board plus a graduate degree in an engineering curriculum from a school or college wherein the same engineering curriculum at the undergraduate level is approved by the board as of satisfactory standing; a specific record of four (4) years of qualifying engineering experience indicating that the applicant is competent to practice engineering (in counting years of experience, the board at its discretion may give credit not in excess of three (3) years for satisfactory graduate study in engineering), and the successful passing of examinations in engineering as prescribed by the board. (b)  In considering the qualifications of applicants, engineering teaching may be construed as engineering experience. (c)  The mere execution, as a contractor, of work designed by a professional engineer, or the supervision of the construction of such work as a foreman or superintendent shall not be deemed to be the practice of engineering. (d)  Any person having the necessary qualifications prescribed in Sections 73-13-1 through 73-13-45 to entitle him to licensure shall be eligible for such licensure although he may not be practicing his profession at the time of making his application. (e)  No person shall be eligible for licensure as a professional engineer who * * *is not of good character and reputation, as defined in the board's Code of Professional Conduct, or who presents claims in support of his application which contain major discrepancies. (2)  The following shall be considered as minimum evidence satisfactory to the board that the applicant is qualified for enrollment as an engineer intern: (a)  Graduation in an engineering curriculum of four (4) scholastic years or more from a school or college approved by the board as of satisfactory standing or graduation in an engineering, engineering technology, or related science curriculum of four (4) scholastic years from a school or college other than those approved by the board plus a graduate degree in an engineering curriculum from a school or college wherein that same engineering curriculum at the undergraduate level is approved by the board as of satisfactory standing; and (b)  Successfully passing a written examination in the fundamental engineering subjects. SECTION 37.  Section 73-13-77, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 73-13-77.  (1)  The following shall be considered as minimum evidence satisfactory to the board that the applicant is qualified for licensure as a professional surveyor: (a)  (i)  A bachelor's degree in geomatics, surveying or surveying technology approved by the board consisting of a minimum of one hundred twenty (120) semester hours, or the equivalent, in surveying curriculum subjects and a specific record of four (4) years of qualifying surveying experience; or (ii)  A bachelor's degree in a related science curriculum defined by board rule, consisting of sixty-two (62) semester hours in surveying curriculum subjects as defined by board rule, and a specific record of five (5) years of qualifying surveying experience; or (iii)  A bachelor's degree in a related science curriculum defined by board rule, and a specific record of six (6) years of qualifying surveying experience; or (iv)  An associate degree, or its equivalent, in a curriculum approved by the board consisting of sixty-two (62) semester hours in surveying curriculum subjects as defined by board rule, and a specific record of seven (7) years or more of qualifying surveying experience; or (v)  A high school diploma, or its equivalent, and a specific record of twelve (12) years or more of qualifying surveying experience; and (b)  Successfully passing examinations in surveying prescribed by the board. (2)  The following shall be considered as minimum evidence satisfactory to the board that the applicant is qualified for enrollment as a surveyor intern: (a)  (i)  A bachelor's degree in geomatics, surveying or surveying technology approved by the board consisting of a minimum of one hundred twenty (120) semester hours, or the equivalent, in surveying curriculum subjects; or (ii)  A bachelor's degree in a related science curriculum defined by board rule consisting of sixty-two (62) semester hours in surveying curriculum subjects as defined by board rule; or (iii)  A bachelor's degree in a related science curriculum defined by board rule; or (iv)  An associate degree, or its equivalent, in a curriculum approved by the board consisting of sixty-two (62) semester hours in surveying curriculum subjects as defined by board rule; or (v)  A high school diploma, or its equivalent, and a specific record of eight (8) years or more of qualifying surveying experience; and (b)  Successfully passing examinations in surveying fundamentals prescribed by the board. * * * (3)  No person shall be eligible for licensure as a professional surveyor who is not of good character and reputation, as defined in the board's Code of Professional Conduct. SECTION 38.  Section 73-14-35, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 73-14-35.  (1)  Any person registered under this chapter may have his license or certificate revoked or suspended for a fixed period to be determined by the board for any of the following causes: (a)  Being convicted of * * * an offense involving moral turpitude a disqualifying crime as provided in the Fresh Start Act.  The record of such conviction, or certified copy thereof from the clerk of the court where such conviction occurred or by the judge of that court, shall be sufficient evidence to warrant revocation or suspension. (b)  By securing a license or certificate under this chapter through fraud or deceit. (c)  For unethical conduct or for gross ignorance or inefficiency in the conduct of his practice. (d)  For knowingly practicing while suffering with a contagious or infectious disease. (e)  For the use of a false name or alias in the practice of his profession. (f)  For violating any of the provisions of this chapter or any rules or regulations promulgated pursuant to this chapter. (g)  For violating the provisions of any applicable federal laws or regulations. (h)  Discipline by another jurisdiction if at least one (1) of the grounds for the discipline is the same or substantially equivalent to those set forth in this chapter or rules and regulations promulgated pursuant to this chapter. (2)  In addition to the causes specified in subsection (1) of this section, the board shall be authorized to suspend the license of any licensee for being out of compliance with an order for support, as defined in Section 93-11-153.  The procedure for suspension of a license for being out of compliance with an order for support, and the procedure for the reissuance or reinstatement of a license suspended for that purpose, and the payment of any fees for the reissuance or reinstatement of a license suspended for that purpose, shall be governed by Section 93-11-157 or 93-11-163, as the case may be.  If there is any conflict between any provision of Section 93-11-157 or 93-11-163 and any provision of this chapter, the provisions of Section 93-11-157 or 93-11-163, as the case may be, shall control. SECTION 39.  Section 73-15-19, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 73-15-19.  (1)  Registered nurse applicant qualifications.  Any applicant for a license to practice as a registered nurse shall submit to the board: (a)  An attested written application on a Board of Nursing form; (b)  Written official evidence of completion of a nursing program approved by the Board of Trustees of State Institutions of Higher Learning, or one approved by a legal accrediting agency of another state, territory or possession of the United States, the District of Columbia, or a foreign country which is satisfactory to this board; (c)  Evidence of competence in English related to nursing, provided the first language is not English; (d)  Any other official records required by the board. In addition to the requirements specified in paragraphs (a) through (d) of this subsection, in order to qualify for a license to practice as a registered nurse, an applicant must have successfully been cleared for licensure through an investigation that shall consist of a * * *determination as to good moral character and verification that the prospective licensee is not guilty of or in violation of any statutory ground for denial of licensure as set forth in Section 73-15-29 or guilty of any offense specified in Section 73-15-33.  To assist the board in conducting its licensure investigation, all applicants shall undergo a fingerprint-based criminal history records check of the Mississippi central criminal database and the Federal Bureau of Investigation criminal history database.  Each applicant shall submit a full set of his or her fingerprints in a form and manner prescribed by the board, which shall be forwarded to the Mississippi Department of Public Safety (department) and the Federal Bureau of Investigation Identification Division for this purpose. Any and all state or national criminal history records information obtained by the board that is not already a matter of public record shall be deemed nonpublic and confidential information restricted to the exclusive use of the board, its members, officers, investigators, agents and attorneys in evaluating the applicant's eligibility or disqualification for licensure, and shall be exempt from the Mississippi Public Records Act of 1983.  Except when introduced into evidence in a hearing before the board to determine licensure, no such information or records related thereto shall, except with the written consent of the applicant or by order of a court of competent jurisdiction, be released or otherwise disclosed by the board to any other person or agency. The board shall provide to the department the fingerprints of the applicant, any additional information that may be required by the department, and a form signed by the applicant consenting to the check of the criminal records and to the use of the fingerprints and other identifying information required by the state or national repositories. The board shall charge and collect from the applicant, in addition to all other applicable fees and costs, such amount as may be incurred by the board in requesting and obtaining state and national criminal history records information on the applicant. The board may, in its discretion, refuse to accept the application of any person who has been convicted of a * * * criminal offense under any provision of Title 97 of the Mississippi Code of 1972, as now or hereafter amended, disqualifying crime as provided in the Fresh Start Act or any provision of this article. (2)  Licensure by examination.  (a)  Upon the board being satisfied that an applicant for a license as a registered nurse has met the qualifications set forth in subsection (1) of this section, the board shall proceed to examine such applicant in such subjects as the board shall, in its discretion, determine. The subjects in which applicants shall be examined shall be in conformity with curricula in schools of nursing approved by the Board of Trustees of State Institutions of Higher Learning, or one approved by a legal accrediting agency of another state, territory or possession of the United States, the District of Columbia, or a foreign country which is satisfactory to the board. (b)  The applicant shall be required to pass the written examination as selected by the board. (c)  Upon successful completion of such examination, the board shall issue to the applicant a license to practice as a registered nurse. (d)  The board may use any part or all of the state board test pool examination for registered nurse licensure, its successor examination, or any other nationally standardized examination identified by the board in its rules.  The passing score shall be established by the board in its rules. (3)  Licensure by endorsement.  The board may issue a license to practice nursing as a registered nurse without examination to an applicant who has been duly licensed as a registered nurse under the laws of another state, territory or possession of the United States, the District of Columbia, or a foreign country if, in the opinion of the board, the applicant meets the qualifications required of licensed registered nurses in this state and has previously achieved the passing score or scores on the licensing examination required by this state, at the time of his or her graduation.  The issuance of a license by endorsement to a military-trained applicant, military spouse or person who establishes residence in this state shall be subject to the provisions of Section 73-50-1 or 73-50-2, as applicable. (4)  Requirements for rewriting the examination.  The board shall establish in its rules the requirements for rewriting the examination for those persons failing the examination on the first writing or subsequent rewriting. (5)  Fee.  The applicant applying for a license by examination or by endorsement to practice as a registered nurse shall pay a fee not to exceed One Hundred Dollars ($100.00) to the board. (6)  Temporary permit. (a)  The board may issue a temporary permit to practice nursing to a graduate of an approved school of nursing pending the results of the examination in Mississippi, and to a qualified applicant from another state, territory or possession of the United States, or District of Columbia, or pending licensure procedures as provided for elsewhere in this article.  The fee shall not exceed Twenty-five Dollars ($25.00). (b)  The board may issue a temporary permit for a period of ninety (90) days to a registered nurse who is currently licensed in another state, territory or possession of the United States or the District of Columbia and who is an applicant for licensure by endorsement.  Such permit is not renewable except by board action.  The issuance of a temporary permit to a military-trained applicant, military spouse or person who establishes residence in this state shall be subject to the provisions of Section 73-50-1 or 73-50-2, as applicable. (c)  The board may issue a temporary permit to a graduate of an approved school of nursing pending the results of the first licensing examination scheduled after application. Such permit is not renewable except by board action. (d)  The board may issue a temporary permit for a period of thirty (30) days to any registered nurse during the time enrolled in a nursing reorientation program.  This time period may be extended by board action.  The fee shall not exceed Twenty-five Dollars ($25.00). (e)  The board may adopt such regulations as are necessary to limit the practice of persons to whom temporary permits are issued. (7)  Temporary license. The board may issue a temporary license to practice nursing at a youth camp licensed by the State Board of Health to nonresident registered nurses and retired resident registered nurses under the provisions of Section 75-74-8. (8)  Title and abbreviation.  Any person who holds a license or holds the privilege to practice as a registered nurse in this state shall have the right to use the title "registered nurse" and the abbreviation "R.N."  No other person shall assume such title or use such abbreviation, or any words, letters, signs or devices to indicate that the person using the same is a registered nurse. (9)  Registered nurses licensed under a previous law.  Any person holding a license to practice nursing as a registered nurse issued by this board which is valid on July 1, 1981, shall thereafter be deemed to be licensed as a registered nurse under the provisions of this article upon payment of the fee provided in Section 73-15-27. (10)  Each application or filing made under this section shall include the social security number(s) of the applicant in accordance with Section 93-11-64. SECTION 40.  Section 73-15-21, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 73-15-21.  (1)  Licensed practical nurse applicant qualifications.  Any applicant for a license to practice practical nursing as a licensed practical nurse shall submit to the board: (a)  An attested written application on a Board of Nursing form; (b)  A diploma from an approved high school or the equivalent thereof, as determined by the appropriate educational agency; (c)  Written official evidence of completion of a practical nursing program approved by the State Department of Education through its Division of Vocational Education, or one approved by a legal accrediting agency of another state, territory or possession of the United States, the District of Columbia, or a foreign country which is satisfactory to this board; (d)  Evidence of competence in English related to nursing, provided the first language is not English; (e)  Any other official records required by the board. (2)  Licensed practical nurse applicant qualifications for military medics.  Any applicant for a license to practice practical nursing as a licensed practical nurse who is a United States Army Combat Medic Specialist, a United States Navy Hospital Corpsman, or a United States Air Force Aerospace Medical Service Specialist shall submit to the board: (a)  An attested written application on a Board of Nursing form; (b)  A diploma from an approved high school or the equivalent thereof, as determined by the appropriate educational agency; (c)  Written official evidence of completion of the training required for a United States Army Combat Medic Specialist, a United States Navy Hospital Corpsman, or a United States Air Force Aerospace Medical Service Specialist, and after such training, completion of two (2) years of clinical experience that involves providing direct patient care, which may include trauma or emergency oriented care; (d)  Evidence of competence in English related to nursing, provided the first language is not English; (e)  Any other official records required by the board. (3)  Additional requirements for applicants.  In addition to the requirements specified in paragraphs (a) through (e) of subsection (1) or (2) of this section, in order to qualify for a license to practice practical nursing as a licensed practical nurse, an applicant must have successfully been cleared for licensure through an investigation that shall consist of a determination * * *as to good moral character and verification that the prospective licensee is not guilty of or in violation of any statutory ground for denial of licensure as set forth in Section 73-15-29 or guilty of any offense specified in Section 73-15-33.  To assist the board in conducting its licensure investigation, all applicants shall undergo a fingerprint-based criminal history records check of the Mississippi central criminal database and the Federal Bureau of Investigation criminal history database.  Each applicant shall submit a full set of his or her fingerprints in a form and manner prescribed by the board, which shall be forwarded to the Mississippi Department of Public Safety (department) and the Federal Bureau of Investigation Identification Division for this purpose. Any and all state or national criminal history records information obtained by the board that is not already a matter of public record shall be deemed nonpublic and confidential information restricted to the exclusive use of the board, its members, officers, investigators, agents and attorneys in evaluating the applicant's eligibility or disqualification for licensure, and shall be exempt from the Mississippi Public Records Act of 1983.  Except when introduced into evidence in a hearing before the board to determine licensure, no such information or records related thereto shall, except with the written consent of the applicant or by order of a court of competent jurisdiction, be released or otherwise disclosed by the board to any other person or agency. The board shall provide to the department the fingerprints of the applicant, any additional information that may be required by the department, and a form signed by the applicant consenting to the check of the criminal records and to the use of the fingerprints and other identifying information required by the state or national repositories. The board shall charge and collect from the applicant, in addition to all other applicable fees and costs, such amount as may be incurred by the board in requesting and obtaining state and national criminal history records information on the applicant. The board may, in its discretion, refuse to accept the application of any person who has been convicted of a * * *criminal offense under any provision of Title 97 of the Mississippi Code of 1972, as now or hereafter amended, or any provision of this article disqualifying crime as provided in the Fresh Start Act. (4)  Licensure by examination. (a)  Upon the board being satisfied that an applicant for a license as a practical nurse has met the qualifications set forth in subsection (1) or (2) of this section and subsection (3) of this section, the board shall proceed to examine such applicant in such subjects as the board shall, in its discretion, determine.  The subjects in which applicants shall be examined shall be in conformity with curricula in schools of practical nursing approved by the State Department of Education. (b)  The applicant shall be required to pass the written examination selected by the board. (c)  Upon successful completion of such examination, the board shall issue to the applicant a license to practice as a licensed practical nurse. (d)  The board may use any part or all of the state board test pool examination for practical nurse licensure, its successor examination, or any other nationally standardized examination identified by the board in its rules.  The passing score shall be established by the board in its rules. (5)  Licensure by endorsement.  The board may issue a license to practice practical nursing as a licensed practical nurse without examination to an applicant who has been duly licensed as a licensed practical nurse under the laws of another state, territory or possession of the United States, the District of Columbia, or a foreign country if, in the opinion of the board, the applicant meets the qualifications required of licensed practical nurses in this state and has previously achieved the passing score or scores on the licensing examination required by this state at the time of his or her graduation.  The issuance of a license by endorsement to a military-trained applicant, military spouse or person who establishes residence in this state shall be subject to the provisions of Section 73-50-1 or 73-50-2, as applicable. (6)  Licensure by equivalent amount of theory and clinical experience.  In the discretion of the board, former students of a state-accredited school preparing students to become registered nurses may be granted permission to take the examination for licensure to practice as a licensed practical nurse, provided the applicant's record or transcript indicates the former student completed an equivalent amount of theory and clinical experiences as required of a graduate of a practical nursing program, and provided the school attended was, at the time of the student's attendance, an accredited school of nursing. (7)  Requirements for rewriting the examination.  The board shall establish in its rules the requirements for rewriting the examination for those persons failing the examination on the first writing or subsequent writing. (8)  Fee.  The applicant applying for a license by examination or by endorsement to practice as a licensed practical nurse shall pay a fee not to exceed Sixty Dollars ($60.00) to the board. (9)  Temporary permit.  (a) The board may issue a temporary permit to practice practical nursing to a graduate of an approved school of practical nursing pending the results of the examination in Mississippi, and to a qualified applicant from another state, territory or possession of the United States, or the District of Columbia, pending licensing procedures as provided for elsewhere in this article.  The fee shall not exceed Twenty-five Dollars ($25.00). (b)  The board may issue a temporary permit for a period of ninety (90) days to a licensed practical nurse who is currently licensed in another state, territory or possession of the United States or the District of Columbia and who is an applicant for licensure by endorsement.  Such permit is not renewable except by board action.  The issuance of a temporary permit to a military-trained applicant, military spouse or person who establishes residence in this state shall be subject to the provisions of Section 73-50-1 or 73-50-2, as applicable. (c)  The board may issue a temporary permit to a graduate of an approved practical nursing education program or an equivalent program satisfactory to the board pending the results of the first licensing examination scheduled after application. Such permit is not renewable except by board action. (d)  The board may issue a temporary permit for a period of thirty (30) days to any licensed practical nurse during the time enrolled in a nursing reorientation program. This time period may be extended by board action.  The fee shall not exceed Twenty-five Dollars ($25.00). (e)  The board may adopt such regulations as are necessary to limit the practice of persons to whom temporary permits are issued. (10)  Title and abbreviation.  Any person who holds a license or holds the privilege to practice as a licensed practical nurse in this state shall have the right to use the title "licensed practical nurse" and the abbreviation "L.P.N."  No other person shall assume such title or use such abbreviation, or any words, letters, signs or devices to indicate that a person using the same is a licensed practical nurse. (11)  Licensed practical nurses licensed under a previous law.  Any person holding a license to practice nursing as a practical nurse issued by this board which is valid on July 1, 1981, shall thereafter be deemed to be licensed as a practical nurse under the provisions of this article upon payment of the fee prescribed in Section 73-15-27. (12)  Each application or filing made under this section shall include the social security number(s) of the applicant in accordance with Section 93-11-64. SECTION 41.  Section 73-15-29, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 73-15-29.  (1)  The board shall have power to revoke, suspend or refuse to renew any license issued by the board, or to revoke or suspend any privilege to practice, or to deny an application for a license, or to fine, place on probation and/or discipline a licensee, in any manner specified in this article, upon proof that such person: (a)  Has committed fraud or deceit in securing or attempting to secure such license; (b)  Has been convicted of * * *a felony, or a crime involving moral turpitude or has had accepted by a court a plea of nolo contendere to a * * *felony or a crime involving moral turpitude disqualifying crime as provided in the Fresh Start Act (a certified copy of the judgment of the court of competent jurisdiction of such conviction or pleas shall be prima facie evidence of such conviction); (c)  Has negligently or willfully acted in a manner inconsistent with the health or safety of the persons under the licensee's care; (d)  Has had a license or privilege to practice as a registered nurse or a licensed practical nurse suspended or revoked in any jurisdiction, has voluntarily surrendered such license or privilege to practice in any jurisdiction, has been placed on probation as a registered nurse or licensed practical nurse in any jurisdiction or has been placed under a disciplinary order(s) in any manner as a registered nurse or licensed practical nurse in any jurisdiction, (a certified copy of the order of suspension, revocation, probation or disciplinary action shall be prima facie evidence of such action); (e)  Has negligently or willfully practiced nursing in a manner that fails to meet generally accepted standards of such nursing practice; (f)  Has negligently or willfully violated any order, rule or regulation of the board pertaining to nursing practice or licensure; (g)  Has falsified or in a repeatedly negligent manner made incorrect entries or failed to make essential entries on records; (h)  Is addicted to or dependent on alcohol or other habit-forming drugs or is a habitual user of narcotics, barbiturates, amphetamines, hallucinogens, or other drugs having similar effect, or has misappropriated any medication; (i)  Has a physical, mental or emotional condition that renders the licensee unable to perform nursing services or duties with reasonable skill and safety; (j)  Has engaged in any other conduct, whether of the same or of a different character from that specified in this article, that would constitute a * * *crime as defined in Title 97 of the Mississippi Code of 1972, as now or hereafter amended, and that relates to such person's employment as a registered nurse or licensed practical nurse disqualifying crime as provided in the Fresh Start Act; (k)  Engages in conduct likely to deceive, defraud or harm the public; (l)  Engages in any unprofessional conduct as identified by the board in its rules; (m)  Has violated any provision of this article; (n)  Violation(s) of the provisions of Sections 41-121-1 through 41-121-9 relating to deceptive advertisement by health care practitioners; or (o)  Violation(s) of any provision of Title 41, Chapter 141, Mississippi Code of 1972. (2)  When the board finds any person unqualified because of any of the grounds set forth in subsection (1) of this section, it may enter an order imposing one or more of the following penalties: (a)  Denying application for a license or other authorization to practice nursing or practical nursing; (b)  Administering a reprimand; (c)  Suspending or restricting the license or other authorization to practice as a registered nurse or licensed practical nurse for up to two (2) years without review; (d)  Revoking the license or other authorization to practice nursing or practical nursing; (e)  Requiring the disciplinee to submit to care, counseling or treatment by persons and/or agencies approved or designated by the board as a condition for initial, continued or renewed licensure or other authorization to practice nursing or practical nursing; (f)  Requiring the disciplinee to participate in a program of education prescribed by the board as a condition for initial, continued or renewed licensure or other authorization to practice; (g)  Requiring the disciplinee to practice under the supervision of a registered nurse for a specified period of time; or (h)  Imposing a fine not to exceed Five Hundred Dollars ($500.00). (3)  In addition to the grounds specified in subsection (1) of this section, the board shall be authorized to suspend the license or privilege to practice of any licensee for being out of compliance with an order for support, as defined in Section 93-11-153. The procedure for suspension of a license or privilege to practice for being out of compliance with an order for support, and the procedure for the reissuance or reinstatement of a license or privilege to practice suspended for that purpose, and the payment of any fees for the reissuance or reinstatement of a license or privilege to practice suspended for that purpose, shall be governed by Section 93-11-157 or 93-11-163, as the case may be.  If there is any conflict between any provision of Section 93-11-157 or 93-11-163 and any provision of this article, the provisions of Section 93-11-157 or 93-11-163, as the case may be, shall control. (4)  If the public health, safety or welfare imperatively requires emergency action and the board incorporates a finding to that effect in an order, the board may order summary suspension of a license pending proceedings for revocation or other action. These proceedings shall be promptly instituted and determined by the board. (5)  The board may establish by rule an alternative to discipline program for licensees who have an impairment as a result of substance abuse or a mental health condition, which program shall include at least the following components: (a)  Participation in the program is voluntary with the licensee, and the licensee must enter the program before the board holds a disciplinary action hearing regarding the licensee; (b)  The full cost of participation in the program, including the cost of any care, counseling, treatment and/or education received by the licensee, shall be borne by the licensee; (c)  All of the procedures and records regarding the licensee's participation in the program shall be confidential, shall not be disclosed and shall be exempt from the provisions of the Mississippi Public Records Act of 1983; and (d)  A licensee may not participate in the program more often than one (1) time during any period of five (5) years or such longer period as set by the board. (6)  A nurse practitioner who provides a written certification as authorized under the Mississippi Medical Cannabis Act and in compliance with rules and regulations adopted thereunder shall not be subject to any disciplinary action under this section solely due to providing the written certification. SECTION 42.  Section 73-17-9, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 73-17-9.  It shall be the function and duty of the board to: (a)  Develop, impose, and enforce standards which must be met by individuals in order to receive a license as a nursing home administrator, which standards shall be designed to ensure that nursing home administrators will be individuals who are * * * of good character and are otherwise suitable, and who, by training or experience in the field of institutional administration, are qualified to serve as nursing home administrators; (b)  Develop and apply appropriate techniques, including examinations and investigations, for determining whether an individual meets such standards; (c)  Issue licenses to individuals determined, after the application of such techniques, to meet such standards, and revoke or suspend licenses previously issued by the board in any case where the individual holding any such license is determined substantially to have failed to conform to the requirements of such standards; (d)  Establish and carry out procedures designed to ensure that individuals licensed as nursing home administrators will, during any period that they serve as such, comply with the requirements of such standards; (e)  Receive, investigate, and take appropriate action with respect to any charge or complaint filed with the board to the effect that any individual licensed as a nursing home administrator has failed to comply with the requirements of such standards; (f)  Conduct a continuing study and investigation of nursing homes and administrators of nursing homes within the state with a view to the improvement of the standards imposed for the licensing of such administrators and of procedures and methods for the enforcement of such standards with respect to administrators of nursing homes who have been licensed as such; and (g)  To devise and implement an educational program designed to increase the professional proficiency of nursing home administrators and to assist otherwise qualified individuals to prepare for careers in nursing home administration. SECTION 43.  Section 73-17-11, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 73-17-11.  (1)  From and after July 1, 2011, in order to be eligible to be licensed as a nursing home administrator, an individual must submit evidence satisfactory to the board that he or she: (a)  Is at least twenty-one (21) years of age; (b)  * * *Is of good moral character Has not been convicted of a disqualifying crime as provided in the Fresh Start Act, including evidence of a criminal background check within the last six (6) months, under Section 43-11-13 and Section G.407.3 of the Minimum Standards for Institutions for the Aged or Infirm; (c)  Is in good health; (d)  Has satisfied at least one (1) of the following requirements for education and experience: (i)  Has sixty-four (64) hours of college work from an accredited institution and has worked in a supervisory capacity in a Mississippi-licensed nursing home for a minimum of two (2) years immediately before making application for the Administrator-in-Training Program established by board rule; (ii)  Has an associate degree from an accredited institution and has worked in a supervisory capacity in a Mississippi-licensed nursing home for a minimum of two (2) years immediately before making application for the Administrator-in-Training Program established by board rule; (iii)  Has a bachelor's degree in any other field of study from an accredited institution before making application for the Administrator-in-Training Program established by board rule; or (iv)  Has a bachelor's degree in health care administration or a health care related field or business from an accredited institution before making application for the Administrator-in-Training Program established by board rule; (e)  Has (i) completed a nursing home Administrator-in-Training Program and successfully completed the National Association of Long-Term Care Administrator Board (NAB) examination, or (ii) completed an Administrator-in-Training Program in Long-Term Care Administration from an academic institution during which time the institution held National Association of Long-Term Care Administrator Board (NAB) Program Approval through the academic approval process, to the satisfaction of the board; (f)  Has successfully passed the National Association of Long-Term Care Administrator Board (NAB) examination and the Mississippi State Board of Nursing Home Administrators examination to test his or her proficiency and basic knowledge in the area of nursing home administration.  The board may establish the frequency of the offering of those examinations and the contents thereof; and (g)  Has met all of the requirements established by federal law. (2)  The board is authorized to conduct a criminal history records check on applicants for licensure.  In order to determine the applicant's suitability for licensing, the applicant shall be fingerprinted.  The board shall submit the fingerprints to the Department of Public Safety for a check of the state criminal records and forward to the Federal Bureau of Investigation for a check of the national criminal records.  The Department of Public Safety shall disseminate the results of the state check and the national check to the board for a suitability determination.  The applicant shall not be charged any of the costs of requesting and obtaining the state and national criminal history records information on the applicant. (3)  Reciprocity shall be extended to individuals holding licenses as nursing home administrators in other states, upon proper application and a finding on the part of the board that: (a)  The applicant possesses the basic qualifications listed in this chapter and in the rules and regulations adopted under federal law; (b)  The applicant has met all of the requirements established by federal law; and (c)  The standards for licensure in the other states are at least the substantial equivalent of those in this state, including education and experience, and the applicant has passed both the National Association of Long-Term Care Administrator Board (NAB) and the state exams. The issuance of a license by reciprocity to a military-trained applicant, military spouse or person who establishes residence in this state shall be subject to the provisions of Section 73-50-1 or 73-50-2, as applicable. (4)  The board may prescribe appropriate fees for the taking of those examinations and for the issuance of licenses.  Those fees shall be not more than the cost of the examinations and Five Hundred Fifty Dollars ($550.00) for the issuance of a license.  However, the fee for an initial license may be prorated in proportion to the period of time from the date of issuance and the date of biennial license renewal prescribed in subsection (5).  All licenses issued under this chapter shall be for a maximum period of two (2) years. (5)  Except as provided in Section 33-1-39, the board may renew licenses biennially upon the payment of a fee to be established by the board, which shall be not more than Five Hundred Fifty Dollars ($550.00), plus any administrative costs for late payment. (6)  Any person who is not licensed under this chapter on July 1, 2011, who makes application with the board on or before June 30, 2012, may qualify for a license under this chapter provided that on or before January 31, 2014, he or she demonstrates to the satisfaction of the board that he or she (a) meets the eligibility requirements for a nursing home administrator's license prescribed in this section as those requirements existed on June 30, 2011; (b) has successfully completed the Administrator-in-Training Program requirements existing on June 30, 2011; and (c) has paid all required fees for licensure. (7)  Current licensure by the Department of Mental Health under Section 41-4-7(r) as a mental health/intellectual disability program administrator shall exempt the licensee from the requirement of licensure as a nursing home administrator if the licensee is employed in the state mental health system as Administrator of Intermediate Care Facility or Facilities for Persons with Intellectual Disabilities (ICF/ID) no larger than sixteen (16) beds. (8)  Any member of the Legislature who serves on the Public Health and/or Medicaid Committee who is a licensed nursing home administrator shall be exempt from continuing education requirements for license renewal. SECTION 44.  Section 73-17-15, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 73-17-15.  (1)  (a)  The board is authorized to investigate, either on the basis of complaints filed with it or on its own initiative, instances of suspected violations of this chapter of any nature, including, but not limited to:  performing the duties of a nursing home administrator without a license; the providing of false information to the board either incident to an application for a license, incident to a hearing, or otherwise; maladministration; unethical conduct; incompetence; the conviction of a licensee of a * * *felony disqualifying crime as provided in the Fresh Start Act; the misappropriation of funds; or of any other matter reflecting unfavorably upon the holder of a license under this chapter or an applicant therefor.  On the basis of information developed during such an investigation, the board may (i) revoke, suspend, or refuse to renew any license issued by the board, (ii) deny an application for a license, or (iii) reprimand, place on probation, and/or take any other action in relation to a license, as the board may deem proper under the circumstances.  Whenever the results of such an investigation are filed, the executive director of the board shall set a day for a hearing and shall notify the licensee that on the day fixed for hearing he or she may appear and show cause, if any, why his or her license should not be revoked, suspended, or other action taken in relation to his or her license.  The notice shall be transmitted to the licensee by certified United States mail to the address of the licensee appearing of record with the board. (b)  In cases where violations of this chapter have been substantiated, the board may assess a monetary penalty for those reasonable costs that are expended by the board in the investigation and conduct of a proceeding for licensure revocation, suspension or restriction, including, but not limited to, the cost of process service, court reporters, expert witnesses and investigations. (2)  The board, upon finding and determining that any person represents himself or herself to be a nursing home administrator or performs any or all of the services, acts or duties of a nursing home administrator as defined in this chapter without a license, is authorized to petition the chancery court of the county in which the unauthorized acts have been, are being or may be committed, for writ or writs of injunction prohibiting the unauthorized acts.  This provision is supplemental and in addition to the penal provisions set forth in Section 73-17-13. (3)  Any licensee whose license has been revoked or suspended, or who has been placed on probation or reprimanded after a contested hearing, may appeal that action of the board to the chancery court of the county in which the nursing home administrator is practicing, which appeal shall not be a de novo appeal but shall be determined upon an official transcript of the record of the contested hearing.  Appeals to the chancery court shall be taken within ten (10) days from the date of the board's order and shall be taken, perfected, heard and determined either in termtime or in vacation, and the appeals shall be heard and disposed of promptly by the court.  Appeals from the board shall be taken and perfected by the filing of a bond in the sum of Two Hundred Fifty Dollars ($250.00) with two (2) sureties, or with a surety company qualified to do business in Mississippi as surety, conditioned to pay the costs of the appeal.  The bond shall be payable to the state and shall be approved by the clerk of the chancery court. The bond may be enforced in its name as other judicial bonds filed in the chancery court, and judgment may be entered upon those bonds and process and execution shall issue upon those judgments as provided by law in other cases. Upon approval of the bond by the clerk of the chancery court, the clerk shall give notice to the board of the appeal from the decision of the board.  It thereupon shall be the duty of the board through its duly authorized representative to promptly transmit to the clerk of the chancery court in which the appeal is pending a certified copy of the order of the board and all documents filed relating to the board's action against the licensee, together with a transcript of the testimony, both oral and documentary, introduced for consideration by the board both in support of and in opposition to the action, which appeal shall be docketed by the clerk and shall be determined by the court based upon the record.  If there is an appeal, the appeal may, in the discretion of and on motion to the chancery court, act as a supersedeas.  The chancery court shall dispose of the appeal and enter its decision promptly. The hearing on the appeal may, in the discretion of the chancellor, be tried in vacation. (4)  Appeals from the decision of the chancery court may be taken by either the board or the licensee to the Supreme Court as in the case of appeals generally from the chancery court to the Supreme Court. (5)  In addition to the reasons specified in subsection (1) of this section, the board shall be authorized to suspend the license of any licensee for being out of compliance with an order for support, as defined in Section 93-11-153.  The procedure for suspension of a license for being out of compliance with an order for support, and the procedure for the reissuance or reinstatement of a license suspended for that purpose, and the payment of any fees for the reissuance or reinstatement of a license suspended for that purpose, shall be governed by Section 93-11-157 or 93-11-163, as the case may be.  Actions taken by the board in revoking a license when required by Section 93-11-157 or 93-11-163 are not actions from which an appeal may be taken under this section.  Any appeal of a license suspension that is required by Section 93-11-157 or 93-11-163 shall be taken in accordance with the appeal procedure specified in Section 93-11-157 or 93-11-163, as the case may be, rather than the procedure specified in this section.  If there is any conflict between any provision of Section 93-11-157 or 93-11-163 and any provision of this chapter, the provisions of Section 93-11-157 or 93-11-163, as the case may be, shall control. SECTION 45.  Section 73-19-17, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 73-19-17.  Any person over the age of twenty-one (21) years * * *, of good moral character, and who has graduated from a high school or preparatory school affiliated with and recognized by a state university, and who has graduated from a reputable school or college of optometry, shall be entitled to stand for the examination for license to practice optometry in Mississippi.  The examining Board of Optometry shall keep on file a list of schools or colleges of optometry which are recognized by said board.  The examination to practice optometry shall consist of tests in practical, theoretical and physiological optics, in theoretical and practical optometry and in anatomy and physiology of the eye and in pathology as applied to optometry.  The State Board of Optometry shall not examine or certify any optometrist in any therapeutic procedures unless the optometrist has successfully completed the proper didactic education and supervised clinical training taught by an institution accredited by a regional or professional accreditation organization that is recognized or approved by the Council on Postsecondary Accreditation of the United States Department of Education, or its successor, and approved by the State Board of Optometry with the advice and consultation of the designated members of the State Board of Medical Licensure and the State Board of Pharmacy. SECTION 46.  Section 73-19-23, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 73-19-23.  (1)  (a)  The board shall refuse to grant a certificate of licensure to any applicant and may cancel, revoke or suspend the operation of any certificate by it granted for any or all of the following reasons:  unprofessional and unethical conduct or the conviction of a * * *crime involving moral turpitude disqualifying crime as provided in the Fresh Start Act, habitual intemperance in the use of ardent spirits, or stimulants, narcotics, or any other substance that impairs the intellect and judgment to such an extent as to incapacitate one for the performance of the duties of an optometrist.  The certificate of licensure of any person can be revoked for violating any section of this chapter. (b)  The board shall conduct a criminal history records check on licensure applicants and on licensees whose licenses are subject to investigation. (i)  The applicant or licensee shall undergo a fingerprint-based criminal history records check of the Mississippi central criminal database and the Federal Bureau of Investigation criminal history database.  Each applicant or licensee shall submit a full set of the applicant's fingerprints in a form or manner prescribed by the board, which shall be forwarded to the Bureau of Investigation Identification Division for this purpose. (ii)  Any and all state or national criminal history records information obtained by the board that is not already a matter of public record shall be deemed nonpublic and confidential information restricted to the exclusive use of the board, its members, officers, investigators, agents and attorneys in evaluating the applicant's eligibility or disqualification for licensure, and shall be exempt from the Mississippi Public Records Act of 1983.  Except when introduced into evidence in a hearing before the board to determine licensure, no such information or records related thereto shall, except with the written consent of the applicant or licensee or by order of a court of competent jurisdiction, be released or otherwise disclosed by the board to any other person or agency. (iii)  The board shall provide to the department the fingerprints of the applicant or licensee, any additional information that may be required by the department, and a form signed by the applicant consenting to the check of the criminal records and to the use of the fingerprints and other identifying information required by the state or national repositories. (iv)  The board shall charge and collect from the applicant or licensee, in addition to all other applicable fees and costs, such amount as may be incurred by the board in requesting and obtaining state and national criminal history records information on the applicant or licensee. (2)  The board shall further be authorized to take disciplinary action against a licensee for any unlawful acts, which shall include violations of regulations promulgated by the board, as well as the following acts: (a)  Fraud or misrepresentation in applying for or procuring an optometric license or in connection with applying for or procuring periodic renewal of an optometric license. (b)  Cheating on or attempting to subvert the optometric licensing examination(s). (c)  The conviction of a * * *felony disqualifying crime as provided in the Fresh Start Act in this state or any other jurisdiction, or the entry of a guilty or nolo contendere plea to such a * * *felony charge. (d)  The conviction of a * * *felony as defined by federal law disqualifying federal crime as provided in the Fresh Start Act, or the entry of a guilty or nolo contendere plea to such a * * *felony charge. (e)  Conduct likely to deceive, defraud or harm the public. (f)  Making a false or misleading statement regarding his or her skill or the efficacy or value of the medicine, device, treatment or remedy prescribed by him or her or used at his or her direction in the treatment of any disease or other condition. (g)  Willfully or negligently violating the confidentiality between doctor and patient, except as required by law. (h)  Negligence or gross incompetence in the practice of optometry as determined by the board. (i)  Being found to be a person with mental illness or with an intellectual disability by any court of competent jurisdiction. (j)  The use of any false, fraudulent, deceptive or misleading statement in any document connected with the practice of optometry. (k)  Aiding or abetting the practice of optometry by an unlicensed, incompetent or impaired person. (l)  Commission of any act of sexual abuse, misconduct or exploitation related to the licensee's practice of optometry. (m)  Being addicted or habituated to a drug or intoxicant. (n)  Violating any state or federal law or regulation relating to a drug legally classified as a controlled substance. (o)  Obtaining any fee by fraud, deceit or misrepresentation. (p)  Disciplinary action of another state or jurisdiction against a licensee or other authorization to practice optometry based upon acts or conduct by the licensee similar to acts or conduct that would constitute grounds for action as defined in this chapter, a certified copy of the record of the action taken by the other state or jurisdiction being conclusive evidence thereof. (q)  Failure to report to the board the relocation of his or her office in or out of the jurisdiction, or to furnish floor plans as required by regulation. (r)  Violation of any provision(s) of the Optometry Practice Act or the rules and regulations of the board or of an action, stipulation or agreement of the board. (s)  To advertise in a manner that tends to deceive, mislead or defraud the public. (t)  The designation of any person licensed under this chapter, other than by the terms "optometrist," "Doctor of Optometry" or "O.D.," which shall include any violation(s) of the provisions of Sections 41-121-1 through 41-121-9 relating to deceptive advertisement by health care practitioners. (u)  To knowingly submit or cause to be submitted any misleading, deceptive or fraudulent representation on a claim form, bill or statement. (v)  To practice or attempt to practice optometry while his or her license is suspended. (3)  Any person who is a holder of a certificate of licensure or who is an applicant for examination for a certificate of licensure, against whom is preferred any charges, shall be furnished by the board with a copy of the complaint and shall have a hearing in Jackson, Mississippi, before the board, at which hearing he may be represented by counsel.  At the hearing, witnesses may be examined for and against the accused respecting  those charges, and the hearing orders or appeals will be conducted according to the procedure now provided in Section 73-25-27.  The suspension of a certificate of licensure by reason of the use of stimulants or narcotics may be removed when the holder of the certificate has been adjudged by the board to be cured and capable of practicing optometry. (4)  In addition to the reasons specified in subsections (1) and (2) of this section, the board shall be authorized to suspend the license of any licensee for being out of compliance with an order for support, as defined in Section 93-11-153.  The procedure for suspension of a license for being out of compliance with an order for support, and the procedure for the reissuance or reinstatement of a license suspended for that purpose, and the payment of any fees for the reissuance or reinstatement of a license suspended for that purpose, shall be governed by Section 93-11-157 or 93-11-163, as the case may be.  If there is any conflict between any provision of Section 93-11-157 or 93-11-163 and any provision of this chapter, the provisions of Section 93-11-157 or 93-11-163, as the case may be, shall control. (5)  A licensee who provides a written certification as authorized under the Mississippi Medical Cannabis Act and in compliance with rules and regulations adopted thereunder shall not be subject to any disciplinary action under this section solely due to providing the written certification. SECTION 47.  Section 73-21-85, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 73-21-85.  (1)  To obtain a license to engage in the practice of pharmacy by examination, or by score transfer, the applicant shall: (a)  Have submitted a written application on the form prescribed by the board; * * *  (b)  Be of good moral character; ( * * *cb)  Have graduated from a school or college of pharmacy accredited by the Accreditation Council for Pharmacy Education and have been granted a pharmacy degree therefrom; ( * * *dc)  Have successfully passed an examination approved by the board; ( * * *ed)  Have paid all fees specified by the board for examination, not to exceed the cost to the board of administering the examination; ( * * *fe)  Have paid all fees specified by the board for licensure; and ( * * *gf)  Have submitted evidence of externship and/or internship as specified by the board. (2)  To obtain a license to engage in the practice of pharmacy, a foreign pharmacy graduate applicant shall obtain the National Association of Boards of Pharmacy's Foreign Pharmacy Graduate Examination Committee's certification, which shall include, but not be limited to, successfully passing the Foreign Pharmacy Graduate Equivalency Examination and attaining a total score of at least five hundred fifty (550) on the Test of English as a Foreign Language (TOEFL), and shall: (a)  Have submitted a written application on the form prescribed by the board; * * *  (b)  Be of good moral character; ( * * *cb)  Have graduated and been granted a pharmacy degree from a college or school of pharmacy recognized and approved by the National Association of Boards of Pharmacy's Foreign Pharmacy Graduate Examination Committee; ( * * *dc)  Have paid all fees specified by the board for examination, not to exceed the cost to the board of administering the examination; ( * * *ed)  Have successfully passed an examination approved by the board; ( * * *fe)  Have completed the number of internship hours as set forth by regulations of the board; and ( * * *gf)  Have paid all fees specified by the board for licensure. (3)  Each application or filing made under this section shall include the social security number(s) of the applicant in accordance with Section 93-11-64. (4)  * * *To ensure that all applicants are of good moral character, The board shall conduct a criminal history records check on all applicants for a license.  In order to determine the applicant's suitability for licensing, the applicant shall be fingerprinted.  The board shall submit the fingerprints to the Department of Public Safety for a check of the state criminal records and forward to the Federal Bureau of Investigation for a check of the national criminal records.  The Department of Public Safety shall disseminate the results of the state check and the national check to the board for a suitability determination as provided in the Fresh Start Act.  The board shall be authorized to collect from the applicant the amount of the fee that the Department of Public Safety charges the board for the fingerprinting, whether manual or electronic, and the state and national criminal history records checks. (5)  * * *To ensure that all applicants are of good moral character, The board, upon request of the dean of a school of pharmacy in Mississippi, shall be authorized to conduct a criminal history records check on all applicants for enrollment into the school of pharmacy.  In order to determine the applicant's suitability for enrollment and licensing, the applicant shall be fingerprinted.  The board shall submit the fingerprints to the Department of Public Safety for a check of the state criminal records and forward to the Federal Bureau of Investigation for a check of the national criminal records.  The Department of Public Safety shall disseminate the results of the state check and the national check to the board for a suitability determination as provided in the Fresh Start Act, and the board shall forward the results to the dean of the school of pharmacy.  The board shall be authorized to collect from the applicant the amount of the fee that the Department of Public Safety charges the board for the fingerprinting, whether manual or electronic, and the state and national criminal history records checks. SECTION 48.  Section 73-21-87, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 73-21-87.  (1)  To obtain a license to engage in the practice of pharmacy by reciprocity or license transfer, the applicant shall: (a)  Have submitted a written application on the form prescribed by the board; * * *  (b)  Be of good moral character; ( * * *cb)  Have possessed at the time of initial licensure as a pharmacist such other qualifications necessary to have been eligible for licensure at that time in that state; ( * * *dc)  Have presented to the board proof that any license or licenses granted to the applicant by any other states have not been suspended, revoked, cancelled or otherwise restricted for any reason except nonrenewal or the failure to obtain required continuing education credits; and ( * * *ed)  Have paid all fees specified by the board for licensure. (2)  No applicant shall be eligible for licensure by reciprocity or license transfer unless the state in which the applicant was initially licensed also grants a reciprocal license or transfer license to pharmacists licensed by this state under like circumstances and conditions. (3)  The issuance of a license by reciprocity to a military-trained applicant, military spouse or person who establishes residence in this state shall be subject to the provisions of Section 73-50-1 or 73-50-2, as applicable. (4)  Each application or filing made under this section shall include the social security number(s) of the applicant in accordance with Section 93-11-64. SECTION 49.  Section 73-21-97, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 73-21-97.  (1)  The board may refuse to issue or renew, or may suspend, reprimand, revoke or restrict the license, registration or permit of any person, or may impose a monetary penalty, upon one or more of the following grounds: (a)  Unprofessional conduct as defined by the rules and regulations of the board; (b)  Incapacity of a nature that prevents a pharmacist or intern/extern from engaging in the practice of pharmacy or a pharmacy technician from engaging in or providing nonjudgmental technical services in the practice of pharmacy with reasonable skill, confidence and safety to the public; (c)  Being found guilty by a court of competent jurisdiction of one or more of the following: (i)  A * * *felony disqualifying crime as provided in the Fresh Start Act; or * * *   (ii)  Any act involving moral turpitude or gross immorality; or ( * * *iiiii)  A violation of pharmacy or drug laws of this state or rules or regulations pertaining thereto, or of statutes, rules or regulations of any other state or the federal government; (d)  Fraud or intentional misrepresentation by a licensee, registrant or permit holder in securing the issuance or renewal of a license or permit; (e)  Engaging or aiding and abetting an individual to engage in the practice of pharmacy without a license; (f)  Violation of any of the provisions of this chapter or rules or regulations adopted pursuant to this chapter; (g)  Failure to comply with lawful orders of the board; (h)  Negligently or willfully acting in a manner inconsistent with the health or safety of the public; (i)  Addiction to or dependence on alcohol or controlled substances or the unauthorized use or possession of controlled substances; (j)  Misappropriation of any prescription drug; (k)  Being found guilty by the licensing agency in another state of violating the statutes, rules or regulations of that jurisdiction; (l)  The unlawful or unauthorized possession of a controlled substance; (m)  Willful failure to submit drug monitoring information or willful submission of incorrect dispensing information as required by the Prescription Monitoring Program under Section 73-21-127; (n)  Failure to obtain the license, registration or permit required by this chapter; or (o)  Violation(s) of the provisions of Sections 41-121-1 through 41-121-9 relating to deceptive advertisement by health care practitioners. (2)  In lieu of suspension, revocation or restriction of a license, registration or permit as provided for above, the board may warn, reprimand or issue a citation to the offending licensee, registrant or permit holder. (3)  In addition to the grounds specified in subsection (1) of this section, the board shall be authorized to suspend the license, registration or permit of any person for being out of compliance with an order for support, as defined in Section 93-11-153. The procedure for suspension of a license, registration or permit for being out of compliance with an order for support, and the procedure for the reissuance or reinstatement of a license, registration or permit suspended for that purpose, and the payment of any fees for the reissuance or reinstatement of a license, registration or permit suspended for that purpose, shall be governed by Section 93-11-157 or 93-11-163, as the case may be.  If there is any conflict between any provision of Section 93-11-157 or 93-11-163 and any provision of this chapter, the provisions of Section 93-11-157 or 93-11-163, as the case may be, shall control. SECTION 50.  Section 73-21-111, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 73-21-111.  (1)  The board shall make, adopt, amend and repeal, from time to time, such rules and regulations for the regulation of supportive personnel as may be deemed necessary by the board. (2)  Every person who acts or serves as a pharmacy technician in a pharmacy that is located in this state and permitted by the board shall obtain a registration from the board.  To obtain a pharmacy technician registration the applicant must: (a)  Have submitted a written application on a form(s) prescribed by the board; and * * *  (b)  Be of good moral character; and ( * * *cb)  Have paid the initial registration fee not to exceed One Hundred Dollars ($100.00). (3)  Each pharmacy technician shall renew his or her registration annually.  To renew his or her registration, a technician must: (a)  Submit an application on a form prescribed by the board; and (b)  Pay a renewal fee not to exceed One Hundred Dollars ($100.00) for each annual registration period.  The board may add a surcharge of not more than Five Dollars ($5.00) to the registration renewal fee to assist in funding a program that assists impaired pharmacists, pharmacy students and pharmacy technicians. (4)  * * *To ensure that all applicants are of good moral character, The board shall conduct a criminal history records check on all applicants for a license.  In order to determine the applicant's suitability for licensing, the applicant shall be fingerprinted.  The board shall submit the fingerprints to the Department of Public Safety for a check of the state criminal records and forward to the Federal Bureau of Investigation for a check of the national criminal records.  The Department of Public Safety shall disseminate the results of the state check and the national check to the board for a suitability determination as provided in the Fresh Start Act.  The board shall be authorized to collect from the applicant the amount of the fee that the Department of Public Safety charges the board for the fingerprinting, whether manual or electronic, and the state and national criminal history records checks. SECTION 51.  Section 73-21-126, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 73-21-126.  (1)  The State Board of Pharmacy shall promulgate rules regarding the issuance and renewal of licenses and permits for new or renewal application requirements for both in- and out-of-state persons, businesses and entities owning or shipping into, within or out of Mississippi.  Requirements for new and/or renewal applications, if information has not been previously provided to the board, will include, but not be limited to, the following: (a)  Type of ownership (individual, partnership or corporation); (b)  Names of principal owners or officers and social security numbers; (c)  Names of designated representatives and social security numbers; (d)  Criminal background checks of applicants and designated representatives as required by rule; (e)  Copy of license in home state; (f)  Bond requirements. (2)  * * *To ensure that all applicants are of good moral character, The board shall conduct a criminal history records check on all applicants for a license.  In order to determine the applicant's suitability for licensing, the applicant shall be fingerprinted.  The board shall submit the fingerprints to the Department of Public Safety for a check of the state criminal records and forward to the Federal Bureau of Investigation for a check of the national criminal records.  The Department of Public Safety shall disseminate the results of the state check and the national check to the board for a suitability determination as provided in the Fresh Start Act.  The board shall be authorized to collect from the applicant the amount of the fee that the Department of Public Safety charges the board for the fingerprinting, whether manual or electronic, and the state and national criminal history records checks. (3)  The board is authorized to use an outside agency to accredit all persons, businesses and facilities licensed or permitted with the board, including the National Association of Boards of Pharmacy's (NABP) Drug Distributor Accreditation. SECTION 52.  Section 73-23-47, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 73-23-47.  (1)  Any person who desires to be licensed under this chapter must:  (a) * * *be of good moral character; (b) have graduated from a physical therapy or physical therapist assistant program, as the case may be, accredited by an agency recognized by the United States Department of Education, Office on Postsecondary Education; and ( * * *cb) pay a nonrefundable examination fee as set by the board; ( * * *dc) pay an application fee, no part of which shall be refunded; ( * * *ed) be examined for licensure by the board; and (e) meet the requirements established by the rules of the board.  The licensure examination for physical therapists and for physical therapist assistants shall be selected by the board and may also include an oral examination or practical examination or both at the discretion of the board. (2)  Any person who desires to exercise the privilege to practice under the Physical Therapy Licensure Compact must complete the terms and provisions of the compact as prescribed in Section 73-23-101. (3)  Each application or filing made under this section shall include the social security number(s) of the applicant in accordance with Section 93-11-64. SECTION 53.  Section 73-23-51, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 73-23-51.  (1)  The board may license as a physical therapist or as a physical therapist assistant, and furnish a certificate of licensure without examination to, any applicant who presents evidence, satisfactory to the board, of having passed an examination before a similar lawfully authorized examining agency or board in physical therapy of another state or the District of Columbia, if the standards for registration in physical therapy or for licensure as a physical therapist assistant in such other state or district are determined by the board to be as high as those of this state.  The issuance of a license by reciprocity to a military-trained applicant, military spouse or person who establishes residence in this state shall be subject to the provisions of Section 73-50-1 or 73-50-2, as applicable. (2)  Any person who has been trained as a physical therapist in a foreign country and desires to be licensed under this chapter and who:  (a) * * *is of good moral character; (b) holds a diploma from an educational program for physical therapists approved by the board; ( * * *cb) submits documentary evidence to the board that he has completed a course of professional instruction substantially equivalent to that obtained by an applicant for licensure; ( * * *dc) demonstrates satisfactory proof of proficiency in the English language; and ( * * *ed) meets other requirements established by rules of the board, may make application on a form furnished by the board for examination as a foreign-trained physical therapist.  At the time of making such application, the applicant shall pay the fee prescribed by the board, no portion of which shall be returned. Any person who desires to be licensed under this subsection shall take an examination approved by the board and shall obtain a permanent license.  If this requirement is not met, the license of the foreign-trained therapist may be revoked. SECTION 54.  Section 73-23-59, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 73-23-59.  (1)  Licensees subject to this chapter shall conduct their activities, services and practice in accordance with this chapter and any rules promulgated pursuant hereto.  The board, upon satisfactory proof and in accordance with the provisions of this chapter and the regulations of the board, may suspend, revoke, or refuse to issue or renew any license hereunder, or revoke or suspend any privilege to practice,  censure or reprimand any licensee, restrict or limit a license, and take any other action in relation to a license or privilege to practice as the board may deem proper under the circumstances upon any of the following grounds: (a)  Negligence in the practice or performance of professional services or activities; (b)  Engaging in dishonorable, unethical or unprofessional conduct of a character likely to deceive, defraud or harm the public in the course of professional services or activities; (c)  Perpetrating or cooperating in fraud or material deception in obtaining or renewing a license or attempting the same or obtaining a privilege to practice; (d)  Being convicted of * * * any a crime * * * which has a substantial relationship to the licensee's activities and services or an essential element of which is if misstatement, fraud or dishonesty is an essential element of the crime; (e)  Having been convicted of or pled guilty to a * * *felony disqualifying crime as provided in the Fresh Start Act in the courts of this state or any other state, territory or country.  Conviction, as used in this paragraph, shall include a deferred conviction, deferred prosecution, deferred sentence, finding or verdict of guilt, an admission of guilty, or a plea of nolo contendere; (f)  Engaging in or permitting the performance of unacceptable services personally or by others working under the licensee's supervision due to the licensee's deliberate or negligent act or acts or failure to act, regardless of whether actual damage or damages to the public is established; (g)  Continued practice although the licensee has become unfit to practice as a physical therapist or physical therapist assistant due to:  (i) failure to keep abreast of current professional theory or practice; or (ii) physical or mental disability; the entry of an order or judgment by a court of competent jurisdiction that a licensee is in need of mental treatment or is incompetent shall constitute mental disability; or (iii) addiction or severe dependency upon alcohol or other drugs which may endanger the public by impairing the licensee's ability to practice; (h)  Having disciplinary action taken against the licensee's license in another state; (i)  Making differential, detrimental treatment against any person because of race, color, creed, sex, religion or national origin; (j)  Engaging in lewd conduct in connection with professional services or activities; (k)  Engaging in false or misleading advertising; (l)  Contracting, assisting or permitting unlicensed persons to perform services for which a license is required under this chapter or privilege to practice is required under Section 73-23-101; (m)  Violation of any probation requirements placed on a license or privilege to practice by the board; (n)  Revealing confidential information except as may be required by law; (o)  Failing to inform clients of the fact that the client no longer needs the services or professional assistance of the licensee; (p)  Charging excessive or unreasonable fees or engaging in unreasonable collection practices; (q)  For treating or attempting to treat ailments or other health conditions of human beings other than by physical therapy as authorized by this chapter; (r)  Except as authorized in Section 73-23-35(3) and (4), for applying or offering to apply physical therapy, exclusive of initial evaluation or screening and exclusive of education or consultation for the prevention of physical and mental disability within the scope of physical therapy, other than upon the referral from a licensed physician, dentist, osteopath, podiatrist, chiropractor, physician assistant or nurse practitioner; or for acting as a physical therapist assistant other than under the direct, on-site supervision of a licensed physical therapist; (s)  Failing to adhere to the recognized standards of ethics of the physical therapy profession as established by rules of the board; (t)  Failing to complete continuing competence requirements as established by board rule; (u)  Failing to supervise physical therapist assistants in accordance with this chapter and/or board rules; (v)  Engaging in sexual misconduct.  For the purpose of this paragraph, sexual misconduct includes, but is not necessarily limited to: (i)  Engaging in or soliciting sexual relationships, whether consensual or nonconsensual, while a physical therapist or physical therapist assistant/patient relationship exists. (ii)  Making sexual advances, requesting sexual favors or engaging in other verbal conduct or physical contact of a sexual nature with patients or clients. (iii) Intentionally viewing a completely or partially disrobed patient in the course of treatment if the viewing is not related to patient diagnosis or treatment under current practice standards; (w)  The erroneous issuance of a license or privilege to practice to any person; (x)  Violations of any provisions of this chapter, board rules or regulations or a written order or directive of the board; (y)  Failing to maintain adequate patient records.  For the purposes of this paragraph, "adequate patient records" means legible records that contain at minimum sufficient information to identify the patient, an evaluation of objective findings, a diagnosis, a plan of care, a treatment record and a discharge plan; (z)  Failing to report to the board any unprofessional, incompetent or illegal acts that appear to be in violation of this law or any rules established by the board. (2)  The board may order a licensee to submit to a reasonable physical or mental examination if the licensee's physical or mental capacity to practice safely is at issue in a disciplinary proceeding. (3)  Failure to comply with a board order to submit to a physical or mental examination shall render a licensee subject to the summary suspension procedures described in Section 73-23-64. (4)  In addition to the reasons specified in subsection (1) of this section, the board shall be authorized to suspend the license or privilege to practice of any licensee for being out of compliance with an order for support, as defined in Section 93-11-153. The procedure for suspension of a license or privilege to practice for being out of compliance with an order for support, and the procedure for the reissuance or reinstatement of a license or privilege to practice suspended for that purpose, and the payment of any fees for the reissuance or reinstatement of a license or privilege to practice suspended for that purpose, shall be governed by Section 93-11-157 or 93-11-163, as the case may be.  If there is any conflict between any provision of Section 93-11-157 or 93-11-163 and any provision of this chapter, the provisions of Section 93-11-157 or 93-11-163, as the case may be, shall control. SECTION 55.  Section 73-24-19, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 73-24-19.  (1)  An applicant applying for a license as an occupational therapist or as an occupational therapy assistant shall file a written application on forms provided by the board, showing to the satisfaction of the board that he or she meets the following requirements: * * *(a)  Is of good moral character; ( * * *ba)  Has been awarded a degree from an education program in occupational therapy recognized by the board, with a concentration of instruction in basic human sciences, the human development process, occupational tasks and activities, the health-illness-health continuum, and occupational therapy theory and practice: (i)  For an occupational therapist, such program shall be accredited by the Accreditation Council for Occupational Therapy Education of the American Occupational Therapy Association or the board-recognized accrediting body; (ii)  For an occupational therapy assistant, such a program shall be accredited by the Accreditation Council for Occupational Therapy Education of the American Occupational Therapy Association or the board-recognized accrediting body; ( * * *cb)  Has successfully completed a period of supervised fieldwork experience at a recognized educational institution or a training program approved by the educational institution where he or she met the academic requirements: (i)  For an occupational therapist, the required supervised fieldwork experience shall meet current national standards that are published annually by the board; (ii)  For an occupational therapy assistant, the required supervised fieldwork experience shall meet national standards that are published annually by the board. (2)  The board shall approve an examination for occupational therapists and an examination for occupational therapy assistants that will be used as the examination for licensure. (3)  Any person applying for licensure shall, in addition to demonstrating his or her eligibility in accordance with the requirements of this section, make application to the board for review of proof of his or her eligibility for certification by the National Board for Certification in Occupational Therapy, Inc. (NBCOT), or its successor organization, on a form and in such a manner as the board shall prescribe.  The application shall be accompanied by the fee fixed in accordance with the provisions of Section 73-24-29.  The board shall establish standards for acceptable performance on the examination.  A person who fails an examination may apply for reexamination upon payment of the prescribed fee. (4)  Applicants for licensure shall be examined at a time and place and under such supervision as the board may require.  The board shall give reasonable public notice of these examinations in accordance with its rules and regulations. (5)  An applicant may be licensed as an occupational therapist if he or she:  (a) has practiced as an occupational therapy assistant for four (4) years, (b) has completed the requirements of a period of six (6) months of supervised fieldwork experience at a recognized educational institution or a training program approved by a recognized accredited educational institution before January 1, 1988, and (c) has passed the examination for occupational therapists. (6)  An applicant applying for a compact privilege to practice as an occupational therapist or as an occupational therapy assistant must meet the requirements set out in the Occupational Therapy Licensure Compact provided for in Section 73-24-51. (7)  Each application or filing made under this section shall include the social security number(s) of the applicant in accordance with Section 93-11-64. SECTION 56.  Section 73-24-21, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 73-24-21.  (1)  The board shall grant a license to any person certified prior to July 1, 1988, as an Occupational Therapist Registered (OTR) or a Certified Occupational Therapy Assistant (COTA) by the American Occupational Therapy Association (AOTA).  The board may waive the examination, education or experience requirements and grant a license to any person certified by AOTA after July 1, 1988, if the board determines the requirements for such certification are equivalent to the requirements for licensure in this article. (2)  The board may waive the examination, education or experience requirements and grant a license to any applicant who shall present proof of current licensure as an occupational therapist or occupational therapy assistant in another state, the District of Columbia or territory of the United States which requires standards for licensure considered by the board to be equivalent to the requirements for licensure of this article.  The issuance of a license by reciprocity to a military-trained applicant, military spouse or person who establishes residence in this state shall be subject to the provisions of Section 73-50-1 or 73-50-2, as applicable. (3)  Foreign-trained occupational therapists and occupational therapy assistants shall satisfy the examination requirements of Section 73-24-19.  The board shall require foreign-trained applicants to furnish proof of * * * good moral character and completion of educational and supervised fieldwork requirements substantially equal to those contained in Section 73-24-19 before taking the examination. SECTION 57.  Section 73-24-24, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 73-24-24.  (1)  Licensees subject to this article shall conduct their activities, services and practice in accordance with this article and any rules promulgated pursuant hereto. Licenses and compact privileges may be subject to the exercise of the disciplinary sanction enumerated in Section 73-24-25 if the board finds that a licensee is guilty of any of the following: (a)  Negligence in the practice or performance of professional services or activities; (b)  Engaging in dishonorable, unethical or unprofessional conduct of a character likely to deceive, defraud or harm the public in the course of professional services or activities; (c)  Perpetrating or cooperating in fraud or material deception in obtaining or renewing a license or compact privilege or attempting the same; (d)  Being convicted of * * * any a crime * * *which has a substantial relationship to the licensee's activities and services or an essential element of which is if misstatement, fraud or dishonesty is an essential element of the crime; (e)  Being convicted of any crime which is a * * *felony disqualifying crime as provided in the Fresh Start Act under the laws of this state or the United States; (f)  Engaging in or permitting the performance of unacceptable services personally or by others working under the licensee's supervision due to the licensee's deliberate or negligent act or acts or failure to act, regardless of whether actual damage or damages to the public is established; (g)  Continued practice although the licensee has become unfit to practice as an occupational therapist or occupational therapist assistant due to:  (i) failure to keep abreast of current professional theory or practice; or (ii) physical or mental disability; the entry of an order or judgment by a court of competent jurisdiction that a licensee is in need of mental treatment or is incompetent shall constitute mental disability; or (iii) addiction or severe dependency upon alcohol or other drugs which may endanger the public by impairing the licensee's ability to practice; (h)  Having disciplinary action taken against the licensee's license or compact privilege in another state; (i)  Making differential, detrimental treatment against any person because of race, color, creed, sex, religion or national origin; (j)  Engaging in lewd conduct in connection with professional services or activities; (k)  Engaging in false or misleading advertising; (l)  Contracting, assisting or permitting unlicensed persons to perform services for which a license or compact privilege is required under this chapter; (m)  Violation of any probation requirements placed on a license or compact privilege by the board; (n)  Revealing confidential information except as may be required by law; (o)  Failing to inform clients of the fact that the client no longer needs the services or professional assistance of the licensee; (p)  Charging excessive or unreasonable fees or engaging in unreasonable collection practices; (q)  For treating or attempting to treat ailments or other health conditions of human beings other than by occupational therapy as authorized by this article; (r)  For practice or activities considered to be unprofessional conduct as defined by the rules and regulations; (s)  Violations of the current codes of conduct for occupational therapists and occupational therapy assistants adopted by the American Occupational Therapy Association; (t)  Violations of any rules or regulations promulgated pursuant to this article. (2)  The board may order a licensee to submit to a reasonable physical or mental examination if the licensee's physical or mental capacity to practice safely is at issue in a disciplinary proceeding. (3)  Failure to comply with a board order to submit to a physical or mental examination shall render a licensee subject to the summary suspension procedures described in Section 73-24-25. SECTION 58.  Section 73-25-3, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 73-25-3.  Every person who desires to obtain a license to practice medicine must apply therefor, in writing, to the State Board of Medical Licensure at least ten (10) days before the date of the examination and must be examined by the board according to the methods deemed by it to be the most practical and expeditious to test the applicants' qualifications.  If the applicant is found by the board, upon examination, to possess sufficient learning in those branches * * * and to be of good moral character, the board shall issue him a license to practice medicine; however, no applicant shall be granted a license unless the applicant holds a diploma from a reputable medical college or college of osteopathic medicine that requires a four-year course of at least thirty-two (32) weeks for each session, or its equivalent. To qualify for a Mississippi medical license, an applicant must have successfully been cleared for licensure through an investigation that shall consist of a * * *determination as to good moral character and verification that the prospective licensee is not guilty of or in violation of any statutory ground for denial of licensure as set forth in Sections 73-25-29 and 73-25-83.  To assist the board in conducting its licensure investigation, all applicants shall undergo a fingerprint-based criminal history records check of the Mississippi central criminal database and the Federal Bureau of Investigation criminal history database.  Each applicant shall submit a full set of the applicant's fingerprints in a form and manner prescribed by the board, which shall be forwarded to the Mississippi Department of Public Safety (department) and the Federal Bureau of Investigation Identification Division for this purpose. Any and all state or national criminal history records information obtained by the board that is not already a matter of public record shall be deemed nonpublic and confidential information restricted to the exclusive use of the board, its members, officers, investigators, agents and attorneys in evaluating the applicant's eligibility or disqualification for licensure, and shall be exempt from the Mississippi Public Records Act of 1983.  Except when introduced into evidence in a hearing before the board to determine licensure, no such information or records related thereto shall, except with the written consent of the applicant or by order of a court of competent jurisdiction, be released or otherwise disclosed by the board to any other person or agency. The board shall provide to the department the fingerprints of the applicant, any additional information that may be required by the department, and a form signed by the applicant consenting to the check of the criminal records and to the use of the fingerprints and other identifying information required by the state or national repositories. The board shall charge and collect from the applicant, in addition to all other applicable fees and costs, such amount as may be incurred by the board in requesting and obtaining state and national criminal history records information on the applicant. This section shall not apply to applicants for a special volunteer medical license authorized under Section 73-25-18. SECTION 59.  Section 73-25-14, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 73-25-14.  (1)  Except as provided in Section 33-1-39, the license of every person licensed to practice medicine or osteopathy in the State of Mississippi shall be renewed annually. On or before May 1 of each year, the State Board of Medical Licensure shall mail a notice of renewal of license to every physician or osteopath to whom a license was issued or renewed during the current licensing year.  The notice shall provide instructions for obtaining and submitting applications for renewal.  The State Board of Medical Licensure is authorized to make applications for renewal available via electronic means.  The applicant shall obtain and complete the application and submit it to the board in the manner prescribed by the board in the notice before June 30 with the renewal fee of an amount established by the board, but not to exceed Three Hundred Dollars ($300.00), a portion of which fee shall be used to support a program to aid impaired physicians and osteopaths.  The payment of the annual license renewal fee shall be optional with all physicians over the age of seventy (70) years.  Upon receipt of the application and fee, the board shall verify the accuracy of the application and issue to applicant a certificate of renewal for the ensuing year, beginning July 1 and expiring June 30 of the succeeding calendar year.  That renewal shall render the holder thereof a legal practitioner as stated on the renewal form. (2)  Any physician or osteopath practicing in Mississippi who allows his or her license to lapse by failing to renew the license as provided in subsection (1) may be reinstated by the board on satisfactory explanation for the failure to renew, by completion of a reinstatement form, and upon payment of the renewal fee for the current year, and shall be assessed a fine of Twenty-five Dollars ($25.00) plus an additional fine of Five Dollars ($5.00) for each month thereafter that the license renewal remains delinquent. (3)  Any physician or osteopath not practicing in Mississippi who allows his or her license to lapse by failing to renew the license as provided in subsection (1) may be reinstated by the board on satisfactory explanation for the failure to renew, by completion of a reinstatement form and upon payment of the arrearages for the previous five (5) years and the renewal fee for the current year. (4)  Any physician or osteopath who allows his or her license to lapse shall be notified by the board within thirty (30) days of that lapse. (5)  Any person practicing as a licensed physician or osteopath during the time his or her license has lapsed shall be considered an illegal practitioner and shall be subject to penalties provided for violation of the Medical Practice Act, if he or she had not submitted the required reinstatement form and fee within fifteen (15) days after notification by the board of the lapse. (6)  Any physician or osteopath practicing in the State of Mississippi whose license has lapsed and is deemed an illegal practitioner under subsection (5) of this section may petition the board for reinstatement of his or her license on a retroactive basis, if the physician or osteopath was unable to meet the June 30 deadline due to extraordinary or other legitimate reasons, and retroactive reinstatement of licensure shall be granted or may be denied by the board only for good cause.  Failure to advise the board of change of address shall not be considered a basis of reinstatement. (7)  None of the fees or fines provided for in this section shall be applicable to the renewal of a special volunteer medical license authorized under Section 73-25-18. (8)  Fees collected under the provisions of this section shall be used by the board to defray expenses of administering the licensure provisions of the Medical Practice Act (Title 73, Chapter 25, Mississippi Code of 1972) and to support a program to aid impaired physicians and osteopaths in an amount determined by the board. (9)  In order for a physician or osteopath whose medical license has been expired for five (5) years or more to qualify for reinstatement of license, the physician or osteopath must have successfully been cleared for reinstatement through an investigation that shall consist of a * * *determination as to good moral character and verification that the prospective licensee is not guilty of or in violation of any statutory ground for denial of licensure as set forth in Sections 73-25-29 and 73-25-83.  To assist the board in conducting its licensure investigation, all applicants shall undergo a fingerprint-based criminal history records check of the Mississippi central criminal database and the Federal Bureau of Investigation criminal history database.  Each applicant shall submit a full set of the applicant's fingerprints in a form and manner prescribed by the board, which shall be forwarded to the Mississippi Department of Public Safety (department) and the Federal Bureau of Investigation Identification Division for this purpose. Any and all state or national criminal history records information obtained by the board that is not already a matter of public record shall be deemed nonpublic and confidential information restricted to the exclusive use of the board, its members, officers, investigators, agents and attorneys in evaluating the applicant's eligibility or disqualification for licensure, and shall be exempt from the Mississippi Public Records Act of 1983.  Except when introduced into evidence in a hearing before the board to determine licensure, no such information or records related thereto shall, except with the written consent of the applicant or by order of a court of competent jurisdiction, be released or otherwise disclosed by the board to any other person or agency. The board shall provide to the department the fingerprints of the applicant, any additional information that may be required by the department, and a form signed by the applicant consenting to the check of the criminal records and to the use of the fingerprints and other identifying information required by the state or national repositories. The board shall charge and collect from the applicant, in addition to all other applicable fees and costs, such amount as may be incurred by the board in requesting and obtaining state and national criminal history records information on the applicant. SECTION 60.  Section 73-25-29, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 73-25-29.  The grounds for the nonissuance, suspension, revocation or restriction of a license or the denial of reinstatement or renewal of a license are: (1)  Habitual personal use of narcotic drugs, or any other drug having addiction-forming or addiction-sustaining liability. (2)  Habitual use of intoxicating liquors, or any beverage, to an extent which affects professional competency. (3)  Administering, dispensing or prescribing any narcotic drug, or any other drug having addiction-forming or addiction-sustaining liability otherwise than in the course of legitimate professional practice. (4)  Conviction of violation of any federal or state law regulating the possession, distribution or use of any narcotic drug or any drug considered a controlled substance under state or federal law, a certified copy of the conviction order or judgment rendered by the trial court being prima facie evidence thereof, notwithstanding the pendency of any appeal. (5)  Procuring, or attempting to procure, or aiding in, an abortion that is not medically indicated. (6)  Conviction of a * * *felony or misdemeanor involving moral turpitude disqualifying crime as provided in the Fresh Start Act, a certified copy of the conviction order or judgment rendered by the trial court being prima facie evidence thereof, notwithstanding the pendency of any appeal. (7)  Obtaining or attempting to obtain a license by fraud or deception. (8)  Unprofessional conduct, which includes, but is not limited to: (a)  Practicing medicine under a false or assumed name or impersonating another practitioner, living or dead. (b)  Knowingly performing any act which in any way assists an unlicensed person to practice medicine. (c)  Making or willfully causing to be made any flamboyant claims concerning the licensee's professional excellence. (d)  Being guilty of any dishonorable or unethical conduct likely to deceive, defraud or harm the public. (e)  Obtaining a fee as personal compensation or gain from a person on fraudulent representation of a disease or injury condition generally considered incurable by competent medical authority in the light of current scientific knowledge and practice can be cured or offering, undertaking, attempting or agreeing to cure or treat the same by a secret method, which he refuses to divulge to the board upon request. (f)  Use of any false, fraudulent or forged statement or document, or the use of any fraudulent, deceitful, dishonest or immoral practice in connection with any of the licensing requirements, including the signing in his professional capacity any certificate that is known to be false at the time he makes or signs such certificate. (g)  Failing to identify a physician's school of practice in all professional uses of his name by use of his earned degree or a description of his school of practice. (9)  The refusal of a licensing authority of another state or jurisdiction to issue or renew a license, permit or certificate to practice medicine in that jurisdiction or the revocation, suspension or other restriction imposed on a license, permit or certificate issued by such licensing authority which prevents or restricts practice in that jurisdiction, a certified copy of the disciplinary order or action taken by the other state or jurisdiction being prima facie evidence thereof, notwithstanding the pendency of any appeal. (10)  Surrender of a license or authorization to practice medicine in another state or jurisdiction or surrender of membership on any medical staff or in any medical or professional association or society while under disciplinary investigation by any of those authorities or bodies for acts or conduct similar to acts or conduct which would constitute grounds for action as defined in this section. (11)  Final sanctions imposed by the United States Department of Health and Human Services, Office of Inspector General or any successor federal agency or office, based upon a finding of incompetency, gross misconduct or failure to meet professionally recognized standards of health care; a certified copy of the notice of final sanction being prima facie evidence thereof.  As used in this paragraph, the term "final sanction" means the written notice to a physician from the United States Department of Health and Human Services, Officer of Inspector General or any successor federal agency or office, which implements the exclusion. (12)  Failure to furnish the board, its investigators or representatives information legally requested by the board. (13)  Violation of any provision(s) of the Medical Practice Act or the rules and regulations of the board or of any order, stipulation or agreement with the board. (14)  Violation(s) of the provisions of Sections 41-121-1 through 41-121-9 relating to deceptive advertisement by health care practitioners. (15)  Performing or inducing an abortion on a woman in violation of any provision of Sections 41-41-131 through 41-41-145. (16)  Performing an abortion on a pregnant woman after determining that the unborn human individual that the pregnant woman is carrying has a detectable fetal heartbeat as provided in Section 41-41-34.1. (17)  Violation(s) of any provision of Title 41, Chapter 141, Mississippi Code of 1972. In addition to the grounds specified above, the board shall be authorized to suspend the license of any licensee for being out of compliance with an order for support, as defined in Section 93-11-153.  The procedure for suspension of a license for being out of compliance with an order for support, and the procedure for the reissuance or reinstatement of a license suspended for that purpose, and the payment of any fees for the reissuance or reinstatement of a license suspended for that purpose, shall be governed by Section 93-11-157 or 93-11-163, as the case may be.  If there is any conflict between any provision of Section 93-11-157 or 93-11-163 and any provision of this chapter, the provisions of Section 93-11-157 or 93-11-163, as the case may be, shall control. A physician who provides a written certification as authorized under the Mississippi Medical Cannabis Act and in compliance with rules and regulations adopted thereunder shall not be subject to any disciplinary action under this section solely due to providing the written certification. SECTION 61.  Section 73-25-32, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 73-25-32.  (1)  A person whose license to practice medicine or osteopathy has been revoked or suspended may petition the Mississippi State Board of Medical Licensure to reinstate this license after a period of not less than one (1) year has elapsed from the date of the revocation or suspension.  The procedure for the reinstatement of a license that is suspended for being out of compliance with an order for support, as defined in Section 93-11-153, shall be governed by Section 93-11-157 or 93-11-163, as the case may be. (2)  The petition shall be accompanied by two (2) or more verified recommendations from physicians or osteopaths licensed by the Board of Medical Licensure to which the petition is addressed and by two (2) or more recommendations from citizens each having personal knowledge of the activities of the petitioner since the disciplinary penalty was imposed and such facts as may be required by the Board of Medical Licensure. The petition may be heard at the next regular meeting of the Board of Medical Licensure but not earlier than thirty (30) days after the petition was filed.  No petition shall be considered while the petitioner is under sentence for any criminal offense, including any period during which he is under probation or parole. The hearing may be continued from time to time as the Board of Medical Licensure finds necessary. (3)  In determining whether the disciplinary penalty should be set aside and the terms and conditions, if any, that should be imposed if the disciplinary penalty is set aside, the Board of Medical Licensure may investigate and consider all activities of the petitioner since the disciplinary action was taken against him, the offense for which he was disciplined, his activity during the time his certificate was in good standing, his general reputation for truth * * *, and professional ability * * * and good character; and it may require the petitioner to pass an oral examination. (4)  The investigation shall require the petitioner to undergo a fingerprint-based criminal history records check of the Mississippi central criminal database and the Federal Bureau of Investigation criminal history database.  Each petitioner shall submit a full set of the petitioner's fingerprints in a form and manner prescribed by the board, which shall be forwarded to the Mississippi Department of Public Safety (department) and the Federal Bureau of Investigation Identification Division for this purpose. Any and all state or national criminal history records information obtained by the board that is not already a matter of public record shall be deemed nonpublic and confidential information restricted to the exclusive use of the board, its members, officers, investigators, agents and attorneys in evaluating the applicant's eligibility or disqualification for licensure, and shall be exempt from the Mississippi Public Records Act of 1983.  Except when introduced into evidence in a hearing before the board to determine licensure, no such information or records related thereto shall, except with the written consent of the applicant or by order of a court of competent jurisdiction, be released or otherwise disclosed by the board to any other person or agency. The board shall provide to the department the fingerprints of the petitioner, any additional information that may be required by the department, and a form signed by the petitioner consenting to the check of the criminal records and to the use of the fingerprints and other identifying information required by the state or national repositories. The board shall charge and collect from the petitioner, in addition to all other applicable fees and costs, such amount as may be incurred by the board in requesting and obtaining state and national criminal history records information on the applicant. (5)  The Secretary-Treasurer of the Board of Medical Licensure shall enter into his records of the case all actions of the board in setting aside a disciplinary penalty under this section and he shall certify notices to the proper court clerk.  The clerk shall make such changes on his records as may be necessary. SECTION 62.  Section 73-25-101, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 73-25-101.  The Interstate Medical Licensure Compact is enacted into law and entered into by this state with any and all states legally joining in the Compact in accordance with its terms, in the form substantially as follows: INTERSTATE MEDICAL LICENSURE COMPACT SECTION 1 Purpose In order to strengthen access to health care, and in recognition of the advances in the delivery of health care, the member states of the Interstate Medical Licensure Compact have allied in common purpose to develop a comprehensive process that complements the existing licensing and regulatory authority of state medical boards, provides a streamlined process that allows physicians to become licensed in multiple states, thereby enhancing the portability of a medical license and ensuring the safety of patients.  The Compact creates another pathway for licensure and does not otherwise change a state's existing Medical Practice Act.  The Compact also adopts the prevailing standard for licensure and affirms that the practice of medicine occurs where the patient is located at the time of the physician-patient encounter, and therefore, requires the physician to be under the jurisdiction of the state medical board where the patient is located.  State medical boards that participate in the Compact retain the jurisdiction to impose an adverse action against a license to practice medicine in that state issued to a physician through the procedures in the Compact. SECTION 2 Definitions In this Compact: (a) "Bylaws" means those bylaws established by the Interstate Commission pursuant to Section 11 for its governance, or for directing and controlling its actions and conduct. (b) "Commissioner" means the voting representative appointed by each member board pursuant to Section 11. (c) "Conviction" means a finding by a court that an individual is guilty of a criminal offense through adjudication, or entry of a plea of guilt or no contest to the charge by the offender.  Evidence of an entry of a conviction of a criminal offense by the court shall be considered final for purposes of disciplinary action by a member board. (d) "Expedited license" means a full and unrestricted medical license granted by a member state to an eligible physician through the process set forth in the Compact. (e) "Interstate Commission" means the interstate commission created pursuant to Section 11. (f) "License" means authorization by a state for a physician to engage in the practice of medicine, which would be unlawful without the authorization. (g)  "Medical Practice Act" means laws and regulations governing the practice of allopathic and osteopathic medicine within a member state. (h) "Member board" means a state agency in a member state that acts in the sovereign interests of the state by protecting the public through licensure, regulation, and education of physicians as directed by the state government. (i) "Member state" means a state that has enacted the Compact. (j) "Practice of medicine" means the clinical prevention, diagnosis, or treatment of human disease, injury, or condition requiring a physician to obtain and maintain a license in compliance with the Medical Practice Act of a member state. (k) "Physician" means any person who: (1) Is a graduate of a medical school accredited by the Liaison Committee on Medical Education, the Commission on Osteopathic College Accreditation, or a medical school listed in the International Medical Education Directory or its equivalent; (2) Passed each component of the United States Medical Licensing Examination (USMLE) or the Comprehensive Osteopathic Medical Licensing Examination (COMLEX-USA) within three (3) attempts, or any of its predecessor examinations accepted by a state medical board as an equivalent examination for licensure purposes; (3) Successfully completed graduate medical education approved by the Accreditation Council for Graduate Medical Education or the American Osteopathic Association; (4) Holds specialty certification or a time-unlimited specialty certificate recognized by the American Board of Medical Specialties or the American Osteopathic Association's Bureau of Osteopathic Specialists; (5)  Possesses a full and unrestricted license to engage in the practice of medicine issued by a member board; (6) Has never been convicted, received adjudication, deferred adjudication, community supervision, or deferred disposition for any offense by a court of appropriate jurisdiction; (7) Has never held a license authorizing the practice of medicine subjected to discipline by a licensing agency in any state, federal, or foreign jurisdiction, excluding any action related to nonpayment of fees related to a license; (8) Has never had a controlled substance license or permit suspended or revoked by a state or the United States Drug Enforcement Administration; and (9)  Is not under active investigation by a licensing agency or law enforcement authority in any state, federal, or foreign jurisdiction. (l) "Offense" means a * * *felony, gross misdemeanor, or crime of moral turpitude disqualifying crime as provided in the Fresh Start Act. (m) "Rule" means a written statement by the Interstate Commission promulgated pursuant to Section 12 of the Compact that is of general applicability, implements, interprets, or prescribes a policy or provision of the Compact, or an organizational, procedural, or practice requirement of the Interstate Commission, and has the force and effect of statutory law in a member state, and includes the amendment, repeal, or suspension of an existing rule. (n) "State" means any state, commonwealth, district, or territory of the United States. (o)  "State of principal license" means a member state where a physician holds a license to practice medicine and which has been designated as such by the physician for purposes of registration and participation in the Compact. SECTION 3 Eligibility (a)  A physician must meet the eligibility requirements as defined in Section 2(k) to receive an expedited license under the terms and provisions of the Compact. (b)  A physician who does not meet the requirements of Section 2(k) may obtain a license to practice medicine in a member state if the individual complies with all laws and requirements, other than the Compact, relating to the issuance of a license to practice medicine in that state. SECTION 4 Designation of State of Principal License (a)  A physician shall designate a member state as the state of principal license for purposes of registration for expedited licensure through the Compact if the physician possesses a full and unrestricted license to practice medicine in that state, and the state is: (1) The state of primary residence for the physician, or (2) The state where at least twenty-five percent (25%) of the practice of medicine occurs, or (3) The location of the physician's employer, or (4) If no state qualifies under subsection (1), subsection (2), or subsection (3), the state designated as state of residence for purpose of federal income tax. (b)  A physician may redesignate a member state as state of principal license at any time, as long as the state meets the requirements in subsection (a). (c)  The Interstate Commission is authorized to develop rules to facilitate redesignation of another member state as the state of principal license. SECTION 5 Application and Issuance of Expedited Licensure (a)  A physician seeking licensure through the Compact shall file an application for an expedited license with the member board of the state selected by the physician as the state of principal license. (b) Upon receipt of an application for an expedited license, the member board within the state selected as the state of principal license shall evaluate whether the physician is eligible for expedited licensure and issue a letter of qualification, verifying or denying the physician's eligibility, to the Interstate Commission. (i) Static qualifications, which include verification of medical education, graduate medical education, results of any medical or licensing examination, and other qualifications as determined by the Interstate Commission through rule, shall not be subject to additional primary source verification where already primary source verified by the state of principal license. (ii) The member board within the state selected as the state of principal license shall, in the course of verifying eligibility, perform a criminal background check of an applicant, including the use of the results of fingerprint or other biometric data checks compliant with the requirements of the Federal Bureau of Investigation, with the exception of federal employees who have suitability determination in accordance with United States Code of Federal Regulation Section 731.202. (iii) Appeal on the determination of eligibility shall be made to the member state where the application was filed and shall be subject to the law of that state. (c) Upon verification in subsection (b), physicians eligible for an expedited license shall complete the registration process established by the Interstate Commission to receive a license in a member state selected pursuant to subsection (a), including the payment of any applicable fees. (d) After receiving verification of eligibility under subsection (b) and any fees under subsection (c), a member board shall issue an expedited license to the physician.  This license shall authorize the physician to practice medicine in the issuing state consistent with the Medical Practice Act and all applicable laws and regulations of the issuing member board and member state. (e)  An expedited license shall be valid for a period consistent with the licensure period in the member state and in the same manner as required for other physicians holding a full and unrestricted license within the member state. (f)  An expedited license obtained though the Compact shall be terminated if a physician fails to maintain a license in the state of principal licensure for a nondisciplinary reason, without redesignation of a new state of principal licensure. (g)  The Interstate Commission is authorized to develop rules regarding the application process, including payment of any applicable fees, and the issuance of an expedited license. SECTION 6 Fees for Expedited Licensure (a)  A member state issuing an expedited license authorizing the practice of medicine in that state may impose a fee for a license issued or renewed through the Compact. (b)  The Interstate Commission is authorized to develop rules regarding fees for expedited licenses. SECTION 7 Renewal and Continued Participation (a)  A physician seeking to renew an expedited license granted in a member state shall complete a renewal process with the Interstate Commission if the physician: (1) Maintains a full and unrestricted license in a state of principal license; (2) Has not been convicted, received adjudication, deferred adjudication, community supervision, or deferred disposition for any offense by a court of appropriate jurisdiction; (3) Has not had a license authorizing the practice of medicine subject to discipline by a licensing agency in any state, federal, or foreign jurisdiction, excluding any action related to nonpayment of fees related to a license; and (4)  Has not had a controlled substance license or permit suspended or revoked by a state or the United States Drug Enforcement Administration. (b) Physicians shall comply with all continuing professional development or continuing medical education requirements for renewal of a license issued by a member state. (c)  The Interstate Commission shall collect any renewal fees charged for the renewal of a license and distribute the fees to the applicable member board. (d) Upon receipt of any renewal fees collected in subsection (c), a member board shall renew the physician's license. (e) Physician information collected by the Interstate Commission during the renewal process will be distributed to all member boards. (f)  The Interstate Commission is authorized to develop rules to address renewal of licenses obtained through the Compact. SECTION 8 Coordinated Information System (a)  The Interstate Commission shall establish a database of all physicians licensed, or who have applied for licensure, under Section 5. (b) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, member boards shall report to the Interstate Commission any public action or complaints against a licensed physician who has applied or received an expedited license through the Compact. (c) Member boards shall report disciplinary or investigatory information determined as necessary and proper by rule of the Interstate Commission. (d) Member boards may report any nonpublic complaint, disciplinary, or investigatory information not required by subsection (c) to the Interstate Commission. (e)  Member boards shall share complaint or disciplinary information about a physician upon request of another member board. (f)  All information provided to the Interstate Commission or distributed by member boards shall be confidential, filed under seal, and used only for investigatory or disciplinary matters. (g)  The Interstate Commission is authorized to develop rules for mandated or discretionary sharing of information by member boards. SECTION 9 Joint Investigations (a) Licensure and disciplinary records of physicians are deemed investigative. (b)  In addition to the authority granted to a member board by its respective Medical Practice Act or other applicable state law, a member board may participate with other member boards in joint investigations of physicians licensed by the member boards. (c)  A subpoena issued by a member state shall be enforceable in other member states. (d) Member boards may share any investigative, litigation, or compliance materials in furtherance of any joint or individual investigation initiated under the Compact. (e)  Any member state may investigate actual or alleged violations of the statutes authorizing the practice of medicine in any other member state in which a physician holds a license to practice medicine. SECTION 10 Disciplinary Actions (a)  Any disciplinary action taken by any member board against a physician licensed through the Compact shall be deemed unprofessional conduct which may be subject to discipline by other member boards, in addition to any violation of the Medical Practice Act or regulations in that state. (b)  If a license granted to a physician by the member board in the state of principal license is revoked, surrendered or relinquished in lieu of discipline, or suspended, then all licenses issued to the physician by member boards shall automatically be placed, without further action necessary by any member board, on the same status.  If the member board in the state of principal license subsequently reinstates the physician's license, a license issued to the physician by any other member board shall remain encumbered until that respective member board takes action to reinstate the license in a manner consistent with the Medical Practice Act of that state. (c)  If disciplinary action is taken against a physician by a member board not in the state of principal license, any other member board may deem the action conclusive as to matter of law and fact decided, and: (i) Impose the same or lesser sanction(s) against the physician so long as such sanctions are consistent with the Medical Practice Act of that state; or (ii) Pursue separate disciplinary action against the physician under its respective Medical Practice Act, regardless of the action taken in other member states. (d)  If a license granted to a physician by a member board is revoked, surrendered or relinquished in lieu of discipline, or suspended, then any license(s) issued to the physician by any other member board(s) shall be suspended, automatically and immediately without further action necessary by the other member board(s), for ninety (90) days upon entry of the order by the disciplining board, to permit the member board(s) to investigate the basis for the action under the Medical Practice Act of that state.  A member board may terminate the automatic suspension of the license it issued prior to the completion of the ninety (90) day suspension period in a manner consistent with the Medical Practice Act of that state. SECTION 11 Interstate Medical Licensure Compact Commission (a)  The member states create the "Interstate Medical Licensure Compact Commission." (b)  The purpose of the Interstate Commission is the administration of the Interstate Medical Licensure Compact, which is a discretionary state function. (c)  The Interstate Commission shall be a body corporate and joint agency of the member states and shall have all the responsibilities, powers, and duties set forth in the Compact, and such additional powers as may be conferred upon it by a subsequent concurrent action of the respective legislatures of the member states in accordance with the terms of the Compact. (d)  The Interstate Commission shall consist of two (2) voting representatives appointed by each member state who shall serve as Commissioners.  In states where allopathic and osteopathic physicians are regulated by separate member boards, or if the licensing and disciplinary authority is split between multiple member boards within a member state, the member state shall appoint one (1) representative from each member board.  A Commissioner shall be a(n): (1) Allopathic or osteopathic physician appointed to a member board; (2) Executive director, executive secretary, or similar executive of a member board; or (3) Member of the public appointed to a member board. (e)  The Interstate Commission shall meet at least once each calendar year.  A portion of this meeting shall be a business meeting to address such matters as may properly come before the Commission, including the election of officers.  The chairperson may call additional meetings and shall call for a meeting upon the request of a majority of the member states. (f)  The bylaws may provide for meetings of the Interstate Commission to be conducted by telecommunication or electronic communication. (g)  Each Commissioner participating at a meeting of the Interstate Commission is entitled to one (1) vote.  A majority of Commissioners shall constitute a quorum for the transaction of business, unless a larger quorum is required by the bylaws of the Interstate Commission.  A Commissioner shall not delegate a vote to another Commissioner.  In the absence of its Commissioner, a member state may delegate voting authority for a specified meeting to another person from that state who shall meet the requirements of subsection (d). (h)  The Interstate Commission shall provide public notice of all meetings and all meetings shall be open to the public.  The Interstate Commission may close a meeting, in full or in portion, where it determines by a two-thirds (2/3) vote of the Commissioners present that an open meeting would be likely to: (1) Relate solely to the internal personnel practices and procedures of the Interstate Commission; (2) Discuss matters specifically exempted from disclosure by federal statute; (3) Discuss trade secrets, commercial, or financial information that is privileged or confidential; (4) Involve accusing a person of a crime, or formally censuring a person; (5)  Discuss information of a personal nature where disclosure would constitute a clearly unwarranted invasion of personal privacy; (6) Discuss investigative records compiled for law enforcement purposes; or (7) Specifically relate to the participation in a civil action or other legal proceeding. (i)  The Interstate Commission shall keep minutes which shall fully describe all matters discussed in a meeting and shall provide a full and accurate summary of actions taken, including record of any roll call votes. (j)  The Interstate Commission shall make its information and official records, to the extent not otherwise designated in the Compact or by its rules, available to the public for inspection. (k)  The Interstate Commission shall establish an executive committee, which shall include officers, members, and others as determined by the bylaws.  The executive committee shall have the power to act on behalf of the Interstate Commission, with the exception of rulemaking, during periods when the Interstate Commission is not in session.  When acting on behalf of the Interstate Commission, the executive committee shall oversee the administration of the Compact including enforcement and compliance with the provisions of the Compact, its bylaws and rules, and other such duties as necessary. (l)  The Interstate Commission may establish other committees for governance and administration of the Compact. SECTION 12 Powers and Duties of the Interstate Commission The Interstate Commission shall have the duty and power to: (a) Oversee and maintain the administration of the Compact; (b) Promulgate rules which shall be binding to the extent and in the manner provided for in the Compact; (c) Issue, upon the request of a member state or member board, advisory opinions concerning the meaning or interpretation of the Compact, its bylaws, rules, and actions; (d) Enforce compliance with Compact provisions, the rules promulgated by the Interstate Commission, and the bylaws, using all necessary and proper means, including but not limited to the use of judicial process; (e)  Establish and appoint committees, including but not limited to an executive committee as required by Section 11, which shall have the power to act on behalf of the Interstate Commission in carrying out its powers and duties; (f) Pay, or provide for the payment of the expenses related to the establishment, organization, and ongoing activities of the Interstate Commission; (g) Establish and maintain one or more offices; (h)  Borrow, accept, hire, or contract for services of personnel; (i) Purchase and maintain insurance and bonds; (j) Employ an executive director who shall have such powers to employ, select or appoint employees, agents, or consultants, and to determine their qualifications, define their duties, and fix their compensation; (k) Establish personnel policies and programs relating to conflicts of interest, rates of compensation, and qualifications of personnel; (l) Accept donations and grants of money, equipment, supplies, materials and services, and to receive, utilize, and dispose of it in a manner consistent with the conflict of interest policies established by the Interstate Commission; (m)  Lease, purchase, accept contributions or donations of, or otherwise to own, hold, improve or use, any property, real, personal, or mixed; (n) Sell, convey, mortgage, pledge, lease, exchange, abandon, or otherwise dispose of any property, real, personal, or mixed; (o) Establish a budget and make expenditures; (p) Adopt a seal and bylaws governing the management and operation of the Interstate Commission; (q) Report annually to the legislatures and governors of the member states concerning the activities of the Interstate Commission during the preceding year.  Such reports shall also include reports of financial audits and any recommendations that may have been adopted by the Interstate Commission; (r)  Coordinate education, training, and public awareness regarding the Compact, its implementation, and its operation; (s)  Maintain records in accordance with the bylaws; (t) Seek and obtain trademarks, copyrights, and patents; and (u)  Perform such functions as may be necessary or appropriate to achieve the purposes of the Compact. SECTION 13 Finance Powers (a)  The Interstate Commission may levy on and collect an annual assessment from each member state to cover the cost of the operations and activities of the Interstate Commission and its staff.  The total assessment must be sufficient to cover the annual budget approved each year for which revenue is not provided by other sources.  The aggregate annual assessment amount shall be allocated upon a formula to be determined by the Interstate Commission, which shall promulgate a rule binding upon all member states. (b)  The Interstate Commission shall not incur obligations of any kind prior to securing the funds adequate to meet the same. (c)  The Interstate Commission shall not pledge the credit of any of the member states, except by, and with the authority of, the member state. (d)  The Interstate Commission shall be subject to a yearly financial audit conducted by a certified or licensed public accountant and the report of the audit shall be included in the annual report of the Interstate Commission. SECTION 14 Organization and Operation of the Interstate Commission (a)  The Interstate Commission shall, by a majority of Commissioners present and voting, adopt bylaws to govern its conduct as may be necessary or appropriate to carry out the purposes of the Compact within twelve (12) months of the first Interstate Commission meeting. (b)  The Interstate Commission shall elect or appoint annually from among its Commissioners a chairperson, a vice chairperson, and a treasurer, each of whom shall have such authority and duties as may be specified in the bylaws.  The chairperson, or in the chairperson's absence or disability, the vice chairperson, shall preside at all meetings of the Interstate Commission. (c) Officers selected in subsection (b) shall serve without remuneration from the Interstate Commission. (d)  The officers and employees of the Interstate Commission shall be immune from suit and liability, either personally or in their official capacity, for a claim for damage to or loss of property or personal injury or other civil liability caused or arising out of, or relating to, an actual or alleged act, error, or omission that occurred, or that such person had a reasonable basis for believing occurred, within the scope of Interstate Commission employment, duties, or responsibilities; provided that such person shall not be protected from suit or liability for damage, loss, injury, or liability caused by the intentional or willful and wanton misconduct of such person. (1) The liability of the executive director and employees of the Interstate Commission or representatives of the Interstate Commission, acting within the scope of such person's employment or duties for acts, errors, or omissions occurring within such person's state, may not exceed the limits of liability set forth under the constitution and laws of that state for state officials, employees, and agents.  The Interstate Commission is considered to be an instrumentality of the states for the purposes of any such action.  Nothing in this subsection shall be construed to protect such person from suit or liability for damage, loss, injury, or liability caused by the intentional or willful and wanton misconduct of such person. (2) The Interstate Commission shall defend the executive director, its employees, and subject to the approval of the attorney general or other appropriate legal counsel of the member state represented by an Interstate Commission representative, shall defend such Interstate Commission representative in any civil action seeking to impose liability arising out of an actual or alleged act, error or omission that occurred within the scope of Interstate Commission employment, duties or responsibilities, or that the defendant had a reasonable basis for believing occurred within the scope of Interstate Commission employment, duties, or responsibilities, provided that the actual or alleged act, error, or omission did not result from intentional or willful and wanton misconduct on the part of such person. (3)  To the extent not covered by the state involved, member state, or the Interstate Commission, the representatives or employees of the Interstate Commission shall be held harmless in the amount of a settlement or judgment, including attorney's fees and costs, obtained against such persons arising out of an actual or alleged act, error, or omission that occurred within the scope of Interstate Commission employment, duties, or responsibilities, or that such persons had a reasonable basis for believing occurred within the scope of Interstate Commission employment, duties, or responsibilities, provided that the actual or alleged act, error, or omission did not result from intentional or willful and wanton misconduct on the part of such persons. SECTION 15 Rulemaking Functions of the Interstate Commission (a)  The Interstate Commission shall promulgate reasonable rules in order to effectively and efficiently achieve the purposes of the Compact.  Notwithstanding the foregoing, in the event the Interstate Commission exercises its rulemaking authority in a manner that is beyond the scope of the purposes of the Compact, or the powers granted hereunder, then such an action by the Interstate Commission shall be invalid and have no force or effect. (b) Rules deemed appropriate for the operations of the Interstate Commission shall be made pursuant to a rulemaking process that substantially conforms to the "Model State Administrative Procedure Act" of 2010, and subsequent amendments thereto. (c)  Not later than thirty (30) days after a rule is promulgated, any person may file a petition for judicial review of the rule in the United States District Court for the District of Columbia or the federal district where the Interstate Commission has its principal offices, provided that the filing of such a petition shall not stay or otherwise prevent the rule from becoming effective unless the court finds that the petitioner has a substantial likelihood of success.  The court shall give deference to the actions of the Interstate Commission consistent with applicable law and shall not find the rule to be unlawful if the rule represents a reasonable exercise of the authority granted to the Interstate Commission. SECTION 16 Oversight of Interstate Compact (a)  The executive, legislative, and judicial branches of state government in each member state shall enforce the Compact and shall take all actions necessary and appropriate to effectuate the Compact's purposes and intent.  The provisions of the Compact and the rules promulgated hereunder shall have standing as statutory law but shall not override existing state authority to regulate the practice of medicine. (b)  All courts shall take judicial notice of the Compact and the rules in any judicial or administrative proceeding in a member state pertaining to the subject matter of the Compact which may affect the powers, responsibilities or actions of the Interstate Commission. (c)  The Interstate Commission shall be entitled to receive all service of process in any such proceeding, and shall have standing to intervene in the proceeding for all purposes.  Failure to provide service of process to the Interstate Commission shall render a judgment or order void as to the Interstate Commission, the Compact, or promulgated rules. SECTION 17 Enforcement of Interstate Compact (a)  The Interstate Commission, in the reasonable exercise of its discretion, shall enforce the provisions and rules of the Compact. (b)  The Interstate Commission may, by majority vote of the Commissioners, initiate legal action in the United States District Court for the District of Columbia, or, at the discretion of the Interstate Commission, in the federal district where the Interstate Commission has its principal offices, to enforce compliance with the provisions of the Compact, and its promulgated rules and bylaws, against a member state in default.  The relief sought may include both injunctive relief and damages.  In the event judicial enforcement is necessary, the prevailing party shall be awarded all costs of such litigation including reasonable attorney's fees. (c)  The remedies herein shall not be the exclusive remedies of the Interstate Commission.  The Interstate Commission may avail itself of any other remedies available under state law or the regulation of a profession. SECTION 18 Default Procedures (a)  The grounds for default include, but are not limited to, failure of a member state to perform such obligations or responsibilities imposed upon it by the Compact, or the rules and bylaws of the Interstate Commission promulgated under the Compact. (b)  If the Interstate Commission determines that a member state has defaulted in the performance of its obligations or responsibilities under the Compact, or the bylaws or promulgated rules, the Interstate Commission shall: (1) Provide written notice to the defaulting state and other member states, of the nature of the default, the means of curing the default, and any action taken by the Interstate Commission.  The Interstate Commission shall specify the conditions by which the defaulting state must cure its default; and (2) Provide remedial training and specific technical assistance regarding the default. (c)  If the defaulting state fails to cure the default, the defaulting state shall be terminated from the Compact upon an affirmative vote of a majority of the Commissioners and all rights, privileges, and benefits conferred by the Compact shall terminate on the effective date of termination.  A cure of the default does not relieve the offending state of obligations or liabilities incurred during the period of the default. (d) Termination of membership in the Compact shall be imposed only after all other means of securing compliance have been exhausted.  Notice of intent to terminate shall be given by the Interstate Commission to the Governor, the majority and minority leaders of the defaulting state's legislature, and each of the member states. (e)  The Interstate Commission shall establish rules and procedures to address licenses and physicians that are materially impacted by the termination of a member state, or the withdrawal of a member state. (f)  The member state which has been terminated is responsible for all dues, obligations, and liabilities incurred through the effective date of termination including obligations, the performance of which extends beyond the effective date of termination. (g)  The Interstate Commission shall not bear any costs relating to any state that has been found to be in default or which has been terminated from the Compact, unless otherwise mutually agreed upon in writing between the Interstate Commission and the defaulting state. (h)  The defaulting state may appeal the action of the Interstate Commission by petitioning the United States District Court for the District of Columbia or the federal district where the Interstate Commission has its principal offices.  The prevailing party shall be awarded all costs of such litigation including reasonable attorney's fees. SECTION 19 Dispute Resolution (a)  The Interstate Commission shall attempt, upon the request of a member state, to resolve disputes which are subject to the Compact and which may arise among member states or member boards. (b)  The Interstate Commission shall promulgate rules providing for both mediation and binding dispute resolution as appropriate. SECTION 20 Member States, Effective Date and Amendment (a)  Any state is eligible to become a member state of the Compact. (b)  The Compact shall become effective and binding upon legislative enactment of the Compact into law by no less than seven (7) states.  Thereafter, it shall become effective and binding on a state upon enactment of the Compact into law by that state. (c)  The governors of nonmember states, or their designees, shall be invited to participate in the activities of the Interstate Commission on a nonvoting basis prior to adoption of the Compact by all states. (d)  The Interstate Commission may propose amendments to the Compact for enactment by the member states.  No amendment shall become effective and binding upon the Interstate Commission and the member states unless and until it is enacted into law by unanimous consent of the member states. SECTION 21 Withdrawal (a) Once effective, the Compact shall continue in force and remain binding upon each and every member state; provided that a member state may withdraw from the Compact by specifically repealing the statute which enacted the Compact into law. (b) Withdrawal from the Compact shall be by the enactment of a statute repealing the same, but shall not take effect until one (1) year after the effective date of such statute and until written notice of the withdrawal has been given by the withdrawing state to the Governor of each other member state. (c)  The withdrawing state shall immediately notify the chairperson of the Interstate Commission in writing upon the introduction of legislation repealing the Compact in the withdrawing state. (d)  The Interstate Commission shall notify the other member states of the withdrawing state's intent to withdraw within sixty (60) days of its receipt of notice provided under subsection (c). (e)  The withdrawing state is responsible for all dues, obligations and liabilities incurred through the effective date of withdrawal, including obligations, the performance of which extend beyond the effective date of withdrawal. (f) Reinstatement following withdrawal of a member state shall occur upon the withdrawing state reenacting the Compact or upon such later date as determined by the Interstate Commission. (g)  The Interstate Commission is authorized to develop rules to address the impact of the withdrawal of a member state on licenses granted in other member states to physicians who designated the withdrawing member state as the state of principal license. SECTION 22 Dissolution (a)  The Compact shall dissolve effective upon the date of the withdrawal or default of the member state which reduces the membership in the Compact to one (1) member state. (b)  Upon the dissolution of the Compact, the Compact becomes null and void and shall be of no further force or effect, and the business and affairs of the Interstate Commission shall be concluded and surplus funds shall be distributed in accordance with the bylaws. SECTION 23 Severability and Construction (a)  The provisions of the Compact shall be severable, and if any phrase, clause, sentence, or provision is deemed unenforceable, the remaining provisions of the Compact shall be enforceable. (b)  The provisions of the Compact shall be liberally construed to effectuate its purposes. (c)  Nothing in the Compact shall be construed to prohibit the applicability of other interstate compacts to which the states are members. SECTION 24 Binding Effect of Compact and Other Laws (a) Nothing herein prevents the enforcement of any other law of a member state that is not inconsistent with the Compact. (b)  All laws in a member state in conflict with the Compact are superseded to the extent of the conflict. (c)  All lawful actions of the Interstate Commission, including all rules and bylaws promulgated by the Commission, are binding upon the member states. (d)  All agreements between the Interstate Commission and the member states are binding in accordance with their terms. (e)  In the event any provision of the Compact exceeds the constitutional limits imposed on the legislature of any member state, such provision shall be ineffective to the extent of the conflict with the constitutional provision in question in that member state. SECTION 63.  Section 73-26-3, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 73-26-3.  (1)  The State Board of Medical Licensure shall license and regulate the practice of physician assistants in accordance with the provisions of this chapter. (2)  All physician assistants who are employed as physician assistants by a Department of Veterans Affairs health care facility, a branch of the United States military or the Federal Bureau of Prisons, and who are practicing as physician assistants in a federal facility in Mississippi on July 1, 2000, and those physician assistants who trained in a Mississippi physician assistant program and have been continuously practicing as a physician assistant in Mississippi since 1976, shall be eligible for licensure if they submit an application for licensure to the board by December 31, 2000.  Physician assistants licensed under this subsection will be eligible for license renewal so long as they meet standard renewal requirements. (3)  Before December 31, 2004, applicants for physician assistant licensure, except those licensed under subsection (2) of this section, must be graduates of physician assistant educational programs accredited by the Commission on Accreditation of Allied Health Educational Programs or its predecessor or successor agency, have passed the certification examination administered by the National Commission on Certification of Physician Assistants (NCCPA), have current NCCPA certification, and possess a minimum of a baccalaureate degree.  Physician assistants meeting these licensure requirements will be eligible for license renewal so long as they meet standard renewal requirements. (4)  On or after December 31, 2004, applicants for physician assistant licensure must meet all of the requirements in subsection (3) of this section and, in addition, must have obtained a minimum of a master's degree in a health-related or science field. (5)  Applicants for licensure who meet all licensure requirements except for the master's degree may be granted a temporary license by the board so long as they can show proof of enrollment in a master's program that will, when completed, meet the master's degree requirement.  The temporary license will be valid for no longer than one (1) year, and may not be renewed. (6)  For new graduate physician assistants and all physician assistants receiving initial licenses in the state, except those licensed under subsection (2) of this section, supervision shall require the on-site presence of a supervising physician for one hundred twenty (120) days. (7)  To qualify for a Mississippi physician assistant license, an applicant must have successfully been cleared for licensure through an investigation that shall consist of a * * *determination as to good moral character and verification that the prospective licensee is not guilty of or in violation of any statutory ground for denial of licensure.  To assist the board in conducting its licensure investigation, all applicants shall undergo a fingerprint-based criminal history records check of the Mississippi central criminal database and the Federal Bureau of Investigation criminal history database.  Each applicant shall submit a full set of the applicant's fingerprints in a form and manner prescribed by the board, which shall be forwarded to the Mississippi Department of Public Safety (department) and the Federal Bureau of Investigation Identification Division for this purpose. Any and all state or national criminal history records information obtained by the board that is not already a matter of public record shall be deemed nonpublic and confidential information restricted to the exclusive use of the board, its members, officers, investigators, agents and attorneys in evaluating the applicant's eligibility or disqualification for licensure, and shall be exempt from the Mississippi Public Records Act of 1983.  Except when introduced into evidence in a hearing before the board to determine licensure, no such information or records related thereto shall, except with the written consent of the applicant or by order of a court of competent jurisdiction, be released or otherwise disclosed by the board to any other person or agency. The board shall provide to the department the fingerprints of the applicant, any additional information that may be required by the department, and a form signed by the applicant consenting to the check of the criminal records and to the use of the fingerprints and other identifying information required by the state or national repositories. The board shall charge and collect from the applicant, in addition to all other applicable fees and costs, such amount as may be incurred by the board in requesting and obtaining state and national criminal history records information on the applicant. SECTION 64.  Section 73-27-5, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 73-27-5.  All applicants for license shall have attained the age of twenty-one (21) years, and shall * * *be of good moral character; they shall have had at least four (4) years of high school education and be graduates of same; they shall have at least one (1) year of prepodiatry college education and be graduates of some college of podiatry recognized as being in good standing by the State Board of Medical Licensure.  No college of podiatry or chiropody shall be accredited by the board as a college of good standing that does not require for graduation a course of study of at least four (4) years (eight and one-half (8-1/2) months each) and be recognized by the Council on Education of the American Podiatry Association.  However, all podiatrists actively engaged in the practice of podiatry in the State of Mississippi, prior to January 1, 1938, whether graduates or not, shall, upon furnishing proof thereof by displaying their state privilege tax license to the Secretary of the State Board of Medical Licensure, and upon payment of fee of Ten Dollars and Twenty-five Cents ($10.25), be entitled to a license without an examination, and applications for the license shall be filed not later than sixty (60) days after February 17, 1938.  Upon payment of a fee prescribed by the State Board of Medical Licensure, not to exceed Five Hundred Dollars ($500.00), a license without examination may be issued to podiatrists of other states maintaining equal statutory requirements for the practice of podiatry and extending the same reciprocal privileges to this state.  The State Board of Medical Licensure may affiliate with the National Board of Chiropody or Podiatry Licensure in granting licenses to practice podiatry in Mississippi, provided the written examination covers at least two-thirds (2/3) of the subjects set forth in Section 73-27-9.  The issuance of a license by reciprocity to a military-trained applicant, military spouse or person who establishes residence in this state shall be subject to the provisions of Section 73-50-1 or 73-50-2, as applicable. To qualify for a Mississippi podiatry license, an applicant must have successfully been cleared for licensure through an investigation that shall consist of a * * *determination as to good moral character and verification that the prospective licensee is not guilty of or in violation of any statutory ground for denial of licensure as set forth in Section 73-27-13. To assist the board in conducting its licensure investigation, all applicants shall undergo a fingerprint-based criminal history records check of the Mississippi central criminal database and the Federal Bureau of Investigation criminal history database.  Each applicant shall submit a full set of the applicant's fingerprints in a form and manner prescribed by the board, which shall be forwarded to the Mississippi Department of Public Safety (department) and the Federal Bureau of Investigation Identification Division for this purpose. Any and all state or national criminal history records information obtained by the board that is not already a matter of public record shall be deemed nonpublic and confidential information restricted to the exclusive use of the board, its members, officers, investigators, agents and attorneys in evaluating the applicant's eligibility or disqualification for licensure, and shall be exempt from the Mississippi Public Records Act of 1983.  Except when introduced into evidence in a hearing before the board to determine licensure, no such information or records related thereto shall, except with the written consent of the applicant or by order of a court of competent jurisdiction, be released or otherwise disclosed by the board to any other person or agency. The board shall provide to the department the fingerprints of the applicant, any additional information that may be required by the department, and a form signed by the applicant consenting to the check of the criminal records and to the use of the fingerprints and other identifying information required by the state or national repositories. The board shall charge and collect from the applicant, in addition to all other applicable fees and costs, such amount as may be incurred by the board in requesting and obtaining state and national criminal history records information on the applicant. Each application or filing made under this section shall include the social security number(s) of the applicant in accordance with Section 93-11-64. SECTION 65.  Section 73-27-12, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 73-27-12.  (1)  Except as provided in Section 33-1-39, the license of every person licensed to practice podiatry in the State of Mississippi shall be renewed annually. On or before May 1 of each year, the board shall mail a notice of renewal of license to every podiatrist to whom a license was issued or renewed during the current licensing year.  The notice shall provide instructions for obtaining and submitting applications for renewal.  The State Board of Medical Licensure is authorized to make applications for renewal available via electronic means.  The applicant shall obtain and complete the application and submit it to the board in the manner prescribed by the board in the notice before June 30 with the renewal fee of an amount established by the board, but not to exceed Three Hundred Dollars ($300.00), a portion of which fee shall be used to support a program to aid impaired podiatrists.  Upon receipt of the application and fee, the board shall verify the accuracy of the application and issue to applicant a certificate of renewal for the ensuing year, beginning July 1 and expiring June 30 of the succeeding calendar year.  That renewal shall render the holder thereof a legal practitioner as stated on the renewal form. (2)  Any podiatrist practicing in Mississippi who allows his or her license to lapse by failing to renew the license as provided in subsection (1) may be reinstated by the board on satisfactory explanation for the failure to renew, by completion of a reinstatement form, and upon payment of the renewal fee for the current year, and shall be assessed a fine of Twenty-five Dollars ($25.00) plus an additional fine of Five Dollars ($5.00) for each month thereafter that the license renewal remains delinquent. (3)  Any podiatrist not practicing in Mississippi who allows his or her license to lapse by failing to renew the license as provided in subsection (1) may be reinstated by the board on satisfactory explanation for the failure to renew, by completion of a reinstatement form and upon payment of the arrearages for the previous five (5) years and the renewal fee for the current year. (4)  Any podiatrist who allows his or her license to lapse shall be notified by the board within thirty (30) days of that lapse. (5)  Any person practicing as a licensed podiatrist during the time his or her license has lapsed shall be considered an illegal practitioner and shall be subject to penalties set forth in Section 73-27-17, provided that he or she has not submitted the required reinstatement form and fee within fifteen (15) days after notification by the board of the lapse. (6)  Any podiatrist practicing in the State of Mississippi whose license has lapsed and is deemed an illegal practitioner under subsection (5) of this section may petition the board for reinstatement of his or her license on a retroactive basis, if the podiatrist was unable to meet the June 30 deadline due to extraordinary or other legitimate reasons, and retroactive reinstatement of licensure shall be granted or may be denied by the board only for good cause.  Failure to advise the board of change of address shall not be considered a basis for reinstatement. (7)  Fees collected under the provisions of this section shall be used by the board to defray expenses of administering the licensure provisions of Title 73, Chapter 27, Mississippi Code of 1972, and to support a program to aid impaired podiatrists in an amount determined by the board. (8)  In order for a podiatrist whose podiatric medical license has been expired for five (5) years or more to qualify for reinstatement of license, the podiatrist must have successfully been cleared for reinstatement through an investigation that shall consist of a * * *determination as to good moral character and verification that the prospective licensee is not guilty of or in violation of any statutory ground for denial of licensure as set forth in Section 73-27-13.  To assist the board in conducting its licensure investigation, all applicants shall undergo a fingerprint-based criminal history records check of the Mississippi central criminal database and the Federal Bureau of Investigation criminal history database.  Each applicant shall submit a full set of the applicant's fingerprints in a form and manner prescribed by the board, which shall be forwarded to the Mississippi Department of Public Safety (department) and the Federal Bureau of Investigation Identification Division for this purpose. Any and all state or national criminal history records information obtained by the board that is not already a matter of public record shall be deemed nonpublic and confidential information restricted to the exclusive use of the board, its members, officers, investigators, agents and attorneys in evaluating the applicant's eligibility or disqualification for licensure, and shall be exempt from the Mississippi Public Records Act of 1983.  Except when introduced into evidence in a hearing before the board to determine licensure, no such information or records related thereto shall, except with the written consent of the applicant or by order of a court of competent jurisdiction, be released or otherwise disclosed by the board to any other person or agency. The board shall provide to the department the fingerprints of the applicant, any additional information that may be required by the department, and a form signed by the applicant consenting to the check of the criminal records and to the use of the fingerprints and other identifying information required by the state or national repositories. The board shall charge and collect from the applicant, in addition to all other applicable fees and costs, such amount as may be incurred by the board in requesting and obtaining state and national criminal history records information on the applicant. SECTION 66.  Section 73-27-13, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 73-27-13.  (1)  The State Board of Medical Licensure may refuse to issue, suspend, revoke or otherwise restrict any license provided for in this chapter, with the advice of the advisory committee, based upon the following grounds: (a)  Habitual personal use of narcotic drugs, or any other drug having addiction-forming or addiction-sustaining liability. (b)  Habitual use of intoxicating liquors, or any beverage, to an extent which affects professional competency. (c)  Administering, dispensing or prescribing any narcotic drug, or any other drug having addiction-forming or addiction-sustaining liability otherwise than in the course of legitimate professional practice. (d)  Conviction of violation of any federal or state law regulating the possession, distribution or use of any narcotic drug or any drug considered a controlled substance under state or federal law. (e)  Performing any medical diagnosis or treatment outside the scope of podiatry as defined in Section 73-27-1. (f)  Conviction of a * * *felony or misdemeanor involving moral turpitude disqualifying crime as provided in the Fresh Start Act. (g)  Obtaining or attempting to obtain a license by fraud or deception. (h)  Unprofessional conduct, which includes, but is not limited to: (i)  Practicing medicine under a false or assumed name or impersonating another practitioner, living or dead. (ii)  Knowingly performing any act which in any way assists an unlicensed person to practice podiatry. (iii)  Making or willfully causing to be made any flamboyant claims concerning the licensee's professional excellence. (iv)  Being guilty of any dishonorable or unethical conduct likely to deceive, defraud or harm the public. (v)  Obtaining a fee as personal compensation or gain from a person on fraudulent representation a disease or injury condition generally considered incurable by competent medical authority in the light of current scientific knowledge and practice can be cured or offering, undertaking, attempting or agreeing to cure or treat the same by a secret method, which he refuses to divulge to the board upon request. (vi)  Use of any false, fraudulent or forged statement or document, or the use of any fraudulent, deceitful, dishonest or immoral practice in connection with any of the licensing requirements, including the signing in his professional capacity any certificate that is known to be false at the time he makes or signs such certificate. (vii)  Failing to identify a podiatrist's school of practice in all professional uses of his name by use of his earned degree or a description of his school of practice. (i)  The refusal of a licensing authority of another state to issue or renew a license, permit or certificate to practice podiatry in that state or the revocation, suspension or other restriction imposed on a license, permit or certificate issued by such licensing authority which prevents or restricts practice in that state. (j)  Violation(s) of the provisions of Sections 41-121-1 through 41-121-9 relating to deceptive advertisement by health care practitioners. (2)  Upon the nonissuance, suspension or revocation of a license to practice podiatry, the board may, in its discretion and with the advice of the advisory committee, reissue a license after a lapse of six (6) months.  No advertising shall be permitted except regular professional cards. (3)  In its investigation of whether the license of a podiatrist should be suspended, revoked or otherwise restricted, the board may inspect patient records in accordance with the provisions of Section 73-25-28. (4)  In addition to the grounds specified in subsection (1) of this section, the board shall be authorized to suspend the license of any licensee for being out of compliance with an order for support, as defined in Section 93-11-153.  The procedure for suspension of a license for being out of compliance with an order for support, and the procedure for the reissuance or reinstatement of a license suspended for that purpose, and the payment of any fees for the reissuance or reinstatement of a license suspended for that purpose, shall be governed by Section 93-11-157 or 93-11-163, as the case may be.  If there is any conflict between any provision of Section 93-11-157 or 93-11-163 and any provision of this chapter, the provisions of Section 93-11-157 or 93-11-163, as the case may be, shall control. SECTION 67.  Section 73-27-16, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 73-27-16.  (1)  A person whose license to practice podiatry has been revoked or suspended may petition the Mississippi State Board of Medical Licensure to reinstate this license after a period of not less than one (1) year has elapsed from the date of the revocation or suspension.  The procedure for the reinstatement of a license that is suspended for being out of compliance with an order for support, as defined in Section 93-11-153, shall be governed by Section 93-11-157 or 93-11-163, as the case may be. (2)  The petition shall be accompanied by two (2) or more verified recommendations from podiatrists licensed by the Board of Medical Licensure to which the petition is addressed and by two (2) or more recommendations from citizens each having personal knowledge of the activities of the petitioner since the disciplinary penalty was imposed and such facts as may be required by the board. The petition may be heard at the next regular meeting of the Board of Medical Licensure but not earlier than thirty (30) days after the petition was filed.  No petition shall be considered while the petitioner is under sentence for any criminal offense, including any period during which he is under probation or parole. The hearing may be continued from time to time as the Board of Medical Licensure finds necessary. Any final action by the board on a petition under this section shall be made with the advice of the advisory committee. (3)  In determining whether the disciplinary penalty should be set aside and the terms and conditions, if any, which should be imposed if the disciplinary penalty is set aside, the Board of Medical Licensure may investigate and consider all activities of the petitioner since the disciplinary action was taken against him, the offense for which he was disciplined, his activity during the time his certificate was in good standing, his general reputation for truth * * *, and professional ability * * * and good character; and it may require the petitioner to pass an oral examination. (4)  The Secretary-Treasurer of the Board of Medical Licensure shall enter into his records of the case all actions of the Board of Medical Licensure in setting aside a disciplinary penalty under this section and he shall certify notices to the proper court clerk.  The clerk shall make such changes on his records as may be necessary. SECTION 68.  Section 73-29-13, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 73-29-13.  A person is qualified to receive a license as an examiner: (1)  Who is at least twenty-one (21) years of age; (2)  Who is a citizen of the United States; (3)  Who establishes that he is a person of honesty, truthfulness, and integrity * * *, and moral fitness; (4)  Who has not been convicted of a * * *felony or a misdemeanor involving moral turpitude disqualifying crime as provided in the Fresh Start Act; (5)  Who holds a baccalaureate degree from a college or university accredited by the American Association of Collegiate Registrars and Admissions Officers or, in lieu thereof, has five (5) consecutive years of active investigative experience immediately preceding his application; (6)  Who is a graduate of a polygraph examiners course approved by the board and has satisfactorily completed not less than six (6) months of internship training, provided that if the applicant is not a graduate of an approved polygraph examiners course, satisfactory completion of not less than twelve (12) months of internship training may satisfy this subdivision; and (7)  Prior to the issuance of a license, the applicant must furnish to the board evidence of a surety bond or insurance policy.  Said surety bond or insurance policy shall be in the sum of Five Thousand Dollars ($5,000.00) and shall be conditioned that the obligor therein will pay to the extent of the face amount of such surety bond or insurance policy all judgments which may be recovered against the licensee by reason of any wrongful or illegal acts committed by him in the course of his examinations. SECTION 69.  Section 73-29-19, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 73-29-19.  An applicant who is a polygraph examiner licensed under the laws of another state or territory of the United States may be issued a license upon payment of a fee of Fifty Dollars ($50.00) and the production of satisfactory proof that: (1)  He is at least twenty-one (21) years of age; (2)  He is a citizen of the United States; * * *  (3)  He is of good moral character; ( * * *43)  The requirements for the licensing of polygraph examiners in such particular state or territory of the United States were, at the date of the applicant's licensing therein, substantially equivalent to the requirements now in force in this state; ( * * *54)  The applicant had lawfully engaged in the administration of polygraph examinations under the laws of such state or territory for at least two (2) years prior to his application for license hereunder; ( * * *65)  Such other state or territory grants similar reciprocity to license holders of this state; and ( * * *76)  He has complied with Section 73-29-17. The issuance of a license by reciprocity to a military-trained applicant, military spouse or person who establishes residence in this state shall be subject to the provisions of Section 73-50-1 or 73-50-2, as applicable. SECTION 70.  Section 73-29-31, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 73-29-31.  (1)  The board may refuse to issue or may suspend or revoke a license on any one or more of the following grounds: (a)  For failing to inform a subject to be examined as to the nature of the examination; (b)  For failing to inform a subject to be examined that his participation in the examination is voluntary; (c)  Material misstatement in the application for original license or in the application for any renewal license under this chapter; (d)  Willful disregard or violation of this chapter or of any regulation or rule issued pursuant thereto, including, but not limited to, willfully making a false report concerning an examination for polygraph examination purposes; (e)  If the holder of any license has been adjudged guilty of the commission of a * * *felony or a misdemeanor involving moral turpitude disqualifying crime as provided in the Fresh Start Act; (f)  Making any willful misrepresentation or false promises or causing to be printed any false or misleading advertisement for the purpose of directly or indirectly obtaining business or trainees; (g)  Having demonstrated unworthiness or incompetency to act as a polygraph examiner as defined by this chapter; (h)  Allowing one's license under this chapter to be used by any unlicensed person in violation of the provisions of this chapter; (i)  Willfully aiding or abetting another in the violation of this chapter or any regulation or rule issued pursuant thereto; (j)  Where the license holder has been adjudged by a court of competent jurisdiction as habitual drunkard, mentally incompetent, or in need of a conservator; (k)  Failing, within a reasonable time, to provide information requested by the secretary as the result of a formal complaint to the board which would indicate a violation of this chapter; (l)  Failing to inform the subject of the results of the examination if so requested; or (m)  With regard to any polygraph examiner employed for a fee and not employed by a governmental law enforcement agency or the Mississippi Department of Corrections: (i)  Requiring a subject, prior to taking the examination or as a condition of receiving the results of the examination, to waive any rights or causes of action he may have or which may accrue in favor of the subject arising out of or resulting from the administration of the examination; except the examiner may require, prior to the examination or as a condition of receiving the results of the examination, a subject to waive any rights or causes of action that may accrue against the examiner as a result of any use made of the results of the examination by the person who employed the examiner; (ii)  Requiring a subject to acknowledge that his examination is not done for purposes of employment when, in fact, the results of the examination are to be submitted to an employer or an agent of an employer; or (iii)  Reporting the results of an examination to any person not authorized to receive the results of the examination except for the person who employed the examiner, unless authorized in writing by the subject. (2)   In addition to the grounds specified in subsection (1) of this section, the board shall be authorized to suspend the license of any licensee for being out of compliance with an order for support, as defined in Section 93-11-153.  The procedure for suspension of a license for being out of compliance with an order for support, and the procedure for the reissuance or reinstatement of a license suspended for that purpose, and the payment of any fees for the reissuance or reinstatement of a license suspended for that purpose, shall be governed by Section 93-11-157 or 93-11-163, as the case may be.  If there is any conflict between any provision of Section 93-11-157 or 93-11-163 and any provision of this chapter, the provisions of Section 93-11-157 or 93-11-163, as the case may be, shall control. SECTION 71.  Section 73-30-9, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 73-30-9.  (1)  The board shall issue a license as a provisional licensed professional counselor, without regard to race, religion, sex or national origin, to each applicant who furnishes satisfactory evidence of the following: (a)  The applicant has completed an application on a form prescribed by the board accompanied by a nonrefundable application fee of Fifty Dollars ($50.00). (b)  The applicant is at least twenty-one (21) years of age. * * *(c)  The applicant is of good moral character. ( * * *dc)  The applicant is a citizen of the United States, or has an immigration document to verify legal alien work status in the United States.  The immigration document must be current and issued by the United States Immigration Bureau. ( * * *ed)  The applicant is not in violation of any of the provisions of this article and the rules and regulations adopted hereunder. ( * * *fe)  The applicant shall have a minimum acceptable graduate semester hour or acceptable quarter-hour master's degree as determined by the board primarily in counseling or a related counseling field from a regionally or nationally accredited college or university program in counselor education or a related counseling program subject to board approval. All applicants shall provide official transcripts of all graduate work. ( * * *gf)  The applicant must pass the examination approved by the board, as set forth in Section 73-30-7(5). ( * * *hg)  A provisional license issued under this section shall require that the individual confine one's practice to a board-approved site and accrue counseling experience under the supervision of a board-qualified supervisor. ( * * *ih)  The limited license shall be renewable for not more than four (4) years, with a nonrefundable license fee in the amount provided in Section 73-30-29.  Licensees may appeal to the board for an extension of the renewal period. ( * * *ji)  Each applicant for licensure shall apply to undergo a fingerprint-based criminal history records check of the Mississippi central criminal database and the Federal Bureau of Investigation criminal history database.  Each applicant shall submit a full set of the applicant's fingerprints in a form and manner prescribed by the board, which shall be forwarded to the Mississippi Department of Public Safety and the Federal Bureau of Investigation Identification Division for this purpose. (2)  The board shall issue a license or the privilege to practice as a licensed professional counselor, without regard to race, religion, sex or national origin, to each applicant who furnishes satisfactory evidence of the following: (a)  The applicant has completed an application on a form prescribed by the board accompanied by a nonrefundable full application fee of Fifty Dollars ($50.00). (b)  The applicant is at least twenty-one (21) years of age. * * *(c)  The applicant is of good moral character. ( * * *dc)  The applicant is a citizen of the United States, or has an immigration document to verify legal alien work status in the United States.  The immigration document must be current and issued by the United States Immigration Bureau. ( * * *ed)  The applicant is not in violation of any of the provisions of this article and the rules and regulations adopted hereunder. ( * * *fe)  The applicant shall have a minimum acceptable graduate semester hour or acceptable quarter-hour master's degree as determined by the board primarily in counseling or a related counseling field from a regionally or nationally accredited college or university program in counselor education or a related counseling program subject to board approval. All applicants shall provide official transcripts of all graduate work. ( * * *gf)  The applicant for licensure must pass the examination approved by the board, as set forth in Section 73-30-7(5). ( * * *hg)  The applicant has had post graduate supervised experience in professional counseling acceptable to the board.  Applicant shall submit verification of supervised experience. Each application or filing made under this section shall include the social security number(s) of the applicant in accordance with Section 93-11-64. ( * * *ih)  The board shall require each first-time applicant for licensure or the initial privilege to practice and may require applicants for license renewal to undergo a fingerprint-based criminal history records check of the Mississippi central criminal database and the Federal Bureau of Investigation criminal history database.  Each applicant for licensure and each renewal applicant as required by the board shall apply to undergo a fingerprint-based criminal history records check of the Mississippi central criminal database and the Federal Bureau of Investigation criminal history database.  Each applicant shall submit a full set of the applicant's fingerprints in a form and manner prescribed by the board, which shall be forwarded to the Mississippi Department of Public Safety and the Federal Bureau of Investigation Identification Division for this purpose. (3)  The board shall administer the privilege to practice in accordance with the Professional Counseling Compact. SECTION 72.  Section 73-30-21, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 73-30-21.  (1)  The board may, after notice and opportunity for a hearing, suspend, revoke or refuse to issue or renew a license or the privilege to practice or may reprimand the license holder or holder of the privilege to practice, upon a determination by the board that such license holder or holder of the privilege to practice or applicant for licensure or the privilege to practice has: (a)  Been adjudged by any court to be mentally incompetent or have had a guardian of person appointed; (b)  Been convicted of a * * *felony disqualifying crime as provided in the Fresh Start Act; (c)  Sworn falsely under oath or affirmation; (d)  Obtained a license or certificate or the privilege to practice by fraud, deceit or other misrepresentation; (e)  Engaged in the conduct of professional counseling in a grossly negligent or incompetent manner; (f)  Intentionally violated any provision of this article; (g)  Violated any rules or regulations of the board; or (h)  Aided or assisted another in falsely obtaining a license or the privilege to practice under this article. With regard to a refusal to issue a privilege to practice, such refusal by the board shall be in accordance with the terms of the Professional Counseling Compact instead of this subsection (1). (2)  Appeals from disciplinary action are to be brought in the circuit court in the county of residence of the practitioner.  In the event the practitioner resides out of state the appeal should be brought in Hinds County Circuit Court. (3)  The board may assess and levy upon any licensee, practitioner or applicant for licensure or the privilege to practice the costs incurred or expended by the board in the investigation and prosecution of any licensure, privilege to practice or disciplinary action, including, but not limited to, the costs of process service, court reporters, expert witnesses, investigators and attorney's fees. (4)  No revoked license or privilege to practice may be reinstated within twelve (12) months after such revocation.  Reinstatement thereafter shall be upon such conditions as the board may prescribe, which may include, without being limited to, successful passing of the examination required by this article. (5)  A license or privilege to practice certificate issued by the board is the property of the board and must be surrendered on demand. (6)  The chancery court is * * * hereby vested with the jurisdiction and power to enjoin the unlawful practice of counseling and/or the false representation as a licensed counselor in a proceeding brought by the board or any members thereof or by any citizen of this state. (7)  In addition to the reasons specified in subsection (1) of this section, the board shall be authorized to suspend the license of any licensee for being out of compliance with an order for support, as defined in Section 93-11-153.  The procedure for suspension of a license for being out of compliance with an order for support, and the procedure for the reissuance or reinstatement of a license suspended for that purpose, and the payment of any fees for the reissuance or reinstatement of a license suspended for that purpose, shall be governed by Section 93-11-157 or 93-11-163, as the case may be.  If there is any conflict between any provision of Section 93-11-157 or 93-11-163 and any provision of this article, the provisions of Section 93-11-157 or 93-11-163, as the case may be, shall control. SECTION 73.  Section 73-31-13, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 73-31-13.  The board shall issue a license as a psychologist to each applicant who files an application upon a form and in the manner as the board prescribes, accompanied by the fee as is required by this article; and who furnishes evidence satisfactory to the board that he or she: (a)  Is at least twenty-one (21) years of age; and (b)  * * *Is of good moral character Has not been convicted of a disqualifying crime as provided in the Fresh Start Act.  The applicant must have successfully been cleared for licensure through an investigation that consists of  * * *a determination as to good moral character and verification that the prospective licensee is not guilty of or in violation of any statutory ground for denial of licensure.  * * *For the purposes of this article, good moral character includes an absence of felony convictions or misdemeanor convictions involving moral turpitude as established by a criminal background check. Applicants shall undergo a fingerprint-based criminal history records check of the Mississippi central criminal database and the Federal Bureau of Investigation criminal history database.  Each applicant shall submit a full set of the applicant's fingerprints in a form and manner prescribed by the board, which shall be forwarded to the Mississippi Department of Public Safety (department) and the Federal Bureau of Investigation Identification Division for this purpose; and (c)  Is not in violation of any of the provisions of this article and the rules and regulations adopted under this article, and is not currently under investigation by another licensure board; and (d)  Holds a doctoral degree in psychology from an institution of higher education that is: regionally accredited by an accrediting body recognized by the United States Department of Education, or authorized by Provincial statute or Royal Charter to grant doctoral degrees.  From a program accredited by the American Psychological Association, or the Canadian Psychological Association, and from a program that requires at least one (1) year of continuous, full-time residence at the educational institution granting the doctoral degree.  For graduates from newly established programs seeking accreditation or in areas where no accreditation exists, applicants for licensure shall have completed a doctoral program in psychology that meets recognized acceptable professional standards as determined by the board.  For applicants graduating from doctoral level psychology training programs outside of the United States of America or Canada, applicants for licensure shall have completed a doctoral program in psychology that meets recognized acceptable professional standards as determined by the board; and (e)  Has completed a supervised internship from a program accredited by the American Psychological Association or the Canadian Psychological Association that meet the standards of training as defined by the board.  The internship shall be comprised of at least one thousand eight hundred (1,800) hours of actual work, to include direct service, training and supervisory time; and (f)  Demonstrates professional knowledge by passing written (as used in this paragraph, the term "written" means either paper and pencil or computer-administered or computerized testing) and oral examinations in psychology prescribed by the board; except that upon examination of credentials, the board may, by unanimous consent, consider these credentials adequate evidence of professional knowledge. Upon investigation of the application and other evidence submitted, the board shall, not less than thirty (30) days before the examination, notify each applicant that the application and evidence submitted is satisfactory and accepted or unsatisfactory and rejected; if rejected, the notice shall state the reasons for the rejection. The place of examination shall be designated in advance by the board, and the examination shall be given at such time and place and under such supervision as the board may determine.  The examination used by the board shall consist of written tests and oral tests, and shall fairly test the applicant's knowledge and application thereof in those areas deemed relevant by the board.  All examinations serve the purpose of verifying that a candidate for licensure has acquired a basic core of knowledge in the discipline of psychology and can apply that knowledge to the problems confronted in the practice of psychology within the applicant's area of practice. The board shall evaluate the results from both the written and oral examinations.  The passing scores for the written and oral examinations shall be established by the board in its rules and regulations.  If an applicant fails to receive a passing score on the entire examination, he or she may reapply and shall be allowed to take a later examination.  An applicant who has failed two (2) successive examinations by the board may not reapply until after two (2) years from the date of the last examination failed. The board shall keep the written examination scores, and an accurate transcript of the questions and answers relating to the oral examinations, and the grade assigned to each answer thereof, as part of its records for at least two (2) years after the date of examination. Persons licensed in another state or jurisdiction applying for the authority to practice interjurisdictional telepsychology must meet the requirements set out in the Psychology Interjurisdictional Compact provided for in Section 73-31-51. Each application or filing made under this section shall include the social security number(s) of the applicant in accordance with Section 93-11-64. SECTION 74.  Section 73-31-21, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 73-31-21.  (1)  The board, by an affirmative vote of at least four (4) of its seven (7) members, shall withhold, deny, revoke or suspend any license issued or applied for in accordance with the provisions of this article, or otherwise discipline a licensed psychologist, upon proof that the applicant or licensed psychologist: (a)  Has violated the current code of ethics of the American Psychological Association or other codes of ethical standards adopted by the board; or (b)  Has been convicted of a * * *felony or any offense involving moral turpitude disqualifying crime as provided in the Fresh Start Act, the record of conviction being conclusive evidence thereof; or (c)  Is using any substance or any alcoholic beverage to an extent or in a manner dangerous to any other person or the public, or to an extent that the use impairs his or her ability to perform the work of a professional psychologist with safety to the public; or (d)  Has impersonated another person holding a psychologist license or allowed another person to use his or her license; or (e)  Has used fraud or deception in applying for a license or in taking an examination provided for in this article; or (f)  Has accepted commissions or rebates or other forms of remuneration for referring clients to other professional persons; or (g)  Has performed psychological services outside of the area of his or her training, experience or competence; or (h)  Has allowed his or her name or license issued under this article to be used in connection with any person or persons who perform psychological services outside of the area of their training, experience or competence; or (i)  Is legally adjudicated mentally incompetent, the record of that adjudication being conclusive evidence thereof; or (j)  Has willfully or negligently violated any of the provisions of this article.  The board may recover from any person disciplined under this article, the costs of investigation, prosecution, and adjudication of the disciplinary action. (2)  Notice shall be effected by registered mail or personal service setting forth the particular reasons for the proposed action and fixing a date not less than thirty (30) days nor more than sixty (60) days from the date of the mailing or that service, at which time the applicant or licensee shall be given an opportunity for a prompt and fair hearing.  For the purpose of the hearing, the board, acting by and through its executive secretary, may subpoena persons and papers on its own behalf and on behalf of the applicant or licensee, may administer oaths and may take testimony.  That testimony, when properly transcribed, together with the papers and exhibits, shall be admissible in evidence for or against the applicant or licensee.  At the hearing, the applicant or licensee may appear by counsel and personally in his or her own behalf.  Any person sworn and examined by a witness in the hearing shall not be held to answer criminally, nor shall any papers or documents produced by the witness be competent evidence in any criminal proceedings against the witness other than for perjury in delivering his or her evidence.  On the basis of any such hearing, or upon default of applicant or licensee, the board shall make a determination specifying its findings of fact and conclusions of law.  A copy of that determination shall be sent by registered mail or served personally upon the applicant or licensee.  The decision of the board denying, revoking or suspending the license shall become final thirty (30) days after so mailed or served, unless within that period the applicant or licensee appeals the decision to the chancery court, under the provisions hereof, and the proceedings in chancery shall be conducted as other matters coming before the court.  All proceedings and evidence, together with exhibits, presented at the hearing before the board shall be admissible in evidence in court in the appeal. (3)  The board may subpoena persons and papers on its own behalf and on behalf of the respondent, may administer oaths and may compel the testimony of witnesses.  It may issue commissions to take testimony, and testimony so taken and sworn to shall be admissible in evidence for and against the respondent.  The board shall be entitled to the assistance of the chancery court or the chancellor in vacation, which, on petition by the board, shall issue ancillary subpoenas and petitions and may punish as for contempt of court in the event of noncompliance therewith. (4)  Every order and judgment of the board shall take effect immediately on its promulgation unless the board in the order or judgment fixes a probationary period for the applicant or  licensee.  The order and judgment shall continue in effect unless upon appeal the court by proper order or decree terminates it earlier.  The board may make public its order and judgments in  any manner and form as it deems proper.  It shall, in event of the suspension or revocation of a license, direct the clerk of the circuit court of the county in which that license was recorded to cancel that record. (5)  Nothing in this section shall be construed as limiting or revoking the authority of any court or of any licensing or registering officer or board, other than the Mississippi Board of Psychology, to suspend, revoke and reinstate licenses and to cancel registrations under the provisions of Section 41-29-311. (6)  Suspension by the board of the license of a psychologist shall be for a period not exceeding one (1) year.  At the end of this period the board shall reevaluate the suspension, and shall either reinstate or revoke the license.  A person whose license has been revoked under the provisions of this section may reapply for a license after more than two (2) years have elapsed from the date that the denial or revocation is legally effective. (7)  In addition to the reasons specified in subsection (1) of this section, the board shall be authorized to suspend the license of any licensee for being out of compliance with an order for support, as defined in Section 93-11-153.  The procedure for suspension of a license for being out of compliance with an order for support, and the procedure for the reissuance or reinstatement of a license suspended for that purpose, and the payment of any fees for the reissuance or reinstatement of a license suspended for that purpose, shall be governed by Section 93-11-157.  Actions taken by the board in suspending a license when required by Section 93-11-157 or 93-11-163 are not actions from which an appeal may be taken under this section.  Any appeal of a license suspension that is required by Section 93-11-157 or 93-11-163 shall be taken in accordance with the appeal procedure specified in Section 93-11-157 or 93-11-163, as the case may be, rather than the procedure specified in this section.  If there is any conflict between any provision of Section 93-11-157 or 93-11-163 and any provision of this article, the provisions of Section 93-11-157 or 93-11-163, as the case may be, shall control. (8)  The board may issue a nondisciplinary, educational letter to licensees as provided in Section 73-31-7(2)(g). The board may also direct a psychologist to obtain a formal assessment of ability to practice safely if there is reason to believe there may be impairment due to substance abuse or mental incapacity.  Licensees who may be impaired, but who are able to practice safely, may be required by the board to seek appropriate treatment and/or supervision.  That action by the board in itself will not be considered disciplinary. (9)  The board may discipline any person who has been granted the authority to practice interjurisdictional telepsychology or the temporary authorization to practice under the Psychology Interjurisdictional Compact provided for under Section 73-31-51, for any of the grounds specified in subsection (1) of this section in the same manner as the board disciplines a licensed psychologist under this section. SECTION 75.  Section 73-33-1, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 73-33-1.  (1)  Any person residing or having a place for the regular transaction of business in the State of Mississippi * * * being of good moral character, and who * * * shall have has received from the State Board of Public Accountancy a license certifying his qualifications as a certified public accountant as hereinafter provided, shall be styled or known as a certified public accountant, and it shall be unlawful for any other person or persons to assume such title or use any letters, abbreviations or words to indicate that such person using same is a certified public accountant, unless such person qualifies for a practice privilege under Section 73-33-17, or at the discretion of the board, such person has been granted use of the title of "certified public accountant retired" by the Mississippi State Board of Public Accountancy or has received a reciprocal certified public accountant license from the State Board of Public Accountancy. (2)  A certified public accountant practicing public accounting under a Mississippi license must be associated and registered with a certified public accountant firm. (3)  The State Board of Public Accountancy shall grant and renew permits to practice as a CPA firm to applicants that demonstrate their qualifications in accordance with this section. (a)  The following shall hold a permit issued under this section:  any firm with an office in this state that practices public accountancy or that uses the title "CPA" or "CPA firm," and any firm that does not have an office in this state but performs the services described in Section 73-33-17(4) for a client having its home office in this state. (b)  A firm that does not have an office in this state may perform a review of a financial statement to be performed in accordance with Statements on Standards for Accounting and Review Services, or a compilation as defined in Section 73-33-2(d), for a client having its home office in this state and may use the title "CPA" and "CPA firm" without a permit issued under this section only if such firm has the qualifications described in subsection (4), complies with the peer review requirements set forth by board rule, and performs such services through an individual with practice privileges under Section 73-33-17. (c)  A firm that is not subject to the requirements of paragraph (a) or (b) of this subsection may perform other professional services within the practice of public accountancy while using the title "CPA" and "CPA firm" in this state without a permit issued under this section only if such firm performs such services through an individual with practice privileges under Section 73-33-17 and such firm can lawfully do so in the state where the individuals with practice privileges have their principal place of business. (4)  In order to obtain and maintain a firm permit, a certified public accountant firm shall be required to show the following: (a)  It is wholly owned by natural persons and not owned in whole or in part by business entities; and (b)  A simple majority of the ownership of the firm in terms of financial interests and/or voting rights hold certified public accountant licenses in any state; however, the individuals whose principal place of business is in Mississippi and who perform professional services in this state shall hold a Mississippi certified public accountant license, and that individuals who qualify for practice privileges under Section 73-33-17 who perform services for which a firm permit is required under Section 73-33-17(4) shall not be required to obtain a certificate pursuant to Section 73-33-3 or 73-33-9. (5)  Any certified public accountant firm may include nonlicensee owners, provided that: (a)  The firm designates a licensee of this state who is responsible for the proper registration of the firm and identifies that individual to the board; or in the case of a firm without a Mississippi office which must have a permit pursuant to subsection (3)(a), the firm designates a licensee of another state who meets the requirements provided in Section 73-33-17; (b)  All nonlicensee owners are active individual participants in the certified public accountant firm or affiliated entities; and (c)  The firm complies with such other requirements as the board may impose by rule. (6)  Unless exempt from the firm permit requirement under Section 73-33-1(3), no person or persons shall engage in the practice of public accounting as defined herein as a partnership, joint venture or professional corporation, sole proprietor, or other business organization allowed by law, unless and until each business organization or office thereof located inside the State of Mississippi has registered with and been issued a firm permit by the State Board of Public Accountancy. SECTION 76.  Section 73-34-14, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 73-34-14.  (1)  (a)  To qualify for a Mississippi real estate appraiser license, an applicant must have successfully been cleared for licensure through an investigation that shall consist of a determination that the applicant does not possess a background which calls into question public trust, as set forth below in subsection (2), and verification that the prospective licensee is not guilty of or in violation of any statutory ground for denial of licensure as set forth in Section 73-34-35. (b)  To assist the board in conducting its licensure investigation, on and after January 1, 2015, all applicants for a real estate appraiser license as a licensed real estate appraiser (license), licensed certified residential real estate appraiser (certification), or a licensed certified general real estate appraiser (certification), and all applicants for renewal of any real estate appraiser license or certification shall undergo a fingerprint-based criminal history records check of the Mississippi central criminal database and the Federal Bureau of Investigation criminal history database.  Each applicant shall submit a full set of the applicant's fingerprints in a form and manner prescribed by the board, which shall be forwarded to the Mississippi Department of Public Safety (department) and the Federal Bureau of Investigation Identification Division for this purpose. (c)  Any and all state or national criminal history records information obtained by the board that is not already a matter of public record shall be deemed nonpublic and confidential information restricted to the exclusive use of the board, its members, officers, investigators, agents and attorneys in evaluating the applicant's eligibility or disqualification for licensure, and shall be exempt from the Mississippi Public Records Act of 1983.  Except when introduced into evidence in a hearing before the board to determine licensure, no such information or records related thereto shall, except with the written consent of the applicant or by order of a court of competent jurisdiction, be released or otherwise disclosed by the board to any other person or agency. (d)  The board shall provide to the department the fingerprints of the applicant, any additional information that may be required by the department, and a form signed by the applicant consenting to the check of the criminal records and to the use of the fingerprints and other identifying information required by the state or national repositories. (e)  The board shall charge and collect from the applicant, in addition to all other applicable fees and costs, such amount as may be incurred by the board in requesting and obtaining state and national criminal history records information on the applicant. (2)  (a)  The board must ensure that applicants for a real estate appraiser license or certification do not possess a background that could call into question public trust.  An applicant found by the board to possess a background which calls into question the applicant's ability to maintain public trust shall not be issued a real estate appraiser license or  certification. (b)  The board shall not issue a real estate appraiser license or certification if: (i)  The applicant has had an appraiser license or certification revoked in any governmental jurisdiction within the five (5) year period immediately preceding the date of the application; (ii)  The applicant has been convicted of, or pled guilty or nolo contendere to, a * * *felony in a domestic, or foreign court disqualifying crime as provided in the Fresh Start Act: 1.  During the five-year period immediately preceding the date of the application for licensing or certification; or 2.  At any time preceding the date of the application, if such felony involved an act of fraud, dishonesty, or a breach of trust, or money laundering. (iii)  The applicant has failed to demonstrate * * * character and general fitness such as to command the confidence of the community and to warrant a determination that the appraiser will operate honestly, fairly and efficiently within the purpose of these criteria. (c)  The board shall evaluate and consider, by rules and regulations, additional background issues, including, but not limited to, those required by the Appraiser Qualifications Board of the Appraisal Foundation in compliance with federal requirements, prior to issuing (or taking disciplinary action against) a real estate appraiser. (d)  The board shall adopt rules and regulations necessary to implement, administer and enforce the provisions of this section. SECTION 77.  Section 73-34-109, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 73-34-109.  (1)  An appraisal management company applying for registration in this state shall not: (a)  Be owned, in whole or in part, directly or indirectly, by any person who has had an appraiser license or certificate in this state or in any other state, refused, denied, cancelled, surrendered in lieu of revocation, or revoked; or (b)  Be owned by more than ten percent (10%) by a person who * * *is not of good moral character, which for purposes of this section shall require that such person has not been convicted of, or entered a plea of nolo contendere to a felony relating to the practice of appraisal, banking, mortgage or the provision of financial services, or any crime involving fraud, misrepresentation or moral turpitude has been convicted of a disqualifying crime as provided in the Fresh Start Act. (2)  (a)  For purposes of subsection (1)(b) to qualify for initial registration and every third annual renewed registration thereafter as an appraisal management company, each individual owner of more than ten percent (10%) of an appraisal management company must have successfully been cleared for registration through an investigation that shall consist of a * * *determination as to good moral character and verification that the owner is not guilty of or in violation of any statutory ground for denial of registration as set forth in this chapter.  If no individual owns more than ten percent (10%) of the appraisal management company, then an investigation of an owner is not required, but in such instances, the controlling person designated by the appraisal management company shall be subject to the requirements of this subsection.  If following the initial registration, any individual becomes either an owner of more than ten percent (10%) of the appraisal management company or the designated controlling person of the appraisal management company, then each such person shall be subject to the requirements of this subsection at the appraisal management company's next annual renewal.  To assist the board in conducting its registration investigation, each individual owner of more than ten percent (10%) of an appraisal management company shall undergo a fingerprint-based criminal history records check of the Mississippi central criminal database and the Federal Bureau of Investigation criminal history database.  Each applicant shall submit a full set of the applicant's fingerprints, in a form and manner prescribed by the board, which shall be forwarded to the Mississippi Department of Public Safety (department) and the Federal Bureau of Investigation Identification Division for this purpose. (b)  Any state or national criminal history records information obtained by the board that is not already a matter of public record shall be deemed nonpublic and confidential information restricted to the exclusive use of the board, its members, officers, investigators, agents and attorneys in evaluating the applicant's eligibility or disqualification for registration, and shall be exempt from the Mississippi Public Records Act, Section 25-61-1 et seq.  Except upon written consent of the applicant, or by order of a court of competent jurisdiction, or when introduced into evidence in a hearing before the board to determine registration, no such information or records related thereto shall be released or otherwise disclosed by the board to any other person or agency. (c)  The board shall provide to the department the fingerprints of the applicant, any additional information that may be required by the department, a form signed by the applicant consenting to the check of the criminal records and to the use of the fingerprints and other identifying information required by the state or national repositories. (d)  The board shall charge and collect from the applicant, in addition to all other applicable fees and costs, such amount as may be incurred by the board in requesting and obtaining state and national criminal history records information on the applicant. SECTION 78.  Section 73-35-10, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 73-35-10.  (1)  (a)  To qualify for a Mississippi real estate broker's license or a Mississippi resident license as a real estate salesperson, or a nonresident's license in Mississippi, an applicant must have successfully been cleared for licensure through an investigation that shall consist of a determination that the applicant does not possess a background which calls into question public trust, as set forth below in subsection (2), and verification that the prospective licensee is not guilty of or in violation of any statutory ground for denial of licensure as set forth in Section 73-35-21. (b)  To assist the commission in conducting its licensure investigation, from and after July 1, 2016, all applicants for a Mississippi real estate broker's license, or a Mississippi resident license as a real estate salesperson, or a nonresident's license in Mississippi, and all applicants for renewal of any real estate license shall undergo a fingerprint-based criminal history records check of the Mississippi central criminal database and the Federal Bureau of Investigation criminal history database.  Each applicant shall submit a full set of the applicant's fingerprints in a form and manner prescribed by the commission, which shall be forwarded to the Mississippi Department of Public Safety (department) and the Federal Bureau of Investigation Identification Division for this purpose. (c)  Any and all state or national criminal history records information obtained by the commission that is not already a matter of public record shall be deemed nonpublic and confidential information restricted to the exclusive use of the commission, its members, officers, investigators, agents and attorneys in evaluating the applicant's eligibility or disqualification for licensure, and shall be exempt from the Mississippi Public Records Act of 1983.  Except when introduced into evidence in a hearing before the commission to determine licensure, no such information or records related thereto shall, except with the written consent of the applicant or by order of a court of competent jurisdiction, be released or otherwise disclosed by the commission to any other person or agency. (d)  The commission shall provide to the department the fingerprints of the applicant, any additional information that may be required by the department, and a form signed by the applicant consenting to the check of the criminal records and to the use of the fingerprints and other identifying information required by the state or national repositories. (e)  The commission shall charge and collect from the applicant, in addition to all other applicable fees and costs, such amount as may be incurred by the commission in requesting and obtaining state and national criminal history records information on the applicant. (2)  (a)  The commission must ensure that applicants for real estate licenses do not possess a background that could call into question public trust.  An applicant found by the commission to possess a background which calls into question the applicant's ability to maintain public trust shall not be issued a real estate license. (b)  The commission shall not issue a real estate license if: (i)  The applicant has had a real estate license revoked in any governmental jurisdiction within the five-year period immediately preceding the date of the application; (ii)  The applicant has been convicted of, or pled guilty or nolo contendere to, a * * *felony disqualifying crime as provided in the Fresh Start Act in a domestic or foreign court: 1.  During the five-year period immediately preceding the date of the application for licensing; or 2.  At any time preceding the date of the application, if such felony involved an act of fraud, dishonesty or a breach of trust, or money laundering. (c)  The commission shall adopt rules and regulations necessary to implement, administer and enforce the provisions of this section. (d)  The requirement of a criminal background check provided in this section shall not apply to persons who have held a broker's or salesperson's license in this state for at least twenty-five (25) years and who are older than seventy (70) years of age. (3)  The commission shall provide prior written notification to any licensee whose license, once issued, is subject to be amended, suspended, revoked or not renewed.  Said notice shall be delivered to the licensee whose license shall be affected and, if applicable, to their responsible broker, not less than five (5) business days prior to the effective date of the change.  For purposes of this subsection, written notice shall be delivered to the email address for the licensee and broker on file with the commission. SECTION 79.  Section 73-35-21, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 73-35-21.  (1)  Except as otherwise provided in this section, the commission may, upon its own motion and shall upon the verified complaint in writing of any person, hold a hearing pursuant to Section 73-35-23 for the refusal of license or for the suspension or revocation of a license previously issued, or for such other action as the commission deems appropriate.  The commission shall have full power to refuse a license for cause or to revoke or suspend a license where it has been obtained by false or fraudulent representation, or where the licensee in performing or attempting to perform any of the acts mentioned herein, is deemed to be guilty of: (a)  Making any substantial misrepresentation in connection with a real estate transaction; (b)  Making any false promises of a character likely to influence, persuade or induce; (c)  Pursuing a continued and flagrant course of misrepresentation or making false promises through agents or salespersons or any medium of advertising or otherwise; (d)  Any misleading or untruthful advertising; (e)  Acting for more than one (1) party in a transaction or receiving compensation from more than one (1) party in a transaction, or both, without the knowledge of all parties for whom he or she acts; (f)  Failing, within a reasonable time, to account for or to remit any monies coming into his or her possession which belong to others, or commingling of monies belonging to others with his own funds.  Every responsible broker procuring the execution of an earnest money contract or option or other contract who shall take or receive any cash or checks shall deposit, within a reasonable period of time, the sum or sums so received in a trust or escrow account in a bank or trust company pending the consummation or termination of the transaction.  "Reasonable time" in this context means by the close of business of the next banking day; (g)  Entering a guilty plea or conviction in a court of competent jurisdiction of this state, or any other state or the United States of any * * *felony disqualifying crime as provided in the Fresh Start Act; (h)  Displaying a "for sale" or "for rent" sign on any property without the owner's consent; (i)  Failing to furnish voluntarily, at the time of signing, copies of all listings, contracts and agreements to all parties executing the same; (j)  Paying any rebate, profit or commission to any person other than a real estate broker or salesperson licensed under the provisions of this chapter; (k)  Inducing any party to a contract, sale or lease to break such contract for the purpose of substituting in lieu thereof a new contract, where such substitution is motivated by the personal gain of the licensee; (l)  Accepting a commission or valuable consideration as a real estate salesperson for the performance of any of the acts specified in this chapter from any person, except his or her employer who must be a licensed real estate broker; (m)  Failing to successfully pass the commission's background investigation for licensure or renewal as provided in Section 73-35-10; or (n)  Any act or conduct, whether of the same or a different character than hereinabove specified, which constitutes or demonstrates bad faith, incompetency or untrustworthiness, or dishonest, fraudulent or improper dealing.  However, simple contact and/or communication with any mortgage broker or lender by a real estate licensee about any professional, including, but not limited to, an appraiser, home inspector, contractor, and/or attorney regarding a listing and/or a prospective or pending contract for the lease, sale and/or purchase of real estate shall not constitute conduct in violation of this section. (2)  No real estate broker shall practice law or give legal advice directly or indirectly unless said broker be a duly licensed attorney under the laws of this state.  He or she shall not act as a public conveyancer nor give advice or opinions as to the legal effect of instruments nor give opinions concerning the validity of title to real estate; nor shall he or she prevent or discourage any party to a real estate transaction from employing the services of an attorney; nor shall a broker undertake to prepare documents fixing and defining the legal rights of parties to a transaction.  However, when acting as a broker, he or she may use an earnest money contract form.  A real estate broker shall not participate in attorney's fees, unless the broker is a duly licensed attorney under the laws of this state and performs legal services in addition to brokerage services. (3)  It * * * is expressly provided that it is not the intent and purpose of the Mississippi Legislature to prevent a license from being issued to any person who is * * * found to be of good reputation, is able to give bond, and who has lived in the State of Mississippi for the required period or is otherwise qualified under this chapter. (4)  In addition to the reasons specified in subsection (1) of this section, the commission shall be authorized to suspend the license of any licensee for being out of compliance with an order for support, as defined in Section 93-11-153.  The procedure for suspension of a license for being out of compliance with an order for support, and the procedure for the reissuance or reinstatement of a license suspended for that purpose, and the payment of any fees for the reissuance or reinstatement of a license suspended for that purpose, shall be governed by Section 93-11-157 or 93-11-163, as the case may be.  If there is any conflict between any provision of Section 93-11-157 or 93-11-163 and any provision of this chapter, the provisions of Section 93-11-157 or 93-11-163, as the case may be, shall control. (5)  Nothing in this chapter shall prevent an associate broker or salesperson from owning any lawfully constituted business organization, including, but not limited to, a corporation, limited liability company or limited liability partnership, for the purpose of receiving payments contemplated in this chapter.  The business organization shall not be required to be licensed under this chapter and shall not engage in any other activity requiring a real estate license. (6)  The Mississippi Real Estate Commission shall not promulgate any rule or regulation, nor make any administrative or other interpretation, whereby any real estate licensee may be held responsible or subject to discipline or other actions by the commission relating to the information required to be disclosed by Sections 89-1-501 through 89-1-523 or delivery of information required to be disclosed by Sections 89-1-501 through 89-1-523. (7)  The Mississippi Real Estate Commission shall not promulgate nor enforce any rule or regulation, nor make any administrative or other interpretation, whereby any real estate licensee may be required to include in any agreement or otherwise be required to agree to any requirement regarding unilateral termination by a buyer-agency agreement. SECTION 80.  Section 73-38-9, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 73-38-9.  (1)  To be eligible for licensure by the board as a speech-language pathologist or audiologist and to be eligible for registration as a speech-language pathology aide or audiology aide, a person shall: * * *(a)  Be of good moral character; ( * * *ba)  ( * * *1i)  For speech-language pathologists or audiologists, possess at least a master's degree or its equivalent in the area of speech-language pathology or audiology, as the case may be, from an educational institution recognized by the board; ( * * *2ii)  For speech-language pathology aide or audiology aide, the board shall set minimum educational standards which shall be less than a bachelor's degree; ( * * *cb)  For speech-language pathologists and audiologists, submit evidence of the completion of the educational, clinical experience and employment requirements, which requirements shall be based on appropriate national standards and prescribed by the rules and regulations adopted pursuant to this article; ( * * *dc)  For speech-language pathologists and audiologists licensure applicants, pass an examination approved by the board.  This examination may be taken either before or after the completion of the employment requirement specified pursuant to paragraph (c) of this subsection; ( * * *ed)  For speech-language pathology aides and audiology aides, no examination shall be required. (2)  To be eligible for the privilege to practice, applicants must meet the requirements set out in the Audiology and Speech-Language Pathology Interstate Compact. SECTION 81.  Section 73-38-27, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 73-38-27.  (1)  With regard to a refusal to issue a privilege to practice, such refusal by the board shall be in accordance with terms of the Audiology and Speech-Language Pathology Interstate Compact.  The board may refuse to issue or renew a license, or may suspend or revoke a license where the licensee or applicant for a license has been guilty of unprofessional conduct which has endangered or is likely to endanger the health, welfare or safety of the public.  Such unprofessional conduct may result from: (a)  Negligence in the practice or performance of professional services or activities; (b)  Engaging in dishonorable, unethical or unprofessional conduct of a character likely to deceive, defraud or harm the public in the course of professional services or activities; (c)  Perpetrating or cooperating in fraud or material deception in obtaining or renewing a license or attempting the same; (d)  Being convicted of * * * any a crime * * * which has a substantial relationship to the licensee's activities and services or an essential element of which is if misstatement, fraud or dishonesty is an essential element of the crime; (e)  Being convicted of any crime which is a * * * felony under the laws of this state or the United States disqualifying crime as provided in the Fresh Start Act; (f)  Engaging in or permitting the performance of unacceptable services personally or by others working under the licensee's supervision due to the licensee's deliberate or negligent act or acts or failure to act, regardless of whether actual damage or damages to the public is established; (g)  Continued practice although the licensee has become unfit to practice as a speech-language pathologist or audiologist due to:  (i) failure to keep abreast of current professional theory or practice; or (ii) physical or mental disability; the entry of an order or judgment by a court of competent jurisdiction that a licensee is in need of mental treatment or is incompetent shall constitute mental disability; or (iii) addiction or severe dependency upon alcohol or other drugs which may endanger the public by impairing the licensee's ability to practice; (h)  Having disciplinary action taken against the licensee's license in another state; (i)  Making differential, detrimental treatment against any person because of race, color, creed, sex, religion or national origin; (j)  Engaging in lewd conduct in connection with professional services or activities; (k)  Engaging in false or misleading advertising; (l)  Contracting, assisting or permitting unlicensed persons to perform services for which a license is required under this article; (m)  Violation of any probation requirements placed on a license by the board; (n)  Revealing confidential information except as may be required by law; (o)  Failing to inform clients of the fact that the client no longer needs the services or professional assistance of the licensee; (p)  Charging excessive or unreasonable fees or engaging in unreasonable collection practices; (q)  For treating or attempting to treat ailments or other health conditions of human beings other than by speech or audiology therapy as authorized by this article; (r)  For applying or offering to apply speech or audiology therapy, exclusive of initial evaluation or screening and exclusive of education or consultation for the prevention of physical and mental disability within the scope of speech or audiology therapy, or for acting as a speech-language pathologist or audiologist, or speech-language pathologist or audiologist aide other than under the direct, on-site supervision of a licensed speech-language pathologist or audiologist; (s)  Violations of the current codes of conduct for speech-language pathologists or audiologists, and speech-language pathologist or audiologist assistants adopted by the American Speech-Language-Hearing Association; (t)  Violations of any rules or regulations promulgated pursuant to this article. (2)  The board may order a licensee to submit to a reasonable physical or mental examination if the licensee's physical or mental capacity to practice safely is at issue in a disciplinary proceeding. (3)  In addition to the reasons specified in subsection (1) of this section, the board shall be authorized to suspend the license of any licensee for being out of compliance with an order for support, as defined in Section 93-11-153.  The procedure for suspension of a license for being out of compliance with an order for support, and the procedure for the reissuance or reinstatement of a license suspended for that purpose, and the payment of any fees for the reissuance or reinstatement of a license suspended for that purpose, shall be governed by Section 93-11-157 or 93-11-163, as the case may be.  If there is any conflict between any provision of Section 93-11-157 or 93-11-163 and any provision of this article, the provisions of Section 93-11-157 or 93-11-163, as the case may be, shall control. SECTION 82.  Section 73-39-67, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 73-39-67.  (1) To obtain a license to practice veterinary medicine, a person shall file a written application and application fee with the board.  The application shall show that the applicant is a graduate of an accredited college of veterinary medicine or has the educational equivalence as set by the board.  The application shall also show * * *that the applicant is a person of good moral character and any other information and proof as the board may require. (2)  If the board determines that the applicant possesses the proper qualifications, it shall admit the applicant to the next examination, or if the applicant is eligible for license by endorsement, the board may grant him a license.  If an applicant is found not qualified to take the examination or for a license by endorsement, the board shall notify the applicant in writing within thirty (30) days of its finding and the grounds for its findings.  An applicant found unqualified may request a hearing before the board. (3)  The board may grant a temporary license to an applicant to practice veterinary medicine until the scheduled state board examination, if the applicant pays the application fee, provides sufficient evidence that he meets the qualifications for licensure, and provides evidence that he resides in the State of Mississippi.  The board may grant a second temporary permit, but the board may not grant more than two (2) temporary permits to any one (1) person. (4)  A person licensed by the board shall display the license in the facility in which the licensee practices. SECTION 83.  Section 73-39-71, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 73-39-71.  (1)  The board may issue a license by endorsement to an applicant who furnishes satisfactory proof that he is a graduate of an accredited college of veterinary medicine or the educational equivalence.  The applicant must also show that he * * *is a person of good moral character and is licensed to practice veterinary medicine in at least one (1) state, territory or district of the United States and has practiced veterinary medicine in one or more of those states without disciplinary action by any state or federal agency for at least the three (3) years immediately before filing the application. (2)  The board may examine any person qualifying for licensing under this section. (3)  The issuance of a license by endorsement to a military-trained applicant, military spouse or person who establishes residence in this state shall be subject to the provisions of Section 73-50-1 or 73-50-2, as applicable. SECTION 84.  Section 73-39-77, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 73-39-77.  (1) Upon a written complaint sworn to by any person, the board, in its sole discretion, may, after a hearing, revoke, suspend or limit for a certain time a license, impose an administrative fine not to exceed One Thousand Dollars ($1,000.00) for each separate offense, or otherwise discipline any licensed veterinarian for any of the following reasons: (a)  The employment of fraud, misrepresentation or deception in obtaining a license. (b)  The inability to practice veterinary medicine with reasonable skill and safety because of a physical or mental disability, including deterioration of mental capacity, loss of motor skills or abuse of drugs or alcohol of sufficient degree to diminish the person's ability to deliver competent patient care. (c)  The use of advertising or solicitation that is false or misleading. (d)  Conviction of the following in any federal court or in the courts of this state or any other jurisdiction, regardless of whether the sentence is deferred: (i)  Any * * *felony disqualifying crime as provided in the Fresh Start Act; (ii)  Any crime involving cruelty, abuse or neglect of animals, including bestiality; * * *   (iii)  Any crime of moral turpitude; ( * * *iviii) Any crime involving unlawful sexual contact, child abuse, the use or threatened use of a weapon, the infliction of injury, indecent exposure, perjury, false reporting, criminal impersonation, forgery and any other crime involving a lack of truthfulness, veracity or honesty, intimidation of a victim or witness, larceny, or alcohol or drugs. For the purposes of this paragraph, a plea of guilty or a plea of nolo contendere accepted by the court shall be considered as a conviction. (e)  Incompetence, gross negligence or other malpractice in the practice of veterinary medicine. (f)  Aiding the unlawful practice of veterinary medicine. (g)  Fraud or dishonesty in the application or reporting of any test for disease in animals. (h)  Failure to report, as required by law, or making false or misleading report of, any contagious or infectious disease. (i)  Failure to keep accurate patient records. (j)  Dishonesty or gross negligence in the performance of food safety inspections or in the issuance of any health or inspection certificates. (k)  Failure to keep veterinary premises and equipment, including practice vehicles, in a clean and sanitary condition. (l)  Failure to permit the board or its agents to enter and inspect veterinary premises and equipment, including practice vehicles, as set by rules promulgated by the board. (m)  Revocation, suspension or limitation of a license to practice veterinary medicine by another state, territory or district of the United States. (n)  Loss or suspension of accreditation by any federal or state agency. (o)  Unprofessional conduct as defined in regulations adopted by the board. (p)  The dispensing, distribution, prescription or administration of any veterinary prescription drug, or the extralabel use of any drug in the absence of a veterinarian-client-patient relationship. (q)  Violations of state or federal drug laws. (r)  Violations of any order of the board. (s)  Violations of this chapter or of the rules promulgated under this chapter. (t)  Violation(s) of the provisions of Sections 41-121-1 through 41-121-9 relating to deceptive advertisement by health care practitioners. (2)  A certified copy of any judgment of conviction or finding of guilt by a court of competent jurisdiction or by a governmental agency, or agency authorized to issue licenses or permits, including the United States Department of Agriculture, Animal and Plant Health Inspection Service, the Mississippi Board of Animal Health and the Mississippi Board of Health, of a veterinarian or veterinary technician of any matters listed in this section shall be admissible in evidence in any hearing held by the board to discipline such veterinarian or technician and shall constitute prima facie evidence of the commission of any such act. SECTION 85.  Section 73-42-9, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 73-42-9.  (1)  An applicant for registration shall submit an application for registration to the Secretary of State in a form prescribed by the Secretary of State.  An application filed under this section is a public record.  Except as otherwise provided in subsection (2), the application must be in the name of an individual, signed by the applicant under penalty of perjury and must state or contain: (a)  The name of the applicant and the address of the applicant's principal place of business; (b)  The name of the applicant's business or employer, if applicable; (c)  Any business or occupation engaged in by the applicant for the five (5) years next preceding the date of submission of the application; (d)  A description of the applicant's: (i)  Formal training as an athlete agent; (ii)  Practical experience as an athlete agent; and (iii)  Educational background relating to the applicant's activities as an athlete agent; (e)  The names and addresses of three (3) individuals not related to the applicant who are willing to serve as references; (f)  The name, sport and last known team for each individual for whom the applicant provided services as an athlete agent during the five (5) years next preceding the date of submission of the application; (g)  The names and addresses of all persons who are: (i)  With respect to the athlete agent's business if it is not a corporation, the partners, officers, associates, individuals or profit-sharers; and (ii)  With respect to a company or corporation employing the athlete agent, the officers, directors and any shareholder of the corporation or member with a five percent (5%) or greater interest; (h)  Whether the applicant or any other person named pursuant to paragraph (g) has been convicted of a crime that, if committed in this state, would be a * * *felony or other crime involving moral turpitude disqualifying crime as provided in the Fresh Start Act, and identify the crime; (i)  Whether there has been any administrative or judicial determination that the applicant or any other person named pursuant to paragraph (g) has made a false, misleading, deceptive or fraudulent representation; (j)  Any instance in which the conduct of the applicant or any other person named pursuant to paragraph (g) resulted in the imposition of a sanction, suspension or declaration of ineligibility to participate in an interscholastic or intercollegiate athletic event on a student-athlete or educational institution; (k)  Any sanction, suspension or disciplinary action taken against the applicant or any other person named pursuant to paragraph (g) arising out of occupational or professional conduct; (l)  Whether there has been any denial of an application for, suspension or revocation of, or refusal to renew, the certification, registration or licensure of the applicant or any other person named pursuant to paragraph (g) as an athlete agent in any state; (m)  Any pending litigation against the applicant in the applicant's capacity as an agent; (n)  A list of all other states in which the applicant is currently licensed or registered as an athlete agent and a copy of each state's license or registration, as applicable; and (o)  Consent to submit to a criminal background check before being issued a certificate of registration. Any fees connected with the background check shall be assessed to the applicant. (2)  An individual who has submitted an application for, and received a certificate of, registration or licensure as an athlete agent in another state, may submit a copy of the application and a valid certificate of registration or licensure from the other state in lieu of submitting an application in the form prescribed pursuant to subsection (1), along with the information requested in paragraphs (l), (m), (n) and (o) of subsection (1).  The Secretary of State shall accept the application and the certificate from the other state as an application for registration in this state if the application to the other state: (a)  Was submitted in the other state within the six (6) months next preceding the submission of the application in this state and the applicant certifies the information contained in the application is current; (b)  Contains information substantially similar to or more comprehensive than that required in an application submitted in this state; and (c)  Was signed by the applicant under penalty of perjury. (3)  An athlete agent must notify the Secretary of State within thirty (30) days whenever the information contained in any application for registration as an athlete agent in this state changes in a material way or is, or becomes, inaccurate or incomplete in any respect.  Events requiring notice shall include, but are not limited to, the following: (a)  Change in address of the athlete agent's principal place of business; (b)  Conviction of a * * *felony or other crime involving moral turpitude disqualifying crime as provided in the Fresh Start Act by the athlete agent; (c)  Denial, suspension, refusal to renew, or revocation of a registration or license of the athlete agent as an athlete agent in any state; or (d)  Sanction, suspension or other disciplinary action taken against the athlete agent arising out of occupational or professional conduct. SECTION 86.  Section 73-42-11, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 73-42-11.  (1)  Except as otherwise provided in subsection (3), the Secretary of State shall issue a certificate of registration to an individual who complies with Section 73-42-9(1). (2)  Except as otherwise provided in subsection (3), the Secretary of State shall issue a certificate of registration to an individual whose application has been accepted under Section 73-42-9(2). (3)  The Secretary of State may refuse to issue a certificate of registration if they determine that the applicant has engaged in conduct that has a significant adverse effect on the applicant's fitness to serve as an athlete agent.  In making the determination, the Secretary of State may consider whether the applicant has: (a)  Been convicted of a crime in another state that, if committed in this state, would be a * * *felony or other crime involving moral turpitude disqualifying crime as provided in the Fresh Start Act; (b)  Made a materially false, misleading, deceptive or fraudulent representation as an athlete agent or in the application; (c)  Engaged in conduct that would disqualify the applicant from serving in a fiduciary capacity; (d)  Engaged in conduct prohibited by Section 73-42-27; (e)  Had a registration, licensure or certification as an athlete agent suspended, revoked, or denied or been refused renewal of registration, licensure or certification in any state; (f)  Engaged in conduct or failed to engage in conduct the consequence of which was that a sanction, suspension or declaration of ineligibility to participate in an interscholastic or intercollegiate athletic event was imposed on a student-athlete or educational institution; or (g)  Engaged in conduct that significantly adversely reflects on the applicant's trustworthiness or credibility. (4)  In making a determination under subsection (3), the Secretary of State shall consider: (a)  How recently the conduct occurred; (b)  The nature of the conduct and the context in which it occurred; and (c)  Any other relevant conduct of the applicant. (5)  An athlete agent may apply to renew a registration by submitting an application for renewal in a form prescribed by the Secretary of State.  An application filed under this section is a public record.  The application for renewal must be signed by the applicant under penalty of perjury and must contain current information on all matters required in an original registration. (6)  An individual who has submitted an application for renewal of registration or licensure in another state, in lieu of submitting an application for renewal in the form prescribed pursuant to subsection (5), may file a copy of the application for renewal and a valid certificate of registration from the other state.  The Secretary of State shall accept the application for renewal from the other state as an application for renewal in this state if the application to the other state: (a)  Was submitted in the other state within the last six (6) months and the applicant certifies the information contained in the application for renewal is current; (b)  Contains information substantially similar to or more comprehensive than that required in an application for renewal submitted in this state; and (c)  Was signed by the applicant under penalty of perjury. (7)  Except as provided in Section 33-1-39, a certificate of registration or a renewal of a registration is valid for two (2) years. SECTION 87.  Section 73-53-8, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 73-53-8.  (1)  There is created the Board of Examiners for Social Workers and Marriage and Family Therapists to license and regulate social workers and marriage and family therapists.  The board shall be composed of ten (10) members, six (6) of which shall be social workers and four (4) of which shall be marriage and family therapists. (2)  Of the social worker members of the board, two (2) must be licensed social workers, and four (4) must be licensed master social workers or licensed certified social workers or a combination thereof.  The marriage and family therapist members of the board must be licensed marriage and family therapists.  For at least two (2) years immediately preceding his or her appointment, each marriage and family therapist appointee must have been actively engaged as a marriage and family therapist in rendering professional services in marriage and family therapy, or in the education and training of master's, doctoral or post-doctoral students of marriage and family therapy, or in marriage and family therapy research, and during the two (2) years preceding his or her appointment, must have spent the majority of the time devoted to that activity in this state.  The initial marriage and family therapist appointees shall be deemed to be and shall become licensed practicing marriage and family therapists immediately upon their appointment and qualification as members of the board.  All subsequent marriage and family therapist appointees to the board must be licensed marriage and family therapists before their appointment. (3)  The Governor shall appoint six (6) members of the board, four (4) of which shall be social workers and two (2) of which shall be marriage and family therapists, and the Lieutenant Governor shall appoint four (4) members of the board, two (2) of which shall be social workers and two (2) of which shall be marriage and family therapists.  Social worker members of the board shall be appointed from nominations submitted by the Mississippi Chapter of the National Association of Social Workers, and marriage and family therapist members of the board shall be appointed from nominations submitted by the Mississippi Association for Marriage and Family Therapy.  All appointments shall be made with the advice and consent of the Senate. (4)  The initial appointments to the board shall be made as follows:  The Governor shall appoint one (1) social worker member for a term that expires on June 30, 1999, one (1) social worker member for a term that expires on June 30, 2001, two (2) social worker members for terms that expire on June 30, 2002, one (1) marriage and family therapist member for a term that expires on June 30, 1998, and one (1) marriage and family therapist member for a term that expires on June 30, 2000.  The Lieutenant Governor shall appoint one (1) social worker member for a term that expires on June 30, 1998, one (1) social worker member for a term that expires on June 30, 2000, one (1) marriage and family therapist member for a term that expires on June 30, 1999, and one (1) marriage and family therapist member of the board for a term that expires on June 30, 2001.  After the expiration of the initial terms, all subsequent appointments shall be made by the original appointing authorities for terms of four (4) years from the expiration date of the previous term.  Upon the expiration of his or her term of office, a board member shall continue to serve until his or her successor has been appointed and has qualified.  No person may be appointed more than once to fill an unexpired term or more than two (2) consecutive full terms. (5)  Any vacancy on the board before the expiration of a term shall be filled by appointment of the original appointing authority for the remainder of the unexpired term. Appointments to fill vacancies shall be made from nominations submitted by the appropriate organization as specified in subsection (2) of this section for the position being filled. (6)  The appointing authorities shall give due regard to geographic distribution, race and sex in making all appointments to the board. (7)  The board shall select one (1) of its members to serve as chairman during the term of his or her appointment to the board.  No person may serve as chairman for more than four (4) years.  The board may remove any member of the board or the chairman from his or her position as chairman for (a) malfeasance in office, or (b) conviction of a * * *felony or a crime of moral turpitude disqualifying crime as provided in the Fresh Start Act while in office, or (c) failure to attend three (3) consecutive board meetings.  However, no member may be removed until after a public hearing of the charges against him or her, and at least thirty (30) days' prior written notice to the accused member of the charges against him or her and of the date fixed for such hearing.  No board member shall participate in any matter before the board in which he has a pecuniary interest, personal bias or other similar conflict of interest. (8)  Board members shall receive no compensation for their services, but shall be reimbursed for their actual and necessary expenses incurred in the performance of official board business as provided in Section 25-3-41. (9)  Four (4) social worker members and three (3) marriage and family therapist members of the board shall constitute a quorum of the board.  In making its decisions and taking actions affecting the members of one (1) of the professions regulated by the board, the board shall consider the recommendations of the board members who are members of that profession.  If the board is unable to have a quorum present at a regularly scheduled meeting location, the board may allow other members to participate in the meeting by telephone or other electronic means.  In the case of an administrative hearing, when recusals from the process are necessary, a quorum may consist of a simple majority of six (6) members. (10)  The principal office of the board shall be in the City of Jackson, but the board may act and exercise all of its powers at any other place.  The board shall adopt an official seal, which shall be judicially noticed and which shall be affixed to all licenses issued by the board. (11)  The board is authorized to employ, subject to the approval of the State Personnel Board, an executive director and such attorneys, experts and other employees as it may, from time to time, find necessary for the proper performance of its duties and for which the necessary funds are available, and to set the salary of the executive director, subject to the approval of the State Personnel Board. (12)  The board, by a majority vote, from time to time, may make such provisions as it deems appropriate to authorize the performance by any board member or members, employee or other agent of the board of any function given the board in this article or Sections 73-54-1 through 73-54-39. SECTION 88.  Section 73-53-13, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 73-53-13.  The board shall issue the appropriate license to applicants who meet the qualifications of this section. (a)  A license as a "licensed social worker" shall be issued to an applicant who demonstrates to the satisfaction of the board that he or she meets the following qualifications: (i)  Has a baccalaureate degree in social work from a college or university accredited by the Council on Social Work Education or Southern Association of Colleges and Schools and has satisfactorily completed the Association for Social Work Boards (ASWB) examination for this license; or (ii)  Has a comparable license or registration from another state or territory of the United States of America that imposes qualifications substantially similar to those of this article. (b)  A license as a "licensed master's social worker" shall be issued to an applicant who demonstrates to the satisfaction of the board that he or she meets the following qualifications: (i)  Has a doctorate or master's degree from a school of social work accredited by the Council on Social Work Education; and (ii)  Has satisfactorily completed the ASWB examination for this license; or (iii)  Has a comparable license or registration from another state or territory of the United States of America that imposes qualifications substantially similar to those of this article. (c)  A license as a "licensed certified social worker" shall be issued to an applicant who demonstrates to the satisfaction of the board that he or she meets the following qualifications: (i)  Is licensed under this section as a "master's social worker"; and (ii)  Has twenty-four (24) months of professional supervision and clinical or macro social work practice experience acceptable to the board, under appropriate supervision; and (iii)  Has satisfactorily completed the ASWB examination for this license; or (iv)  Has a comparable license or registration from another state or territory of the United States of America that imposes qualifications substantially similar to those of this article. (d)  In addition to the above qualifications, an applicant for any of the above licenses must prove to the board's satisfaction: (i)  Age of at least twenty-one (21) years, and * * *   (ii)  Good moral character, which is a continuing requirement for licensure, and ( * * *iiiii)  United States of America citizenship or status as a legal resident alien, and ( * * *iviii)  Absence of conviction of a * * * felony related to the practice of social work for the last ten (10) years disqualifying crime as provided in the Fresh Start Act. Conviction, as used in this subparagraph, includes a deferred conviction, deferred prosecution, deferred sentence, finding or verdict of guilt, an admission of guilty, or a plea of nolo contendere, and ( * * *viv)  That the applicant has not been declared mentally incompetent by any court, and if any such decree has ever been rendered, that the decree has since been changed, and ( * * *viv)  Freedom from dependency on alcohol or drugs, and ( * * *viivi)  Complete criminal history records check, including a fingerprint and an acceptable sex offender check, by appropriate governmental authorities as prescribed by the board. (e)  Only individuals licensed as "certified social workers" shall be permitted to call themselves "clinical social workers." The issuance of a license by reciprocity to a military-trained applicant, military spouse or person who establishes residence in this state shall be subject to the provisions of Section 73-50-1 or 73-50-2, as applicable. Each application or filing made under this section shall include the social security number(s) of the applicant in accordance with Section 93-11-64. SECTION 89.  Section 73-53-17, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 73-53-17.  (1)  Individuals licensed by the board shall conduct their activities, services and practice in accordance with the laws governing their professional practice and any rules promulgated by the board.  Licensees and applicants may be subject to the exercise of the sanctions enumerated in Section 73-53-23 if the board finds that a licensee or applicant has committed any of the following: (a)  Negligence in the practice or performance of professional services or activities; (b)  Engaging in dishonorable, unethical or unprofessional conduct of a character likely to deceive, defraud or harm the public in the course of professional services or activities; (c)  Perpetrating or cooperating in fraud or material deception in obtaining or renewing a license or attempting the same; (d)  Violating the rules and regulations established by the board; (e)  Violating the National Association of Social Workers Code of Ethics or the American Association for Marriage and Family Therapy Code of Ethics; (f)  Being convicted of * * * any a crime * * * which has a substantial relationship to the licensee's activities and services or an essential element of which is if misstatement, fraud or dishonesty is an essential element of the crime; (g)  Being convicted of any crime which is a * * * felony disqualifying crime as provided in the Fresh Start Act under the laws of this state or of the United States of America; (h)  Engaging in or permitting the performance of unacceptable services personally due to the licensee's deliberate or grossly negligent act or acts or failure to act, regardless of whether actual damage or damages to the public is established, or assuming responsibility for another's work by signing documents without personal knowledge of the work as established by board rule; (i)  Continued practice although the licensee has become unfit to practice social work due to:  (i) failure to keep abreast of current professional theory or practice; or (ii) physical or mental disability; the entry of an order or judgment by a court of competent jurisdiction that a licensee is in need of mental treatment or is incompetent shall constitute mental disability; or (iii) addiction or severe dependency upon alcohol or other drugs which may endanger the public by impairing the licensee's ability to practice; (j)  Continued practice although the individual failed to renew and has a lapsed license; (k)  Having disciplinary action taken against the licensee's license in another state; (l)  Making differential, detrimental treatment against any person because of race, color, creed, sex, religion or national origin; (m)  Engaging in lewd conduct in connection with professional services or activities; (n)  Engaging in false or misleading advertising; (o)  Contracting, assisting or permitting unlicensed persons to perform services for which a license is required under this article; (p)  Violation of any probation requirements placed on a licensee by the board; (q)  Revealing confidential information except as may be required by law; (r)  Failing to inform clients of the fact that the client no longer needs the services or professional assistance of the licensee; (s)  Charging excessive or unreasonable fees or engaging in unreasonable collection practices. (2)  The board may order a licensee to submit to a reasonable physical or mental examination if the licensee's physical or mental capacity to practice safely is at issue in a disciplinary proceeding. (3)  Failure to comply with a board order to submit to a physical or mental examination shall render a licensee subject to the summary suspension procedures described in Section 73-53-23. (4)  In addition to the reasons specified in subsection (1) of this section, the board shall be authorized to suspend the license of any licensee for being out of compliance with an order for support, as defined in Section 93-11-153.  The procedure for suspension of a license for being out of compliance with an order for support, and the procedure for the reissuance or reinstatement of a license suspended for that purpose, and the payment of any fees for the reissuance or reinstatement of a license suspended for that purpose, shall be governed by Section 93-11-157 or 93-11-163, as the case may be.  If there is any conflict between any provision of Section 93-11-157 or 93-11-163 and any provision of this article, the provisions of Section 93-11-157 or 93-11-163, as the case may be, shall control. SECTION 90.  Section 73-54-13, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 73-54-13.  Each person desiring to obtain a license as a marriage and family therapist or marriage and family therapy associate shall make application thereof to the board in such manner as the board prescribes and with required application fees and shall furnish evidence satisfactory to the board that he or she: * * *(a)  Is of good moral character; ( * * *ba)  Has not engaged or is not engaged in any practice or conduct which would be a ground for refusing to issue a license under Section 73-54-29 or Section 73-53-17; ( * * *cb)  Is qualified for licensure pursuant to the requirements of this chapter; and ( * * *dc)  Is at least twenty-one (21) years of age. SECTION 91.  Section 73-55-19, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 73-55-19.  (1)  Any person licensed under this chapter may have his license revoked or suspended for a fixed period to be determined by the board for any of the following causes: (a)  Being convicted of * * * an offense involving moral turpitude a disqualifying crime as provided in the Fresh Start Act.  The record of such conviction, or certified copy thereof from the clerk of the court where such conviction occurred or by the judge of that court, shall be sufficient evidence to warrant revocation or suspension. (b)  By securing a license under this chapter through fraud or deceit. (c)  For unethical conduct or for gross ignorance or inefficiency in the conduct of his practice. (d)  For knowingly practicing while suffering with a contagious or infectious disease. (e)  For the use of a false name or alias in the practice of his profession. (f)  For violating any of the provisions of this chapter. (2)  Any person, whose license is sought to be revoked or suspended under the provisions of this chapter, shall be given thirty (30) days' notice, in writing, enumerating the charges and specifying a date for public hearing thereon.  The hearing shall be held in the county where the person's business is conducted.  The board may issue subpoenas, compel the attendance and testimony of witnesses, and place them under oath, the same as any court of competent jurisdiction where the hearing takes place. (3)  At all hearings the board may designate in writing one or more persons deemed competent by the board to conduct the hearing as trial examiner or trial committee, with the decision to be rendered in accordance with the provisions of subsection (4) of this section. (4)  After a hearing has been completed the trial examiner or trial committee who conducted the hearing shall proceed to consider the case and, as soon as practicable, shall render a decision.  In any case, the decision must be rendered within sixty (60) days after the hearing.  The decision shall contain: (a)  The findings of fact made by the trial examiner or trial committee; (b)  Conclusions of law reached by the trial examiner or trial committee; and (c)  The order based upon these findings of fact and conclusions of law. (5)  From any revocation or suspension, the person charged may, within thirty (30) days thereof, appeal to the chancery court of the county where the hearing was held. (6)  Notice of appeals shall be filed in the office of the clerk of the court, who shall issue a writ of certiorari directed to the board, commanding it within ten (10) days after service thereof to certify to such court its entire record in the matter in which the appeal has been taken.  The appeal shall thereupon be heard in the due course by said court without a jury, and the court shall review the record and make its determination of the cause between the parties. (7)  If there is an appeal, such appeal may, in the discretion of and on motion to the chancery court, act as a supersedeas.  The chancery court shall dispose of the appeal and enter its decision promptly.  The hearing on the appeal may, in the discretion of the chancellor, be tried in vacation. (8)  Any person taking an appeal shall post a satisfactory bond in the amount of Two Hundred Dollars ($200.00) for payment of any costs which may be adjudged against him. (9)  In addition to the reasons specified in subsection (1) of this section, the board shall be authorized to suspend the license of any licensee for being out of compliance with an order for support, as defined in Section 93-11-153.  The procedure for suspension of a license for being out of compliance with an order for support, and the procedure for the reissuance or reinstatement of a license suspended for that purpose, and the payment of any fees for the reissuance or reinstatement of a license suspended for that purpose, shall be governed by Section 93-11-157 or 93-11-163, as the case may be.  Actions taken by the board in suspending a license when required by Section 93-11-157 or 93-11-163 are not actions from which an appeal may be taken under this section.  Any appeal of a license suspension that is required by Section 93-11-157 or 93-11-163 shall be taken in accordance with the appeal procedure specified in Section 93-11-157 or 93-11-163, as the case may be, rather than the procedure specified in this section.  If there is any conflict between any provision of Section 93-11-157 or 93-11-163 and any provision of this chapter, the provisions of Section 93-11-157 or 93-11-163, as the case may be, shall control. SECTION 92.  Section 73-60-31, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 73-60-31.  The Appraisal Board may refuse to issue, renew, or may revoke or suspend, a license or may place on probation, censure, reprimand or take other disciplinary action with regard to any license issued under this chapter, including the issuance of fines for each violation, for any one (1) or combination of the following causes: (a)  Violations of this chapter or the Appraisal Board's rules promulgated pursuant hereto; (b)  Violation of terms of license probation; (c)  Conviction of a * * *felony disqualifying crime as provided in the Fresh Start Act or making a plea of guilty or nolo contendere within five (5) years prior to the date of application; (d)  Operating without adequate insurance coverage required for licensees; (e)  Fraud in the procurement or performance of a contract to conduct a home inspection; and (f)  Failure to submit to or pass a background investigation pursuant to Section 73-60-47. SECTION 93.  Section 73-63-27, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 73-63-27.  (1)  (a)  Except as provided in subsections (2) and (3) of this section, the following shall be considered as minimum evidence satisfactory to the board that the applicant is qualified for registration as a registered professional geologist: (i)  Graduation from a course of study in geology satisfactory to the board from an accredited college or university, or from a program accredited by an organization recognized by the board, of four (4) or more years and which includes at least thirty (30) semester or forty-five (45) quarter hours of credit, with a major in geology or a geological specialty; (ii)  Demonstration through a specific record of a minimum of four (4) years of qualifying experience, after completion of the academic requirements, in geology or a specialty indicating that the applicant is competent to practice geology or a specialty.  The board may require the experience be gained under the supervision of a geologist registered in this state or any other state with at least as stringent geologic registration requirements, or under the supervision of others who, in the opinion of the board, are qualified to have responsible charge of geological work; (iii)  Successful passage of at least one (1) examination in geology as determined and prescribed by the board; and (iv)  Other requirements as may be established in rules and regulations by the board. (b)  In addition to the qualifications named in paragraph (a) of this subsection, applicants for registration as a registered professional geologist shall include with their application at least three (3) letters of reference from geologists having personal knowledge of the applicant's geologic experience. (c)  The board may give credit for a master's degree in the geological sciences or in a specialty as one (1) year of professional experience and an earned doctorate degree in the geological sciences or in a specialty as two (2) years of professional experience.  The board shall not give more than two (2) years of professional experience credit for the completion of all graduate degrees. (d)  The board may give credit for geological research or teaching of persons studying geology or a specialty at an accredited college or university level as qualifying experience, if the research or teaching, in the opinion of the board, is comparable to experience obtained in the practice of geology or a specialty. (e)  The board may adopt qualifications which, in its judgment, are equivalent to the educational and experience requirements in subsection (1)(a) of this section. * * *  (f)  No person shall be eligible for registration as a professional geologist who is not of good character and reputation. (2)  Before December 31, 1998, any applicant who applies for registration or enrollment shall be considered qualified, without written examination, if the applicant possesses the qualifications prescribed in subsection (1) or (3) of this section, as the case may be. (3)  An applicant who applies for registration before July 1, 1998, shall be qualified without written examination, if the applicant possesses the following qualifications: (a)  A bachelor's degree from an accredited college or university in civil engineering with a minimum of fifteen (15) semester hours or an equivalent number of quarter hours of credit in geology or a geologically-related course, as determined by the board; (b)  A certificate of registration as a professional engineer in the State of Mississippi; and (c)  A minimum of ten (10) years of qualifying experience in geotechnical or geological engineering work demonstrated by a specific record. If the board determines after review of the academic and experience qualifications required by this subsection that the applicant is competent to practice geology, the board may issue a certificate of registration under this chapter. (4)  Applicants for enrollment as a geologist-in-training shall meet the qualifications for a registered professional geologist, except the requirement for four (4) years of experience. (5)  The board may adopt requirements for the issuance of temporary registrations.  Qualifications for temporary registrations shall be consistent with those required under this chapter. (6)  Upon written request of an applicant, the board may waive, on a case-by-case basis, any requirement for registration or enrollment, except payment of the applicable fees.  The request shall state the reasons a waiver should be granted.  The requirements waived and the basis for that waiver shall be recorded in the applicant's record and in the proceedings of the board, and any waiver may be subject to repeal or suspension as determined by the board. SECTION 94.  Section 73-65-13, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 73-65-13.  (1)  The board may deny any application, or suspend or revoke any license held or applied for under the provisions of Section 73-65-7 if the person: (a)  Is found guilty of fraud, deceit, or misrepresentation in procuring or attempting to procure a license to practice art therapy; (b)  Is adjudicated mentally incompetent; (c)  Is found guilty of a * * *felony or misdemeanor involving moral turpitude disqualifying crime as provided in the Fresh Start Act; (d)  Is found guilty of unprofessional or unethical conduct in this or any other jurisdiction; (e)  Has been using any controlled substance or alcoholic beverage to an extent or in a manner dangerous to the person, any other person, or the public, or to an extent that the use impairs the ability to perform as a licensed professional art therapist; (f)  Has violated any provision of this chapter; or (g)  Willfully or negligently divulges a professional confidence. (2)  A certified copy of the record of conviction shall be conclusive evidence of the conviction. (3)  Disciplinary proceedings may be initiated upon the receipt by the board of a sworn complaint by any person, including members of the board. SECTION 95.  Section 73-66-17, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 73-66-17.  (1)  The board may sanction a licensee for any of the following acts: (a)  Ineligibility for licensure, including, but not limited to, falsification of information submitted for licensure or failure to maintain status as a board-certified music therapist; (b)  Failure to pay fees when due; (c)  Failure to provide requested information in a timely manner; (d)  Conviction of a * * *felony disqualifying crime as provided in the Fresh Start Act; (e)  Conviction of any crime that reflects an inability to practice music therapy with due regard for the health and safety of clients and patients, or with due regard for the truth in filing claims with Medicare, Medicaid or any third-party payor; (f)  Inability or failure to practice music therapy with reasonable skill and consistent with the welfare of clients and patients, including, but not limited to, negligence in the practice of music therapy; intoxication; incapacity; and abuse of or engaging in sexual contact with a client or patient; and (g)  Disciplinary action by another jurisdiction. (2)  The department is authorized to conduct investigations into allegations of conduct described in subsection (1) of this section. (3)  The board may impose one or more of the following sanctions upon a licensee for a violation of this chapter: (a)  Suspension of a license; (b)  Revocation of a license; (c)  Denial of a license; (d)  Refusal to renew a license; (e)  Probation with conditions; (f)  Reprimand; or (g)  A fine of not less than One Hundred Dollars ($100.00) or more than One Thousand Dollars ($1,000.00) for each violation. SECTION 96.  Section 73-67-21, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 73-67-21.  (1)  It shall be the responsibility of a massage therapy establishment to verify the current license of any and all persons practicing massage therapy at the location of or on behalf of the establishment.  Failure to comply is subject to penalty assessed by the board of not less than Five Hundred Dollars ($500.00) and not more than One Thousand Dollars ($1,000.00) per offense. (2)  No person may advertise massage or practice massage for compensation in this state unless he is licensed as a massage therapist by the board.  No person may use the title of or represent himself to be a massage therapist or use any other title, abbreviations, letters, figures, signs or devices that indicate that the person is a massage therapist unless he is licensed to practice massage therapy under the provisions of this chapter.  A current massage therapy license issued by the board shall at all times be prominently displayed in any place where massage therapy is being practiced. (3)  The following are requirements for licensure: (a)  An applicant must be eighteen (18) years of age, or older, on the date the application is submitted. (b)  An application must provide proof of high school graduate equivalency. (c)  An applicant must be of legal status not only to receive a license, but also to work in the State of Mississippi with that license. (d)  An applicant must supply proof of current certification in cardiopulmonary resuscitation (CPR) and first aid of at least eight (8) hours of training, including practical testing, and supply documentation of familiarity with the Americans with Disabilities Act. (e)  All required fees for licensure must be submitted by the applicant. (f)  Any and all requirements regarding * * * good moral character and competency, as provided for in this chapter and in accepted codes of ethics, shall be met. (g)  An applicant must have completed an approved course on communicable diseases, including HIV/AIDS information and prevention. (h)  The applicant's official and certified transcript(s) from the applicant's massage therapy school.  The transcript must verify that the applicant has completed a board-approved training program of no less than the minimum requirement for massage therapy instruction and student clinic, with a minimum grade requirement of "C" or better in every course of instruction, as stated for school requirements. (4)  The following pre-act practitioners are exempt from having to take any examination for licensure, but must fulfill all other requirements as stated in this chapter, except for the requirements in subsection (3)(h) of this section: (a)  Those having more than three hundred (300) documented, board-accepted hours of massage therapy education before January 1, 2001. (b)  Those having more than five (5) years of professional massage therapy experience and a minimum of one hundred fifty (150) hours of approved massage therapy education. (c)  Those having no formal training, but who have successfully passed the National Certification Examination for Therapeutic Massage and Bodywork. (d)  All grandfathering exemption allowances as stated in this subsection (4) shall end on July 1, 2002, for nonstudents, and on June 1, 2003, for students who were enrolled in a part-time massage school curriculum on July 1, 2001.  Individuals may apply for a license until the grandfathering exemption ends, but may not practice massage beyond the allowed grace period as provided for in Section 73-67-37 unless a valid massage therapy license or provisional permit is obtained.  Except as provided in subsection (5) of this section, all other pre-act practitioners and anyone not practicing massage therapy before January 1, 2001, must take and pass the licensure examination and follow the requirements in this chapter to practice massage therapy for compensation in Mississippi. (e)  Students enrolled in a massage therapy curriculum of at least five hundred (500) hours on July 1, 2001, who complete graduation from the same curriculum. (5)  Any person who has practiced massage therapy for a period of more than twenty-five (25) years before March 14, 2005, who is employed as a massage therapist by a YMCA or YWCA authorized and existing as a nonprofit corporation under the laws of this state on March 14, 2005, is exempt from having to take any examination for licensure, but must fulfill all other requirements as stated in this chapter, except for the requirements in subsection (3)(b), (d), (g) and (h) of this section. Persons exempt under this subsection may apply for a massage therapy license until January 1, 2006, but may not practice massage therapy after January 1, 2006, unless a valid license is obtained. (6)  Certificates of registration issued by the board before July 1, 2008, shall remain valid as licenses until the next renewal period. (7)  An applicant must have successfully been cleared for licensure through an investigation that shall consist of a * * * determination as to good moral character and verification that the prospective licensee is not guilty of or in violation of any statutory ground for denial of licensure as set forth in Section 73-67-27. (a)  To assist the board in conducting its licensure investigation, all applicants shall undergo a fingerprint-based criminal history records check of the Mississippi central criminal database and the Federal Bureau of Investigation criminal history database.  Each applicant shall submit a full set of the applicant's fingerprints in a form and manner prescribed by the board, which shall be forwarded to the Mississippi Department of Public Safety (department) and the Federal Bureau of Investigation Identification Division for this purpose. (b)  Any and all state or national criminal history records information obtained by the board that is not already a matter of public record shall be deemed nonpublic and confidential information restricted to the exclusive use of the board, its members, officers, investigators, agents and attorneys in evaluating the applicant's eligibility or disqualification for licensure, and shall be exempt from the Mississippi Public Records Act of 1983.  Except when introduced into evidence in a hearing before the board to determine licensure, no such information or records related thereto shall, except with the written consent of the applicant or by order of a court of competent jurisdiction, be released or otherwise disclosed by the board to any other person or agency. (c)  The board shall provide to the department the fingerprints of the applicant, any additional information that may be required by the department, and a form signed by the applicant consenting to the check of the criminal records and to the use of the fingerprints and other identifying information required by the state or national repositories. (d)  The board shall charge and collect from the applicant, in addition to all other applicable fees and costs, such amount as may be incurred by the board in requesting and obtaining state and national criminal history records information on the applicant. SECTION 97.  Section 73-67-27, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 73-67-27.  (1)  The board may refuse to issue or renew or may deny, suspend or revoke any license held or applied for under this chapter upon finding that the holder of a license or applicant: (a)  Is guilty of fraud, deceit or misrepresentation in procuring or attempting to procure any license provided for in this chapter; (b)  Attempted to use as his own the license of another; (c)  Allowed the use of his license by another; (d)  Has been adjudicated as mentally incompetent by regularly constituted authorities; (e)  Has been convicted of a disqualifying crime, or has charges or disciplinary action pending, that directly relates to the practice of massage therapy or to the ability to practice massage therapy as provided in the Fresh Start Act.  Any plea of nolo contendere shall be considered a conviction for the purposes of this section; (f)  Is guilty of unprofessional or unethical conduct as defined by the code of ethics; (g)  Is guilty of false, misleading or deceptive advertising, or is guilty of aiding or assisting in the advertising or practice of any unlicensed or unpermitted person in the practice of massage therapy; (h)  Is grossly negligent or incompetent in the practice of massage therapy; or (i)  Has had rights, credentials or one or more license(s) to practice massage therapy revoked, suspended or denied in any jurisdiction, territory or possession of the United States or another country for acts of the licensee similar to acts described in this section.  A certified copy of the record of the jurisdiction making such a revocation, suspension or denial shall be conclusive evidence thereof * * *; or. * * *  (j)  Has been convicted of any  felony, other than a violation of federal or state tax laws. (2)  Investigative proceedings may be implemented by a complaint by any person, including members of the board. (3)  (a)  Any person(s) found guilty of prostitution using as any advertisement, claim or insignia of being an actual licensed massage therapist or to be practicing massage therapy by using the word "massage" or any other description indicating the same, whether or not the person(s) have one or more license for the person(s) or establishment(s), shall be guilty of a misdemeanor, and upon conviction, shall be punished by a fine of not less than One Thousand Dollars ($1,000.00), nor more than Five Thousand Dollars ($5,000.00), or imprisonment of up to six (6) months, or both, per offense, per person. (b)  Any person who knowingly participates in receiving illegal service(s) of any person found guilty as described in paragraph (a) of this subsection, upon conviction, shall be punished by a fine not exceeding Five Hundred Dollars ($500.00), or imprisonment for up to one (1) month, or both.  Persons officially designated to investigate complaints are exempt. (c)  Any person who violates any provision of this chapter, other than violation(s) of paragraph (a) of this subsection, is guilty of a misdemeanor, and upon conviction, shall be punished by a fine not exceeding Five Hundred Dollars ($500.00), or imprisonment for up to one (1) month in jail, or both, per offense. (d)  The board, in its discretion, may assess and tax any part or all of the costs of any disciplinary proceedings conducted against either the accused, the charging party, or both, as it may elect. SECTION 98.  Section 73-69-7, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 73-69-7.  (1)  The State Fire Marshal shall administer and enforce the provisions of this chapter and shall have the authority to promulgate and adopt such rules and regulations as may be necessary for such proper administration and enforcement.  The Electronic Protection Advisory Licensing Board created in Section 73-69-21 shall advise the State Fire Marshal with respect to the rules and regulations of the provisions of this chapter.  The State Fire Marshal shall have the authority to approve written training programs or acceptable equivalents for meeting the training requirements of this licensing law.  The State Fire Marshal may also accept, as such an equivalent, licensure of a company or person by a jurisdiction outside this state, which has standards and requirements of practice which substantially conform to the provisions of this chapter.  The State Fire Marshal shall also establish continuing education requirements. (2)  Application for a Class A license.  In order to engage in alarm contracting, a company shall apply for and obtain a Class A license for each operating location doing business in the state.  A Class A license shall authorize a company to engage in any type of alarm contracting.  An applicant for a Class A license shall submit the following to the State Fire Marshal: (a)  Documentation that the company is an entity duly authorized to conduct business within this state. (b)  Documentation that the company holds a general liability and errors and omissions insurance policy, or a surety bond, in an amount not less than Three Hundred Thousand Dollars ($300,000.00). (c)  Documentation that the company carries a current and valid workers' compensation insurance policy as required by state law. (d)  The name of the person who will serve as the designated agent of the company. (e)  For a company applying for a Class A license, evidence that the company has at least one (1) employee who holds a Class B license at each of its operating locations. (f)  A statement that no officer or principal has been convicted of a * * *felony disqualifying crime as provided in the Fresh Start Act, has received a first-time offender pardon for a * * *felony disqualifying crime as provided in the Fresh Start Act, or has entered a plea of guilty or nolo contendere to a * * *felony charge disqualifying crime as provided in the Fresh Start Act. (g)  The application fee authorized by this chapter. (h)  Documentation that the company is located within the physical boundaries of the state. (i)  Beginning on July 1, 2014, in order to assist the Office of the State Fire Marshal in determining an applicant's suitability for a license under this chapter, a Class A applicant, upon request from the State Fire Marshal, shall submit a set of fingerprints for all officers and principals with the submission of an application for license or at such time as deemed necessary by the State Fire Marshal.  The Office of the State Fire Marshal shall forward the fingerprints to the Department of Public Safety for the purpose of conducting a criminal history record check.  If no disqualifying record is identified at the state level, the fingerprints shall be forwarded by the Department of Public Safety to the Federal Bureau of Investigation for a national criminal history record check.  Fees related to the criminal history record check shall be paid by the applicant to the State Fire Marshal and the monies from such fees shall be deposited in the special fund in the State Treasury designated as the Electronic Protection Licensing Fund. (j)  The name of each company providing monitoring services. (3)  If the action by the State Fire Marshal is to nonrenew or to deny an application for license, the State Fire Marshal shall notify the applicant or licensee and advise, in writing, the applicant or licensee of the reason for the denial or nonrenewal of the applicant's or licensee's license.  The applicant or licensee may make written demand upon the State Fire Marshal within ten (10) days for a hearing before the State Fire Marshal to determine the reasonableness of the State Fire Marshal's action.  The hearing shall be held within thirty (30) days. SECTION 99.  Section 73-69-9, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 73-69-9.  (1)  Any entity desiring to engage in alarm contracting shall hold a Class A Alarm Contracting Business license issued by the State Fire Marshal. (2)  If the State Fire Marshal finds that a company has met the requirements of licensing, he shall issue a Class A license to engage in alarm contracting to that company upon payment of the license fee authorized by this chapter.  Such license shall include the name of the designated agent of the alarm contracting company as applicable. (3)  Each alarm contracting company shall be physically located within the boundaries of the state and shall clearly display its license in a conspicuous location at its place of business. (4)  Each alarm contracting company shall employ a Class B license holder. (5)  The designated agent of an alarm contracting company shall notify the State Fire Marshal within ten (10) days of the following: (a)  Any change in the business address of the company. (i)  Any change in ownership of or interest in the company. (ii)  Any owner, partner or other principal with an interest in the company, which has been convicted of a * * *felony disqualifying crime as provided in the Fresh Start Act or entered a plea of guilty or nolo contendere to such a * * *felony charge or received a first-time offender pardon. (b)  Any change in the employment of a person holding an individual license. (c)  A change of the company providing monitoring services. (6)  In the event of the death of its designated agent or his separation from the company for any other reason, an alarm contracting company shall name another qualified owner or manager as its designated agent within ninety (90) days and shall notify the State Fire Marshal of such designation within ten (10) days. (7)  Each alarm contracting company doing business in the state shall be open for inspection by the State Fire Marshal or his designated representative at any reasonable time for the purpose of observation and collection of facts and data relating to proper enforcement of this chapter.  No person acting on behalf of an alarm contracting company shall refuse to admit the State Fire Marshal or his designated representative to an operating location. (8)  Client records must be maintained for inspection by the State Fire Marshal for a three-year period. SECTION 100.  Section 73-69-11, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 73-69-11.  (1)  Any person employed by an alarm contracting company shall hold an individual license issued by the State Fire Marshal.  Such license shall authorize its holder to engage in alarm contracting, only to the extent of the terms as further provided in this chapter. (2)  Such application shall be accompanied by: (a)  Two (2) suitable photographs of the applicant acceptable to the State Fire Marshal.  The State Fire Marshal shall keep one (1) photograph on file and shall make the other photograph a part of any license subsequently issued to the applicant. (b)  Documentation that the applicant meets educational requirements applicable to the type of license for which he is applying, as follows: (i)  For a Class B license:  a minimum of Electronic Security Association, Level 2 A and Level 2 B Burglar Alarm training course or the Electronic Security Association, Fire Alarm Installation Methods and Advanced Intrusion Systems training courses, or equivalent training approved by the State Fire Marshal, and documentation proving residency within a radius of one hundred fifty (150) miles of the office to which he is assigned. (ii)  For a Class C license:  a minimum of Electronic Security Association Level 1 Certified Alarm/Security Technician training course, or equivalent training approved by the State Fire Marshal. (iii)  For a Class D license:  a minimum of Electronic Security Association, Understanding Electronic Security Systems training course, or equivalent training approved by the State Fire Marshal. (iv)  For a Class H license:  application by a Class B or Class C license holder that they will provide direct supervision of the Class H licensee. (c)  (i)  A statement by the applicant that he has not been convicted of a * * *felony disqualifying crime as provided in the Fresh Start Act, received a first-time offender pardon for a * * *felony disqualifying crime as provided in the Fresh Start Act, or entered a plea of guilty or nolo contendere to a * * *felony charge disqualifying crime as provided in the Fresh Start Act. * * *  A felony that has been dismissed pursuant to the Mississippi Criminal Code or equivalent judicial dismissal shall not apply to this paragraph. (ii)  A conviction or a plea of guilty or nolo contendere to a * * * felony charge disqualifying crime as provided in the Fresh Start Act or receipt of a first-time offender pardon shall not constitute an automatic disqualification as otherwise required pursuant to subparagraph (i) if ten (10) or more years have elapsed between the date of application and the successful completion or service of any sentence, deferred adjudication or period of probation or parole. (iii)  Subparagraph (ii) shall not apply to any person convicted of a felony crime of violence or a sex offense as defined within the Mississippi Criminal Code. (d)  The State Fire Marshal shall have the authority to conduct criminal history verification on a local, state or national level.  Beginning on July 1, 2014, in order to assist the Office of the State Fire Marshal in determining an applicant's suitability for a license under this chapter, an applicant shall submit a set of fingerprints with the submission of an application for license.  The Office of the State Fire Marshal shall forward the fingerprints to the Department of Public Safety for the purpose of conducting a criminal history record check. If no disqualifying record is identified at the state level, the fingerprints shall be forwarded by the Department of Public Safety to the Federal Bureau of Investigation for a national criminal history record check.  Fees related to the criminal history record check shall be paid by the applicant to the State Fire Marshal and the monies from such fees shall be deposited in the special fund in the State Treasury designated as the Electronic Protection Licensing Fund. (e)  The application fee authorized by this chapter. (3)  The State Fire Marshal shall have the authority to determine if information submitted by an applicant is in a form acceptable to him.  The State Fire Marshal shall verify or have another entity verify information submitted by each applicant. (4)  If the State Fire Marshal finds that an applicant has met the applicable requirements of the alarm licensing law, he shall issue the appropriate type of license to the applicant upon payment of the license fee authorized by this chapter. (5)  Each individual license holder shall maintain his license on his person while engaging in any type of alarm contracting as applicable.  Each such license holder shall present his license for inspection upon demand by an employee of the Office of the State Fire Marshal or a law enforcement officer. (6)  Each individual license holder shall notify the State Fire Marshal, on a form specified and provided by the State Fire Marshal, within ten (10) days of the following: (a)  Any change in business or home address. (b)  Any separation from an employer or change in employer. (c)  Any conviction for a * * *felony or entry of a plea of guilty or nolo contendere to a felony charge or receipt of a first‑time offender pardon disqualifying crime as provided in the Fresh Start Act. (7)  No individual licensed under this chapter shall contract for his services as an independent contractor or agent without applying for and being issued a Class A license per Section 73-69-9.  No alarm contracting company shall contract for the independent services of a holder of an individual license under this section. (8)  The State Fire Marshal may enter into reciprocal agreements with other states for mutual recognition of individual license holders, if the State Fire Marshal has established the criteria for acceptance of reciprocal agreements by rule or regulation.  The issuance of a license by reciprocity to a military-trained applicant, military spouse or person who establishes residence in this state shall be subject to the provisions of Section 73-50-1 or 73-50-2, as applicable. (9)  If the action by the State Fire Marshal is to nonrenew or to deny an application for license, the State Fire Marshal shall notify the applicant or licensee and advise, in writing, the applicant or licensee of the reason for the denial or nonrenewal of the applicant's or licensee's license.  The applicant or licensee may make written demand upon the State Fire Marshal within ten (10) days for a hearing before the State Fire Marshal to determine the reasonableness of the State Fire Marshal's action.  The hearing shall be held within thirty (30) days. SECTION 101.  Section 73-71-19, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 73-71-19.  (1)  No person shall be licensed to practice acupuncture unless he or she has passed an examination and/or has been found to have the necessary qualifications as prescribed in the regulations adopted by the board. (2)  Before any applicant is eligible for an examination or qualification, he or she shall furnish satisfactory proof that he or she: (a)  Is a citizen or permanent resident of the United States; (b)  Has demonstrated proficiency in the English language; (c)  Is at least twenty-one (21) years of age; * * *(d)  Is of good moral character; ( * * *ed)  Has completed a program of acupuncture and has received a certificate or diploma from an institute approved by the board, according to the provisions of this chapter; ( * * *fe)  Has completed a clinical internship training as approved by the board; and ( * * *gf)  Has received training in cardiopulmonary resuscitation (CPR). (3)  The board may hold an examination at least once a year, and all applicants shall be notified in writing of the date and time of all examinations.  The board may use a NCCAOM examination if it deems that national examination to be sufficient to qualify a practitioner for licensure in this state.  In no case shall the state's own examination be less rigorous than the nationally recognized examination. (4)  In addition to the written examination, if the nationally recognized examination does not provide a suitable practical examination comparable to board standards, the board shall examine each applicant in the practical application of Oriental medical diagnostic and treatment techniques in a manner and by methods that reveal the applicant's skill and knowledge. (5)  The board shall require all qualified applicants to be examined in the following subjects: (a)  Anatomy and physiology; (b)  Pathology; (c)  Diagnosis; (d)  Hygiene, sanitation and sterilization techniques; (e)  All major acupuncture principles, practices and techniques; and (f)  Clean Needle Technique Exam. (6)  To assist the board in conducting its licensure investigation, all applicants shall undergo a fingerprint-based criminal history records check of the Mississippi central criminal database and the Federal Bureau of Investigation criminal history database.  Each applicant shall submit a full set of the applicant's fingerprints in a form and manner prescribed by the board, which shall be forwarded to the Mississippi Department of Public Safety (department) and the Federal Bureau of Investigation Identification Division for this purpose.  Any and all state or national criminal history records information obtained by the board that is not already a matter of public record shall be deemed nonpublic and confidential information restricted to the exclusive use of the board, its members, officers, investigators, agents and attorneys in evaluating the applicant's eligibility or disqualification for licensure, and shall be exempt from the Mississippi Public Records Act of 1983.  Except when introduced into evidence in a hearing before the board to determine licensure, no such information or records related thereto shall, except with the written consent of the applicant or by order of a court of competent jurisdiction, be released or otherwise disclosed by the board to any other person or agency.  The board shall provide to the department the fingerprints of the applicant, any additional information that may be required by the department, and a form signed by the applicant consenting to the check of the criminal records and to the use of the fingerprints and other identifying information required by the state or national repositories.  The board shall charge and collect from the applicant, in addition to all other applicable fees and costs, such amount as may be incurred by the board in requesting and obtaining state and national criminal history records information on the applicant. (7)  The board shall issue a license to every applicant whose application has been filed with and approved by the board and who has paid the required fees and who either: (a)  Has passed the board's written examination and practical examination, with a score of not less than seventy percent (70%) on each examination; or (b)  Has achieved a passing score on a board approved nationally recognized examination, which examination includes a written and practical portion, as determined by the board; or (c)  Has received certification from a board approved national certification process; or (d)  Has achieved a passing score on a board approved nationally recognized written examination and has passed the board's practical examination with a score of not less than seventy percent (70%). (8)  The board shall keep a record of all examinations held, together with the names and addresses of all persons taking examinations, and the examination results.  Within forty-five (45) days after the examination, the board shall give written notice of the results of the examination to each applicant. SECTION 102.  Section 73-71-33, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 73-71-33.  The following acts constitute grounds for which the board may initiate disciplinary actions: (a)  Attempting to obtain, or renewing a license to practice acupuncture by bribery or misinterpretation; (b)  Having a license to practice acupuncture revoked, suspended, or otherwise acted against, including the denial of licensure by the licensing authority of another state or territory for reasons that would preclude licensure in this state; (c)  Being convicted or found guilty, regardless of adjudication, in any jurisdiction of a * * *felony, or a crime of moral turpitude, disqualifying crime as provided in the Fresh Start Act or a crime that directly relates to acupuncture.  For the purposes of this paragraph, a plea of guilty or a plea of nolo contendere accepted by the court shall be considered as a conviction; (d)  Advertising, practicing, or attempting to practice under a name other than one's own; (e)  The use of advertising or solicitation that is false or misleading; (f)  Aiding, assisting, procuring, employing or advertising an unlicensed person to practice acupuncture contrary to this chapter or a rule of the board; (g)  Failing to perform any statutory or legal obligation placed upon an acupuncture practitioner; (h)  Making or filing a report that the licensee knows to be false, intentionally or negligently failing to file a report required by state or federal law, willfully impeding or obstructing that filing or inducing another person to do so.  Those reports shall include only those that are signed in the capacity of an acupuncture practitioner; (i)  Exercising coercion, intimidation or undue influence in entering into sexual relations with a patient, or continuing the patient-practitioner relationship with a patient with whom the licensee has sexual relations, if those sexual relations cause the licensee to perform services incompetently.  This paragraph shall not apply to sexual relations between acupuncture practitioners and their spouses; (j)  Making deceptive, untrue or fraudulent misrepresentations in the practice of acupuncture; (k)  Soliciting patients, either personally or through an agent, through the use of fraud, intimidation or undue influence, or a form of overreaching conduct; (l)  Failing to keep written medical records justifying the course of treatment of the patient; (m)  Exercising undue influence on the patient to exploit the patient for financial gain of the licensee or of a third party; (n)  Being unable to practice acupuncture with reasonable skill and safety to patients by reason of illness or intemperate use of alcohol, drugs, narcotics, chemicals, or any other type of material or as a result of any mental or physical condition; (o)  Malpractice or the failure to practice acupuncture to that level of care, skill and treatment that is recognized by a reasonably prudent similar practitioner of acupuncture as being acceptable under similar conditions and circumstances; (p)  Practicing or offering to practice beyond the scope permitted by law or accepting or performing professional responsibilities that the licensee knows or has reason to know that he or she is not qualified by training, experience or certification to perform; (q)  Delegating professional responsibilities to a person when the licensee delegating those responsibilities knows, or has reason to know, that the person is not qualified by training, experience or licensure to perform them; (r)  Violating any provision of this chapter, a rule of the board, or a lawful order of the board previously entered in a disciplinary hearing or failing to comply with a lawfully issued subpoena of the board; (s)  Conspiring with another to commit an act, or committing an act, that coerces, intimidates or precludes another licensee from lawfully advertising or providing his or her services; (t)  Fraud or deceit, or gross negligence, incompetence or misconduct in the operation of a course of study; (u)  Failing to comply with state, county or municipal regulations or reporting requirements relating to public health and the control of contagious and infectious disease; (v)  Failing to comply with any rule of the board relating to health and safety, including, but not limited to, sterilization of equipment and the disposal of potentially infectious materials; (w)  Incompetence, gross negligence or other malpractice in the practice of acupuncture; (x)  Aiding the unlawful practice of acupuncture; (y)  Fraud or dishonesty in the application or reporting of any test for disease; (z)  Failure to report, as required by law, or making false or misleading report of, any contagious or infectious disease; (aa)  Failure to keep accurate patient records; or (bb)  Failure to permit the board or its agents to enter and inspect acupuncture premises and equipment as set by rules promulgated by the board. SECTION 103.  Section 73-73-7, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 73-73-7.  (1)  Beginning on July 1, 2012, the board and Interior Design Advisory Committee shall receive applications for certification as a Mississippi Certified Interior Designer on forms prescribed and furnished by the board and IDAC. (2)  Upon receipt of an application, the board, upon the recommendation of IDAC, may approve the application, provided the applicant meets one (1) of the following requirements: (a)  The applicant passed the IDQE as administered by NCIDQ before January 1, 2012; (b)  The applicant has a degree in interior design from a program accredited by the CIDA, a degree in architecture from a program accredited by the National Architectural Accreditation Board (NAAB), or a four-year degree in interior design from a college or university approved by the regulatory board.  Additionally, the applicant must have passed the IDQE as administered by NCIDQ or its approved successor; (c)  The applicant is a licensed architect in the State of Mississippi who has passed the IDQE as administered by NCIDQ or its approved successor; or (d)  The applicant is a licensed engineer in the State of Mississippi who has passed the IDQE as administered by NCIDQ or its approved successor. (3)  The applicant must exhibit to the regulatory board and IDAC the applicant's good standing in the profession * * * and the applicant's moral character.  Except as otherwise provided in this subsection, any of the following acts shall preclude an applicant's eligibility as a candidate for certification: (a)  Conviction by any court for commission of any * * *felony or any crime involving moral turpitude disqualifying crime as provided in the Fresh Start Act. (b)  Conviction by any court of a misdemeanor involving fraud, deceit or misrepresentation. (c)  Misstatement or misrepresentation of fact by the applicant in connection with the applicant's application for certification in this state or another jurisdiction. (d)  Violation of any of the rules of conduct required of applicants or interior designers as adopted by the board. If the board determines that the applicant has shown clear and convincing evidence of rehabilitation and reform, the board may certify an applicant otherwise precluded from consideration because of an act prohibited under this subsection.  A decision to certify an applicant notwithstanding the applicant's violation of an act prohibited under this subsection is in the sole discretion of the board and upon such terms, conditions and evidence as the board may require. (4)  The board and IDAC may require that the applicant appear before the board for a personal interview. (5)  The board, upon the recommendation of IDAC, may adopt or develop alternate routes of eligibility and examination requirements based on standards as set forth by NCIDQ or its approved successor. (6)  Any application submitted to the board and IDAC may be denied for any violation of the provisions of this chapter. SECTION 104.  Section 73-75-13, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 73-75-13.  Eligibility for license.  To be eligible for licensure by the board as a behavior analyst or assistant behavior analyst, a person shall: (a)  Submit to the board an application, upon such form and in such manner as the board shall prescribe, along with the applicable fee and personal references; (b)  Certify that the applicant has not been convicted of a * * *felony disqualifying crime as provided in the Fresh Start Act as defined by the laws of the State of Mississippi; (c)  Undergo a fingerprint-based criminal history records check of the Mississippi central criminal database and the Federal Bureau of Investigation criminal history database.  Each applicant shall submit a full set of the applicant's fingerprints in a form and manner prescribed by the board, which shall be forwarded to the Mississippi Department of Public Safety and the Federal Bureau of Investigation Identification Division for this purpose; and (d)  For a behavior analyst: (i)  Possess at least a master's degree, or its equivalent, from an educational institution recognized by the board; (ii)  Have current and active certification by the Behavior Analyst Certification Board as a Board Certified Behavior Analyst (BCBA) or Board Certified Behavior Analyst-Doctoral (BCBA-D), verified by the board; and (iii)  Comply with such other requirements of the board. (e)  For an assistant behavior analyst: (i)  Possess a bachelor's degree, or its equivalent, from an educational institution recognized by the board; (ii)  Have current and active certification by the Behavior Analyst Certification Board as a Board Certified Assistant Behavior Analyst (BCABA), verified by the board; and (iii)  Provide proof of ongoing supervision by a licensed behavior analyst. (f)  All licenses issued pursuant to this section shall be for a term of three (3) years, but shall not exceed the expiration of the licensee's certification by the Behavior Analyst Certification Board. SECTION 105.  Section 73-75-19, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 73-75-19.  License denial, suspension, or revocation.  (1)  The board, by an affirmative vote of at least three (3) of its five (5) members, shall withhold, deny, revoke or suspend any license issued or applied for in accordance with the provisions of this chapter, or otherwise discipline a licensed behavior analyst or licensed assistant behavior analyst upon finding that the applicant or licensee: (a)  Has violated the current Behavior Analyst Certification Board Professional Disciplinary and Ethical Standards, the Behavior Analyst Certification Board Guidelines for Responsible Conduct for Behavior Analysts, or other codes of ethical standards adopted by the board, or has lost or failed to renew certification by the Behavior Analyst Certification Board; or (b)  Has been convicted of a * * *felony or any offense involving moral turpitude disqualifying crime as provided in the Fresh Start Act, the record of conviction being conclusive evidence thereof; or (c)  Is using any narcotic or any alcoholic beverage to an extent or in a manner dangerous to any other person or the public, or to an extent that such use impairs his ability to perform the work of a licensed behavior analyst or licensed assistant behavior analyst; or (d)  Has impersonated another person holding a license issued under this chapter or allowed another person to use his license; or (e)  Has used fraud or deception in applying for a license provided for in this chapter; or (f)  Has accepted commissions or rebates or other forms of remuneration for referring clients to other professional persons; or (g)  Has allowed his name or license issued under this chapter to be used in connection with any person or persons who perform applied behavior analysis services outside the area of their training, experience or competence; or (h)  Is legally adjudicated mentally incompetent, the record of such adjudication being conclusive evidence thereof; or (i)  Has willfully or negligently violated any of the provisions of this chapter. (2)  The board may recover from any person disciplined under this chapter the costs of investigation, prosecution, and adjudication of the disciplinary action. (3)  Notice shall be effected by registered mail or personal service setting forth the particular reasons for the proposed action and fixing a date not less than thirty (30) days nor more than sixty (60) days from the date of such mailing or such service, at which time the applicant or licensee shall be given an opportunity for a prompt and fair hearing.  For the purpose of such hearing the board, acting by and through its executive secretary, may exercise all authority granted to conduct investigations and hearings pursuant to Section 73-75-9(2)(a) and (b).  At such hearing the applicant or licensee may appear by counsel and personally on his own behalf.  On the basis of any such hearing, or upon default of applicant or licensee, the board shall make a determination specifying its findings of fact and conclusions of law.  A copy of such determination shall be sent by registered mail or served personally upon the applicant or licensee.  The decision of the board denying, revoking or suspending the license shall become final thirty (30) days after so mailed or served unless within that period the licensee appeals the decision to the Chancery Court of Madison or Rankin Counties, pursuant to the provisions hereof, and the proceedings in chancery shall be conducted as other matters coming before the court.  All proceedings and evidence, together with exhibits, presented at such hearing before the board in the event of appeal, shall be admissible in evidence in the court. (4)  Nothing in this subsection shall be interpreted to prohibit the board from immediately suspending any license prior to a hearing under subsection (3) of this section, when in its sole discretion the suspension is required for the instruction, safety or well-being of any member of the public. (5)  Every order and judgment of the board shall take effect immediately upon its promulgation unless the board in such order or judgment fixes a probationary period for applicant or licensee.  Such order and judgment shall continue in effect unless upon appeal the court by proper order or decree terminates it earlier.  The board may make public its order and judgments in such manner and form as it deems proper. (6)  Suspension by the board of a license issued under this chapter shall be for a period not to exceed one (1) year.  At the end of this period the board shall reevaluate the suspension, and shall either reinstate or revoke the license.  A person whose license has been revoked under the provisions of this section may reapply for license after more than two (2) years have elapsed from the date such revocation is legally effective. (7)  In addition to the reasons specified in subsection (1) of this section, the board shall be authorized to suspend the license of any licensee for being out of compliance with an order for support, in compliance with the procedures set forth in Sections 93-11-151 through 93-11-163. SECTION 106.  Section 75-27-305, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 75-27-305.  (1)  A citizen of the United States or a person who has declared his or her intention of becoming such a citizen, who is a resident of the State of Mississippi, not less than twenty-one (21) years of age, * * * of good moral character, who has the ability to weigh accurately and to make correct weight certificates, and who has received from the commissioner a license as a bonded weighmaster, shall be styled and authorized to act as a bonded weighmaster. (2)  The commissioner may adopt rules and regulations for determining the qualifications of the applicant for license as a bonded weighmaster.  The commissioner may pass upon the qualifications of the applicant upon the basis of the information supplied in the application, may examine such applicant orally or in writing, or both, for the purpose of determining his or her qualifications.  The commissioner shall grant licenses to such applicants as may be found to possess the qualifications required herein.  The commissioner shall keep a record of all such applications and of all licenses issued thereon. SECTION 107.  Section 75-57-49, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 75-57-49.  (1)  Before any person shall be granted a permit to, or shall engage in or continue in the business of the distributing, either wholesale or retail, installing, altering, extending, changing or repairing of any liquefied compressed gas system, appliance or container, or in the business of distributing and selling liquefied compressed gas, either at wholesale or retail, whether from trucks or other vessels, in cylinders or in any other manner, such person shall satisfy the State Liquefied Compressed Gas Board that he or she is * * *of good character, is competent to transact business so as to safeguard the interest of the public, and is financially responsible; and this provision as to financial responsibility shall be met by such person by filing with the State Liquefied Compressed Gas Board evidence that he or she has in force such of the hereinafter listed insurance policies on standard contract forms and written by an insurance company, or companies, qualified to do business in the State of Mississippi, as the State Liquefied Compressed Gas Board shall require, based upon those activities listed above in which such person is engaged, to wit: ANY PERSON THAT ENGAGES IN FILLING CYLINDERS AND MOTOR FUEL TANKS WITH LIQUEFIED COMPRESSED GAS ON THEIR PREMISES OR ANY PERSON WHO IS IN THE BUSINESS OF INSTALLING LC GAS CARBURETION OR APPLIANCES: Limits of Liability Each Occasion    Aggregate Manufacturers and Contractors Public Liability $100,000    $300,000 Products Liability $100,000    $300,000 Workers' Compensation and Employers' Liability Insurance                         State Statute ANY PERSON THAT ENGAGES IN ANY PHASE OF THE LIQUEFIED COMPRESSED GAS BUSINESS OTHER THAN CYLINDER-FILLING LOCATIONS: Limits of Liability Bodily Injury          Property Each Each        Damage Each Person Accident      Accident Automobile Public Liability $500,000    $1,000,000   $1,000,000 Each Occasion Aggregate Manufacturers and Contractors Public Liability $1,000,000  $1,000,000 Products Liability $1,000,000  $1,000,000 Workers' Compensation and Employers' Liability Insurance State Statute (2)  The State Liquefied Compressed Gas Board shall not require insurance coverage as specified above unless the hazard of liquefied compressed gases is involved. (3)  No policy issued under the provisions of this chapter may be cancelled before thirty (30) days from the date of receipt by the Commissioner of Insurance of written notice of intention to cancel the policy. (4)  * * * It is expressly provided, However, * * * that in lieu of filing with the State Liquefied Compressed Gas Board evidence that such insurance, as outlined above, is in force, any such person may file with the State Liquefied Compressed Gas Board a good and sufficient surety bond executed by a surety company licensed to do business in this state in the amount of One Million Dollars ($1,000,000.00), which such bond shall be payable to the State of Mississippi and shall be conditioned to guarantee the payment of all damages which proximately result from any act of negligence on the part of such person, or their agents or employees, while engaged in any of the activities herein specified.  In lieu of the surety bond, any such person may execute and file a good and sufficient personal bond in the amount and conditioned as specified above, which such personal bond shall be secured by bonds or other obligations of the State of Mississippi or the United States government, of equal value. (5)  Upon compliance with the provisions of this section, where such compliance is required, and upon compliance with all other provisions of this chapter, the State Liquefied Compressed Gas Board shall issue to such dealer a permit to engage in such business, but not before.  All such permits shall be valid until voluntarily surrendered, or until suspended, revoked or cancelled by the State Liquefied Compressed Gas Board, the Commissioner of Insurance or the chancery or circuit court.  All permits issued under the provisions of Chapter 170, Laws of 1940, as amended, or Chapter 265, Laws of 1946, shall remain in full force and effect until the expiration date thereof at which time they must be renewed under the terms and conditions of this chapter. SECTION 108.  Section 75-59-1, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 75-59-1.  No person, firm or corporation shall contract to furnish correspondence courses to persons within the state unless such person, firm or corporation shall have obtained a permit from the Office of the Secretary of State, either (a) the State Department of Education, (b) the Mississippi Community College Board, or (c) the Board of Trustees of State Institutions of Higher Learning, whichever is appropriate, and the Office of the Attorney General.  An application for a permit shall be made on forms furnished by the Secretary of State, the State Department of Education, the Mississippi Community College Board or the Board of Trustees of State Institutions of Higher Learning, as the case may be, and the Attorney General and such application shall designate an agent for the service of summons within the state; shall contain the name and address of the applicant; the type of courses offered with a brief summary of the course of studies offered; and one (1) copy of all textbooks or other teaching aids and training materials which are incorporated in the course of study shall be filed with said application.  The applicant shall pay the Secretary of State a fee of Two Hundred Fifty Dollars ($250.00).  The applicant shall file a bond with his application in the sum of Fifty Thousand Dollars ($50,000.00) conditioned to satisfy any judgment rendered by a court of competent jurisdiction, in favor of any person who has sustained damages as a result of the breach of a contract of instruction by the permittee.  Such bond shall be executed by the permittee and a resident surety company qualified to transact business within the state. Such permit shall be valid for one (1) year from the date thereof.  Suits against the permittee and his surety may be brought in the county where the plaintiff resides, or the county where the defendant has his principal place of business, or where his resident agent resides.  This chapter shall not apply to any business school or business college holding a current certificate or license issued under the applicable law of this state.  In addition, this chapter shall not apply to religious instructions offered by a recognized church denomination; provided, however, that no fee or charge of any kind whatever may be levied or collected directly or indirectly for such instructions or certificates issued in connection therewith or incidental thereto.  * * * No person shall be granted a permit unless he is an individual of good moral character. SECTION 109.  Section 75-60-19, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 75-60-19.  (1)  The Commission on Proprietary School and College Registration may suspend, revoke or cancel a certificate of registration for any one (1) or any combination of the following causes: (a)  Violation of any provision of the sections of this chapter or any regulation made by the commission; (b)  The furnishing of false, misleading or incomplete information requested by the commission; (c)  The signing of an application or the holding of a certificate of registration by a person who has pleaded guilty or has been found guilty of a * * *felony disqualifying crime as provided in the Fresh Start Act * * * or has pleaded guilty or been found guilty of any other indictable offense; (d)  The signing of an application or the holding of a certificate of registration by a person who is addicted to the use of any narcotic drug, or who is found to be mentally incompetent; (e)  Violation of any commitment made in an application for a certificate of registration; (f)  Presentation to prospective students of misleading, false or fraudulent information relating to the course of instruction, employment opportunity, or opportunities for enrollment in accredited institutions of higher education after entering or completing courses offered by the holder of a certificate of registration; (g)  Failure to provide or maintain premises or equipment for offering courses of instruction in a safe and sanitary condition; (h)  Refusal by an agent to display his agent permit upon demand of a prospective student or other interested person; (i)  Failure to maintain financial resources adequate for the satisfactory conduct of courses of study as presented in the plan of operation or to retain a sufficient number and qualified staff of instruction; however nothing in this chapter shall require an instructor to be certificated by the Commission on Proprietary School and College Registration or to hold any type of post-high school degree; (j)  Offering training or courses of instruction other than those presented in the application; however, schools may offer special courses adapted to the needs of individual students where the special courses are in the subject field specified in the application; (k)  Accepting the services of an agent not licensed in accordance with Sections 75-60-23 through 75-60-37, inclusive; (l)  Conviction or a plea of nolo contendere on the part of any owner, operator or director of a registered school of any * * *felony disqualifying crime as provided in the Fresh Start Act under Mississippi law or the law of another jurisdiction; (m)  Continued employment of a teacher or instructor who has been convicted of or entered a plea of nolo contendere to any * * *felony disqualifying crime as provided in the Fresh Start Act under Mississippi law or the law of another jurisdiction; (n)  Incompetence of any owner or operator to operate a school. (2)  (a)  Any person who believes he has been aggrieved by a violation of this section shall have the right to file a written complaint within two (2) years of the alleged violation.  The commission shall maintain a written record of each complaint that is made.  The commission shall also send to the complainant a form acknowledging the complaint and requesting further information if necessary and shall advise the director of the school that a complaint has been made and, where appropriate, the nature of the complaint. (b)  The commission shall within twenty (20) days of receipt of such written complaint commence an investigation of the alleged violation and shall, within ninety (90) days of the receipt of such written complaint, issue a written finding.  The commission shall furnish such findings to the person who filed the complaint and to the chief operating officer of the school cited in the complaint.  If the commission finds that there has been a violation of this section, the commission shall take appropriate action. (c)  Schools shall disclose in writing to all prospective and current students their right to file a complaint with the commission. (d)  The existence of an arbitration clause in no way negates the student's right to file a complaint with the commission. (e)  The commission may initiate an investigation without a complaint. (3)  Hearing procedures. (a)  Upon a finding that there is good cause to believe that a school, or an officer, agent, employee, partner or teacher, has committed a violation of subsection (1) of this section, the commission shall initiate proceedings by serving a notice of hearing upon each and every such party subject to the administrative action.  The school or such party shall be given reasonable notice of hearing, including the time, place and nature of the hearing and a statement sufficiently particular to give notice of the transactions or occurrences intended to be proved, the material elements of each cause of action and the civil penalties and/or administrative sanctions sought. (b)  Opportunity shall be afforded to the party to respond and present evidence and argument on the issues involved in the hearing including the right of cross-examination.  In a hearing, the school or such party shall be accorded the right to have its representative appear in person or by or with counsel or other representative. Disposition may be made in any hearing by stipulation, agreed settlement, consent order, default or other informal method. (c)  The commission shall designate an impartial hearing officer to conduct the hearing, who shall be empowered to: (i)  Administer oaths and affirmations; and (ii)  Regulate the course of the hearings, set the time and place for continued hearings, and fix the time for filing of briefs and other documents; and (iii)  Direct the school or such party to appear and confer to consider the simplification of the issues by consent; and (iv)  Grant a request for an adjournment of the hearing only upon good cause shown. The strict legal rules of evidence shall not apply, but the decision shall be supported by substantial evidence in the record. (4)  The commission, acting by and through its hearing officer, is * * * hereby authorized and empowered to issue subpoenas for the attendance of witnesses and the production of books and papers at such hearing.  Process issued by the commission shall extend to all parts of the state and shall be served by any person designated by the commission for such service.  Where, in any proceeding before the hearing officer, any witness fails or refuses to attend upon a subpoena issued by the commission, refuses to testify, or refuses to produce any books and papers the production of which is called for by a subpoena, the attendance of such witness, the giving of his testimony or the production of the books and papers shall be enforced by any court of competent jurisdiction of this state in the manner provided for the enforcement of attendance and testimony of witnesses in civil cases in the courts of this state. (5)  Decision after hearing.  The hearing officer shall make written findings of fact and conclusions of law, and shall also recommend in writing to the commission a final decision, including penalties.  The hearing officer shall mail a copy of his findings of fact, conclusions of law and recommended penalty to the party and his attorney, or representative.  The commission shall make the final decision, which shall be based exclusively on evidence and other materials introduced at the hearing.  If it is determined that a party has committed a violation, the commission shall issue a final order and shall impose penalties in accordance with this section.  The commission shall send by certified mail, return receipt requested, a copy of the final order to the party and his attorney, or representative.  The commission shall, at the request of the school or such party, furnish a copy of the transcript or any part thereof upon payment of the cost thereof. (6)  Civil penalties and administrative sanctions.  (a)  A hearing officer may recommend, and the commission may impose, a civil penalty not to exceed Two Thousand Five Hundred Dollars ($2,500.00) for any violation of this section.  In the case of a second or further violation committed within the previous five (5) years, the liability shall be a civil penalty not to exceed Five Thousand Dollars ($5,000.00) for each such violation. (b)  Notwithstanding the provisions of paragraph (a) of this subsection, a hearing officer may recommend and the commission may impose a civil penalty not to exceed Twenty-five Thousand Dollars ($25,000.00) for any of the following violations: (i) operation of a school without a registration in violation of this chapter; (ii) operation of a school knowing that the school's registration has been suspended or revoked; (iii) use of false, misleading, deceptive or fraudulent advertising; (iv) employment of recruiters on the basis of a commission, bonus or quota, except as authorized by the commission; (v) directing or authorizing recruiters to offer guarantees of jobs upon completion of a course; (vi) failure to make a tuition refund when such failure is part of a pattern of misconduct; or (vii) violation of any other provision of this chapter, or any rule or regulation promulgated pursuant thereto, when such violation constitutes part of a pattern of misconduct which significantly impairs the educational quality of the program or programs being offered by the school. For each enumerated offense, a second or further violation committed within the previous five (5) years shall be subject to a civil penalty not to exceed Fifty Thousand Dollars ($50,000.00) for each such violation. (c)  In addition to the penalties authorized in paragraphs (a) and (b) of this subsection, a hearing officer may recommend and the commission may impose any of the following administrative sanctions:  (i) a cease and desist order; (ii) a mandatory direction; (iii) a suspension or revocation of a certificate of registration; (iv) a probation order; or (v) an order of restitution. (d)  The commission may suspend a registration upon the failure of a school to pay any fee, fine or penalty as required by this chapter unless such failure is determined by the commission to be for good cause. (e)  All civil penalties, fines and settlements received shall accrue to the credit of the Commission on Proprietary School and College Registration. (7)  Any penalty or administrative sanction imposed by the commission under this section may be appealed by the school, college or other person affected to the Mississippi Community College Board as provided in Section 75-60-4(3), which appeal shall be on the record previously made before the commission's hearing officer.  All appeals from the Mississippi Community College Board shall be on the record and shall be filed in the Chancery Court of the First Judicial District of Hinds County, Mississippi. SECTION 110.  Section 75-60-31, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 75-60-31.  No agent permit shall be issued pursuant to Section 75-60-25 to any person found by the Commission on Proprietary School and College Registration * * *not to be of good moral character to have been convicted of a disqualifying crime as provided in the Fresh Start Act. SECTION 111.  Section 75-60-33, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 75-60-33.  Any agent permit issued may be revoked by the Commission on Proprietary School and College Registration if the holder of the permit solicits or enrolls students through fraud, deception or misrepresentation * * *, or upon a finding that the permit holder is not of good moral character. The Commission on Proprietary School and College Registration shall hold informal conferences pursuant to Section 75-60-19 with an agent believed to be in violation of one or more of the above conditions.  If these conferences fail to eliminate the agent's objectionable practices or procedures, the commission shall hold a public hearing.  A record of such proceedings shall be taken and appeals to the commission shall be upon such record, except as may be provided by rules and regulations to be adopted by the commission.  Nothing said or done in the informal conferences shall be disclosed by the staff of the commission nor be used as evidence in any subsequent proceedings. SECTION 112.  Section 75-67-323, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 75-67-323.  (1)  To be eligible for a pawnbroker license, an applicant shall: (a)  Operate lawfully and fairly within the purposes of this article; (b)  Not have been convicted of a * * *felony in the last ten (10) years disqualifying crime as provided in the Fresh Start Act or be active as a beneficial owner for someone who has been convicted of a * * *felony in the last ten (10) years disqualifying crime as provided in the Fresh Start Act; (c)  File with the commissioner a bond with good security in the penal sum of Ten Thousand Dollars ($10,000.00), payable to the State of Mississippi for the faithful performance by the licensee of the duties and obligations pertaining to the business so licensed and the prompt payment of any judgment which may be recovered against such licensee on account of damages or other claim arising directly or collaterally from any violation of the provisions of this article; such bond shall not be valid until it is approved by the commissioner; such applicant may file, in lieu thereof, cash, a certificate of deposit, or government bonds in the amount of Ten Thousand Dollars ($10,000.00); such deposit shall be filed with the commissioner and is subject to the same terms and conditions as are provided for in the surety bond required herein; any interest or earnings on such deposits are payable to the depositor; (d)  File with the commissioner an application accompanied by the initial license fee required in this article; (e)  Submit a set of fingerprints from any local law enforcement agency.  In order to determine the applicant's suitability for license, the commissioner shall forward the fingerprints to the Department of Public Safety; and if no disqualifying record is identified at the state level, the fingerprints shall be forwarded by the Department of Public Safety to the FBI for a national criminal history record check. (2)  Every licensee shall post his license in a conspicuous place at each place of business. (3)  Every licensee shall post and display a sign which measures at least twenty (20) inches by twenty (20) inches in a conspicuous place and in easy view of all persons who enter the place of business.  The sign shall display bold, blocked letters, easily readable, with the following information:  "This pawnshop is licensed and regulated by the Mississippi Department of Banking and Consumer Finance.  If you encounter any unresolved problem with a transaction at this location, you are entitled to assistance.  Please call or write:  Mississippi Department of Banking and Consumer Finance, Post Office Drawer 23729, Jackson, MS 39225-3729; Phone 1-800-844-2499." (4)  From and after December 1, 2010, each application for an initial license shall include evidence of the satisfactory completion of at least six (6) hours of approved prelicensing education, and each application for renewal shall include evidence of the satisfactory completion of at least six (6) hours of approved continuing education, by the owners or designated representative in pawnbroker transactions.  Two (2) of the six (6) hours shall consist of instruction on the Mississippi Pawnshop Act and shall be approved by the department once the course is approved by the Mississippi Pawnbrokers Association or the National Pawnbrokers Association. SECTION 113.  Section 75-67-421, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 75-67-421.  (1)  To be eligible for a title pledge lender license, an applicant shall: (a)  Operate lawfully and fairly within the purposes of this article; (b)  Not have been convicted of a * * *felony in the last ten (10) years disqualifying crime as provided in the Fresh Start Act or be active as a beneficial owner for someone who has been convicted of a * * *felony in the last ten (10) years disqualifying crime as provided in the Fresh Start Act; (c)  File with the commissioner a bond with good security in the penal sum of Fifty Thousand Dollars ($50,000.00) for each location at which the applicant proposes to engage in the business of title pledge lending, but in no event shall the aggregate amount of the bond for all locations per applicant exceed Two Hundred Fifty Thousand Dollars ($250,000.00) and no more than Fifty Thousand Dollars ($50,000.00) shall be payable or recoverable on the bond for each location; the bond shall be payable to the State of Mississippi for the faithful performance by the licensee of the duties and obligations pertaining to the business so licensed and the prompt payment of any judgment which may be recovered against the licensee on account of damages or other claim arising directly or collaterally from any violation of the provisions of this article; the bond shall not be valid until it is approved by the commissioner; the applicant may file, in lieu thereof, cash, a certificate of deposit or government bonds in the amount of Twenty-five Thousand Dollars ($25,000.00) for each location at which the applicant proposes to engage in the business of title pledge lending, but in no event shall the aggregate amount of the cash, certificate of deposit or government bonds for all locations per applicant exceed Two Hundred Fifty Thousand Dollars ($250,000.00) and no more than Twenty-five Thousand Dollars ($25,000.00) shall be payable or recoverable on the cash, certificate of deposit or government bonds for each location; the deposit of the cash, certificate of deposit or government bonds shall be filed with the commissioner and is subject to the same terms and conditions as are provided for in the surety bond required herein; any interest or earnings on such deposits are payable to the depositor * * *.; (d)  File with the commissioner an application accompanied by a set of fingerprints from any local law enforcement agency, and the initial license fee required in this article. In order to determine the applicant's suitability for license, the commissioner shall forward the fingerprints to the Department of Public Safety; and if no disqualifying record is identified at the state level, the fingerprints shall be forwarded by the Department of Public Safety to the FBI for a national criminal history record check. (2)  Upon the filing of an application in a form prescribed by the commissioner, accompanied by the fee and documents required in this article, the department shall investigate to ascertain whether the qualifications prescribed by this article have been satisfied.  If the commissioner finds that the qualifications have been satisfied and, if he approves the documents so filed by the applicant, he shall issue to the applicant a license to engage in the business of title pledge lending in this state. (3)  Complete and file with the commissioner an annual renewal application accompanied by the renewal fee required in this article. (4)  The license shall be kept conspicuously posted in the place of business of the licensee. SECTION 114.  Section 75-67-509, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 75-67-509.  To be eligible for a check casher license, an applicant shall: (a)  Operate lawfully and fairly within the purposes of this article. (b)  Not have been convicted of a * * *felony in the last ten (10) years disqualifying crime as provided in the Fresh Start Act or be active as a beneficial owner for someone who has been convicted of a * * *felony in the last ten (10) years disqualifying crime as provided in the Fresh Start Act. (c)  File with the commissioner a bond with good security in the penal sum of Ten Thousand Dollars ($10,000.00), payable to the State of Mississippi for the faithful performance by the licensee of the duties and obligations pertaining to the business so licensed and the prompt payment of any judgment which may be recovered against the licensee on account of charges or other claims arising directly or collectively from any violation of the provisions of this article.  The bond shall not be valid until it is approved by the commissioner.  The applicant may file, in lieu of the bond, cash, a certificate of deposit or government bonds in the amount of Ten Thousand Dollars ($10,000.00).  Those deposits shall be filed with the commissioner and are subject to the same terms and conditions as are provided for in the surety bond required in this paragraph.  Any interest or earnings on those deposits are payable to the depositor. (d)  File with the commissioner an application for a license and the initial license fee required in this article.  If applicant's application is approved, a check casher license will be issued within thirty (30) days. (e)  Submit a set of fingerprints from any local law enforcement agency.  In order to determine the applicant's suitability for license, the commissioner shall forward the fingerprints to the Department of Public Safety; and if no disqualifying record is identified at the state level, the fingerprints shall be forwarded by the Department of Public Safety to the FBI for a national criminal history record check. (f)  Complete and file with the commissioner an annual renewal application for a license accompanied by the renewal fee required in this article. SECTION 115.  Section 75-67-521, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 75-67-521.  (1)  The commissioner may, after notice and hearing, suspend or revoke a license if he finds that: (a)  The licensee, either knowingly, or without the exercise of due care to prevent the same, has violated any provision of this article; (b)  Any fact or condition exists which, if it had existed or had been known to exist at the time of the original application for the license, clearly would have justified the commissioner in refusing the license; (c)  The licensee has aided, abetted or conspired with an individual or person to circumvent or violate the requirements of this article; (d)  The licensee, or a legal or beneficial owner of the license, has been convicted of a * * *felony, or has been convicted of a misdemeanor that the commissioner finds directly relates to the duties and responsibilities of the business of check cashing disqualifying crime as provided in the Fresh Start Act. (2)  The commissioner may conditionally license or place on probation a person whose license has been suspended or may reprimand a licensee for a violation of this article. (3)  The manner of giving notice and conducting a hearing as required by subsection (1) of this section shall be performed in accordance with procedures prescribed by the commissioner in rules or regulations adopted under Mississippi Administrative Procedures Law, Section 25-43-1 et seq. (4)  Any licensee may surrender any license by delivering it to the commissioner with written notice of its surrender, but that surrender shall not affect the licensee's civil or criminal liability for acts committed prior thereto. (5)  The commissioner may reinstate suspended licenses or issue new licenses to a person whose license or licenses have been revoked if no fact or condition then exists which clearly would have justified the commissioner in refusing originally to issue a license under this article. (6)  The appropriate local law enforcement agency shall be notified of any licensee who has his license suspended or revoked as provided by this article. (7)  The commissioner shall enforce the provisions of this section. SECTION 116.  Section 75-67-609, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 75-67-609.  To be eligible for a credit availability license, an applicant shall: (a)  Operate lawfully and fairly within the purposes of this article. (b)  Not have been convicted in the last ten (10) years or be active as a beneficial owner for someone who has been convicted in the last ten (10) years of a disqualifying crime that the commissioner finds directly relates to the duties and responsibilities of the business of offering credit availability transactions as provided in the Fresh Start Act. (c)  File with the commissioner a bond with good security in the penal sum of Ten Thousand Dollars ($10,000.00), payable to the State of Mississippi, for the faithful performance by the licensee of the duties and obligations pertaining to the business so licensed and the prompt payment of any judgment which may be recovered against the licensee on account of charges or other claims arising directly or collectively from any violation of the provisions of this article.  The bond shall not be valid until the commissioner approves it.  The applicant may file, in lieu of the bond, cash, a certificate of deposit or government bonds in the amount of Ten Thousand Dollars ($10,000.00).  Those deposits shall be filed with the commissioner and are subject to the same terms and conditions as are provided for in the surety bond required in this paragraph.  Any interest or earnings on those deposits are payable to the depositor.  Applicants applying for multiple licenses may submit a single bond for all licenses, provided that the total value of the bond is equal to Ten Thousand Dollars ($10,000.00) per license applied for. (d)  File with the commissioner an application for a license and the initial license fee required in this article.  If applicant's application is approved, a credit availability license will be issued within thirty (30) days. (e)  File with the commissioner a set of fingerprints from any local law enforcement agency for each owner of a sole proprietorship, partners in a partnership or principal owners of a limited liability company that own at least ten percent (10%) of the voting shares of the company, shareholders owning ten percent (10%) or more of the outstanding shares of the corporation, except publically traded corporations and their subsidiaries, and any other executive officer with significant oversight duties of the business.  In order to determine the applicant's suitability for license, the commissioner shall forward the fingerprints to the Department of Public Safety; and if no disqualifying record is identified at the state level, the Department of Public Safety shall forward the fingerprints to the FBI for a national criminal history record check. (f)  Complete and file with the commissioner an annual renewal application for a license accompanied by the renewal fee required in this article. SECTION 117.  Section 75-76-34, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 75-76-34.  (1)  Except as otherwise provided in this section, the Mississippi Gaming Commission is authorized to regulate all schools or training institutions that teach or train gaming employees.  No such school shall be located on publicly owned property, other than property under the jurisdiction of the Board of Trustees of State Institutions of Higher Learning or a public community college.  Except as authorized under this section, no public school shall teach or train persons to be gaming employees.  The gaming educational activities of schools or training institutions regulated by the commission and of state institutions of higher learning and public community colleges shall be deemed to be legal under the laws of the State of Mississippi.  Any person desiring to operate a school or training institution other than a state institution of higher learning or public community college must file a license application with the executive director to be licensed by the commission. (2)  The commission may adopt regulations it deems necessary to regulate schools and training institutions other than state institutions of higher learning and public community colleges.  These regulations shall, without limiting the general powers of the commission, include the following: (a)  Prescribing the method and form of application which any applicant for a school or training institution must follow and complete before consideration of his application by the executive director or commission. (b)  Prescribing the information to be furnished by the applicant relating to his employees. (c)  Requiring fingerprinting of the applicant, employees and students of the school or institution or other methods of identification and the forwarding of all fingerprints taken pursuant to regulation of the Federal Bureau of Investigation. (d)  Requiring any applicant to pay all or part of the fees and costs of investigation of the applicant as may be determined by the commission. (e)  Prescribing the manner and method of collection and payment of fees and costs and issuance of licenses to schools or training institutions. (f)  Prescribing under what conditions a licensee authorized by this section may be deemed subject to revocation or suspension of his license. (g)  Defining the curriculum of the school or training institution, the games and devices permitted, the use of tokens only for instruction purposes, and the method of operation of games and devices. (h)  Requiring the applicant to submit its location of the school or training institution, which shall be at least four hundred (400) feet from any church, school, kindergarten or funeral home.  However, within an area zoned commercial or business, the minimum distance shall not be less than one hundred (100) feet. (i)  Requiring that all employees and students of the school or training institution be at least twenty-one (21) years of age. (j)  Requiring all employees and students of the school or training institution to wear identification cards issued by the commission while on the premises of the school or training institution. (k)  Requiring the commission to investigate each applicant, employee and student and determine that the individual does not fall within any one (1) of the following categories: (i)  Is under indictment for, or has been convicted in any court of, a * * *felony disqualifying crime as provided in the Fresh Start Act; (ii)  Is a fugitive from justice; (iii)  Is an unlawful user of any controlled substance, is addicted to any controlled substance or alcoholic beverage, or is an habitual drunkard; (iv)  Is a mental defective, has been committed to a mental institution, or has been voluntarily committed to a mental institution on more than one (1) occasion; (v)  Has been discharged from the Armed Forces under dishonorable conditions; or (vi)  Has been found at any time by the executive director or commission to have falsified any information. (3)  State institutions of higher learning and community colleges may offer credited courses specifically relating to gaming management, including, but not limited to, courses that provide instruction in accounting, hospitality, marketing, auditing, finance, procurement, security and regulatory requirements in fulfillment of a degree in general business management, hotel and motel management, food and beverage management, gaming management, accounting or criminal justice.  State institutions of higher learning and community colleges are not subject to regulation by the commission for the purposes of this subsection.  The courses authorized by this subsection may be offered only in those counties where gaming is legally being conducted and where the institution is located. (4)  State institutions of higher learning and public community colleges may offer courses related to casino hospitality services, cage and count operations, and slot machine maintenance.  Slot machine maintenance training may be performed only on equipment approved by the commission for training purposes only.  State institutions of higher learning and public community colleges are not subject to regulation by the commission for the purposes of this subsection.  The courses authorized by this subsection may be offered only in those counties where gaming is legally being conducted and where the institution or community college is located. SECTION 118.  Section 75-76-35, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 75-76-35.  (1)  The Legislature * * * hereby declares that the exclusion or ejection of certain persons from licensed gaming establishments is necessary to effectuate the policies of this chapter and to maintain effectively the strict regulation of licensed gaming. (2)  The commission may by regulation provide for the establishment of a list of persons who are to be excluded or ejected from any licensed gaming establishment.  The list may include any person whose presence in the establishment is determined by the commission or the executive director to pose a threat to the interests of this state or to licensed gaming, or both. (3)  In making that determination, the commission and the executive director may consider any: (a)  Prior conviction of a crime which is a * * * felony in this state or under the laws of the United States, a crime involving moral turpitude, disqualifying crime as provided in the Fresh Start Act or a violation of the gaming laws of any state; (b)  Violation or conspiracy to violate the provisions of this chapter relating to: (i)  The failure to disclose an interest in a gaming establishment for which the person must obtain a license; or (ii)  Willful evasion of fees or taxes; (c)  * * * Notorious or unsavory reputation Conduct which would adversely affect public confidence and trust that the gaming industry is free from criminal or corruptive elements; or (d)  Written order of a governmental agency which authorizes the exclusion or ejection of the person from an establishment at which gaming is conducted. (4)  Race, color, creed, national origin or ancestry, or sex shall not be grounds for placing the name of a person upon the list. SECTION 119.  Section 75-76-67, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 75-76-67.  (1)  Any person who the commission determines is qualified to receive a license or be found suitable under the provisions of this chapter, having due consideration for the proper protection of the health, safety, morals, good order and general welfare of the inhabitants of the State of Mississippi and the declared policy of this state, may be issued a state gaming license or found suitable.  The burden of proving his qualification to receive any license or be found suitable is on the applicant. (2)  An application to receive a license or be found suitable shall not be granted unless the commission is satisfied that the applicant is: (a)  A person of * * * good character, honesty and integrity; (b)  A person whose prior activities, criminal record, if any, reputation, habits and associations do not pose a threat to the public interest of this state or to the effective regulation and control of gaming, or create or enhance the dangers of unsuitable, unfair or illegal practices, methods and activities in the conduct of gaming or the carrying on of the business and financial arrangements incidental thereto; and (c)  In all other respects qualified to be licensed or found suitable consistent with the declared laws of the state. (3)  No person shall be granted a license or found suitable under the provisions of this chapter who has been convicted of a * * *felony disqualifying crime as provided in the Fresh Start Act in any court of this state, another state, or the United States; * * * and no person shall be granted a license or found suitable hereunder who has been convicted of a crime in any court of another state or the United States which, if committed in this state, would be a felony; and no person shall be granted a license or found suitable under the provisions of this chapter who has been convicted of a misdemeanor in any court of this state or of another state, when such conviction was for gambling, sale of alcoholic beverages to minors, prostitution, or procuring or inducing individuals to engage in prostitution. (4)  A license to operate a gaming establishment shall not be granted unless the applicant has satisfied the commission that: (a)  He has adequate business probity, competence and experience, in gaming or generally; and (b)  The proposed financing of the entire operation is: (i)  Adequate for the nature of the proposed operation; and (ii)  From a suitable source.  Any lender or other source of money or credit which the commission finds does not meet the standards set forth in subsection (2) may be deemed unsuitable. (5)  An application to receive a license or be found suitable constitutes a request for a determination of the applicant's general * * *character, integrity and ability to participate or engage in, or be associated with gaming.  Any written or oral statement made in the course of an official proceeding of the commission or the executive director or any witness testifying under oath which is relevant to the purpose of the proceeding is absolutely privileged and does not impose liability for defamation or constitute a ground for recovery in any civil action. (6)  The commission may, in its discretion, grant a license to a corporation which has complied with the provisions of this chapter. (7)  The commission may, in its discretion, grant a license to a limited partnership which has complied with the provisions of this chapter. (8)  No limited partnership, except one whose sole limited partner is a publicly traded corporation which has registered with the commission, or business trust or organization or other association of a quasi-corporate character is eligible to receive or hold any license under this chapter unless all persons having any direct or indirect interest therein of any nature whatsoever, whether financial, administrative, policymaking or supervisory, are individually qualified to be licensed under the provisions of this chapter. (9)  The commission may, by regulation, limit the number of persons who may be financially interested and the nature of their interest in any corporation or other organization or association licensed under this chapter, and may establish such other qualifications of licenses as the commission, in its discretion, deems to be in the public interest and consistent with the declared policy of the state. SECTION 120.  Section 75-76-103, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 75-76-103. (1)  The executive director shall make appropriate investigations: (a) To determine whether there has been any violation of this chapter or of any regulations adopted thereunder. (b) To determine any facts, conditions, practices or matters which it may deem necessary or proper to aid in the enforcement of any such law or regulation. (c) To aid in adopting regulations. (d) To secure information as a basis for recommending legislation relating to this chapter. (2) If after any investigation the executive director is satisfied that a license, registration, finding of suitability, or prior approval by the commission of any transaction for which approval was required or permitted under the provisions of this chapter should be limited, conditioned, suspended or revoked, he shall initiate a hearing by filing a complaint with the commission and transmit therewith a summary of evidence in his possession bearing on the matter and the transcript of testimony at any investigative hearing conducted by or on behalf of the executive director to the licensee. (3) Upon receipt of the complaint of the executive director, the commission shall review all matter presented in support thereof and shall appoint a hearing examiner to conduct further proceedings. (4) After such proceedings as may be required by this chapter the hearing examiner may recommend that the commission take any or all of the following actions: (a) Limit, condition, suspend or revoke the license of any licensed gaming establishment or the individual license of any licensee without affecting the license of the establishment; (b) Limit, condition, suspend or revoke any registration, finding of suitability, or prior approval given or granted to any applicant by the commission; (c) Order a licensed gaming establishment to keep an individual licensee from the premises of the licensed gaming establishment or not to pay the licensee any remuneration for services or any profits, income or accruals on his investment in the licensed gaming establishment; and (d) Fine each person or entity or both, who was licensed, registered or found suitable or who previously obtained approval for any act or transaction for which commission approval was required or permitted, not more than One Hundred Thousand Dollars ($100,000.00) for each separate violation of the provisions of this chapter or of the regulations of the commission which is the subject of an initial complaint and not more than Two Hundred Fifty Thousand Dollars ($250,000.00) for each separate violation of the provisions of this chapter or of the regulations of the commission which is the subject of any subsequent complaint. (5) The hearing examiner shall prepare a written decision containing his recommendation to the commission and shall serve it on all parties.  Any party that disagrees with the hearing examiner's recommendation may ask the commission to review the recommendation within ten (10) days of service of the recommendation.  The commission may hold a hearing to consider the recommendation whether there has been a request to review the recommendation or not. (6) If the commission decides to review the recommendation, it shall give notice of that fact to all parties within thirty (30) days of the recommendation and shall schedule a hearing to review the recommendation.  The commission's review shall be de novo but shall be based upon the evidence presented before the hearing examiner.  The commission may remand the case to the hearing examiner for the presentation of additional evidence upon a showing of good cause why the evidence could not have been presented at the previous hearing. (7) If the commission decides not to review the recommendation within thirty (30) days, the recommendation becomes the final order of the commission. (8) If the commission limits, conditions, suspends or revokes any license or imposes a fine, or limits, conditions, suspends or revokes any registration, finding of suitability, or prior approval, it shall issue its written order therefor after causing to be prepared and filed the hearing examiner's written decision upon which the order is based. (9) Any such limitation, condition, revocation, suspension or fine so made is effective until reversed upon judicial review, except that the commission may stay its order pending a rehearing or judicial review upon such terms and conditions as it deems proper. (10) Judicial review of any such order or decision of the commission may be had in accordance with the provisions of this chapter. (11) A license or finding of suitability for any individual is automatically revoked if such person is convicted of a * * *felony disqualifying crime as provided in the Fresh Start Act in any court of this state, another state, or the United States or if such person is convicted of a crime in any court of another state or the United States which, if committed in this state, would be a * * *felony disqualifying crime as provided in the Fresh Start Act. Any appeal from such conviction shall not act as a supersedeas to the revocation required by this subsection. SECTION 121.  Section 75-76-131, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 75-76-131.  (1)  The executive director shall: (a)  Ascertain and keep himself informed of the identity, prior activities and present location of all gaming employees in the State of Mississippi; and (b)  Maintain confidential records of such information. (2)  No person may be employed as a gaming employee unless he is the holder of a work permit issued by the commission. (3)  A work permit issued to a gaming employee must have clearly imprinted thereon a statement that it is valid for gaming purposes only. (4)  Application for a work permit is to be made to the executive director and may be granted or denied for any cause deemed reasonable by the commission.  Whenever the executive director denies such an application, he shall include in the notice of the denial a statement of the facts upon which he relied in denying the application. (5)  Any person whose application for a work permit has been denied by the executive director may, not later than sixty (60) days after receiving notice of the denial or objection, apply to the commission for a hearing before a hearing examiner.  A failure of a person whose application has been denied to apply for a hearing within sixty (60) days or his failure to appear at a hearing conducted pursuant to this section shall be deemed to be an admission that the denial or objection is well founded and precludes administrative or judicial review.  At the hearing, the hearing examiner appointed by the commission shall take any testimony deemed necessary.  After the hearing the hearing examiner shall within thirty (30) days after the date of the hearing announce his decision sustaining or reversing the denial of the work permit or the objection to the issuance of a work permit.  The executive director may refuse to issue a work permit if the applicant has: (a)  Failed to disclose, misstated or otherwise attempted to mislead the commission with respect to any material fact contained in the application for the issuance or renewal of a work permit; (b)  Knowingly failed to comply with the provisions of this chapter or the regulations of the commission at a place of previous employment; (c)  Committed, attempted or conspired to commit any crime of * * * moral turpitude, embezzlement or larceny or any violation of any law pertaining to gaming, or any crime which is * * * inimical to the declared policy of this state concerning gaming a disqualifying crime as provided in the Fresh Start Act; (d)  Been identified in the published reports of any federal or state legislative or executive body as being a member or associate of organized crime * * *, or as being of notorious and unsavory reputation; (e)  Been placed and remains in the constructive custody of any federal, state or municipal law enforcement authority; (f)  Had a work permit revoked or committed any act which is a ground for the revocation of a work permit or would have been a ground for revoking his work permit if he had then held a work permit; or (g)  For any other reasonable cause. The executive director shall refuse to issue a work permit if the applicant has committed, attempted or conspired to commit a crime which is a * * * felony disqualifying crime as provided in the Fresh Start Act in this state or an offense in another state or jurisdiction which would be a * * * felony disqualifying crime as provided in the Fresh Start Act if committed in this state. (6)  Any applicant aggrieved by the decision of the hearing examiner may, within fifteen (15) days after the announcement of the decision, apply in writing to the commission for review of the decision.  Review is limited to the record of the proceedings before the hearing examiner.  The commission may sustain or reverse the hearing examiner's decision.  The commission may decline to review the hearing examiner's decision, in which case the hearing examiner's decision becomes the final decision of the commission.  The decision of the commission is subject to judicial review. (7)  All records acquired or compiled by the commission relating to any application made pursuant to this section and all lists of persons to whom work permits have been issued or denied and all records of the names or identity of persons engaged in the gaming industry in this state are confidential and must not be disclosed except in the proper administration of this chapter or to an authorized law enforcement agency.  Any record of the commission which shows that the applicant has been convicted of a disqualifying crime in another state must show whether the crime was a misdemeanor, gross misdemeanor, felony or other class of crime as classified by the state in which the crime was committed.  In a disclosure of the conviction, reference to the classification of the crime must be based on the classification in the state where it was committed. (8)  A work permit expires unless renewed within ten (10) days after a change of place of employment or if the holder thereof is not employed as a gaming employee within the jurisdiction of the issuing authority for more than ninety (90) days. (9)  Notice of any objection to or denial of a work permit by the executive director as provided pursuant to this section is sufficient if it is mailed to the applicant's last known address as indicated on the application for a work permit.  The date of mailing may be proven by a certificate signed by the executive director or his designee that specifies the time the notice was mailed.  The notice is presumed to have been received by the applicant five (5) days after it is deposited with the United States Postal Service with the postage thereon prepaid. SECTION 122.  Section 75-76-137, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 75-76-137.  (1)  If any gaming employee is convicted of any violation of this chapter or if in investigating an alleged violation of this chapter by any licensee the executive director or the commission finds that a gaming employee employed by the licensee has been guilty of cheating, the commission shall, after a hearing as provided in Sections 75-76-103 through 75-76-119, inclusive, revoke the employee's work permit. (2)  The commission may revoke a work permit if it finds after a hearing as provided in Sections 75-76-103 through 75-76-119, inclusive, that the gaming employee has failed to disclose, misstated or otherwise misled the commission with respect to any fact contained within any application for a work permit, or subsequent to being issued a work permit: (a)  Committed, attempted or conspired to do any of the acts prohibited by this chapter; (b)  Knowingly possessed or permitted to remain in or upon any licensed premises any cards, dice, mechanical device or any other cheating device whatever the use of which is prohibited by statute or ordinance; (c)  Concealed or refused to disclose any material fact in any investigation by the executive director or the commission; (d)  Committed, attempted or conspired to commit larceny or embezzlement against a gaming licensee or upon the premises of a licensed gaming establishment; (e)  Been convicted * * * in any jurisdiction other than Mississippi of any * * * offense involving or relating to gambling disqualifying crime as provided in the Fresh Start Act; (f)  Accepted employment without prior commission approval in a position for which he or she could be required to be licensed under this chapter after having been denied a license for a reason involving personal unsuitability or after failing to apply for licensing when requested to do so by the commission or the executive director; (g)  Been refused the issuance of any license, permit or approval to engage in or be involved with gaming in any jurisdiction other than Mississippi, or had any such license, permit or approval revoked or suspended; (h)  Been prohibited under color of governmental authority from being present upon the premises of any gaming establishment for any reason relating to improper gambling activities or any illegal act; or (i)  Contumaciously defied any legislative investigative committee or other officially constituted bodies acting on behalf of the United States or any state, county or municipality which seeks to investigate crimes relating to gaming, corruption of public officials, or any organized criminal activities * * *; or. * * *  (j)  Been convicted of any felony or misdemeanor, other than one constituting a violation of this chapter. (3)  A work permit shall not be issued to a person whose work permit has previously been revoked pursuant to this section or to whom the issuance or renewal of a work permit has been denied, except with the unanimous approval of the commission members. (4)  A gaming employee whose work permit has been revoked pursuant to this section is entitled to judicial review of the commission's action in the manner prescribed by Sections 75-76-121 through 75-76-127, inclusive. SECTION 123.  Section 77-8-25, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 77-8-25. (1)  Before allowing an individual to accept trip requests through a transportation network company's digital platform as a transportation network company driver: (a) The individual shall submit an application to the transportation network company, which includes information regarding his or her address, age, driver's license, motor vehicle registration, automobile liability insurance, and other information required by the transportation network company; (b) The transportation network company shall conduct, or have a third party conduct, a local and national criminal background check for each applicant that shall include: (i) Multistate/multijurisdiction criminal records locator or other similar commercial nationwide database with validation (primary source search); and (ii) United States Department of Justice National Sex Offender Public Website * * *;. (2)  The transportation network company shall review, or have a third party review, a driving history research report for such individual. (3)  The transportation network company shall not permit an individual to act as a transportation network company driver on its digital platform who: (a) Has had more than three (3) moving violations in the prior three-year period, or one (1) of the following major violations in the prior three-year period: (i) Attempting to evade the police; (ii) Reckless driving; or (iii) Driving on a suspended or revoked license; (b) Has been convicted, within the past seven (7) years, of (i) Any * * *felony disqualifying crime as provided in the Fresh Start Act; or (ii) Misdemeanor driving under the influence, reckless driving, hit and run, or any other driving-related offense or any misdemeanor violent offense or sexual offense; (c) Is a match in the United States Department of Justice National Sex Offender Public Website; (d) Does not possess a valid driver's license; (e) Does not possess proof of registration for the motor vehicle used to provide prearranged rides; (f) Does not possess proof of automobile liability insurance for the motor vehicle used to provide prearranged rides; or (g) Is not at least nineteen (19) years of age. SECTION 124.  Section 77-9-503, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 77-9-503. For purposes of Sections 77-9-501 through 77-9-517, unless the context requires otherwise, the following terms shall have the meanings ascribed herein: (a) "Railroad" means a common carrier by railroad. (b) "Qualified person" means a person who: (i) Has met all the educational and training requirements for railroad police in this state which shall be approved by the Mississippi Law Enforcement Training Academy; and (ii)  * * *is of good moral character and Has not been convicted of any * * *crime involving moral turpitude disqualifying crime as provided in the Fresh Start Act. SECTION 125.  Section 81-18-9, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 81-18-9.  (1)  Applicants for a license shall apply in a form as prescribed by the commissioner.  Each such form shall contain content as set forth by rule, regulation, instruction or procedure of the commissioner and may be changed or updated as necessary by the commissioner in order to carry out the purposes of this chapter. (2)  The mortgage broker and mortgage lender application through the Nationwide Multistate Licensing System and Registry shall include, but is not limited to, the following: (a)  The legal name, residence and business address of the applicant and, if applicable, the legal name, residence and business address of every principal and executive officer, together with the résumé of the applicant and of every principal and executive officer of the applicant.  In addition, an independent credit report obtained from a consumer-reporting agency described in Section 603(p) of the Fair Credit Reporting Act and information related to any administrative, civil or criminal findings by any governmental jurisdiction of every principal and executive officer. (b)  The legal name of the mortgage broker or mortgage lender in addition to the name under which the applicant will conduct business in the state, neither of which may be already assigned to a licensed mortgage broker or mortgage lender. (c)  The complete address of the applicant's principal place of business, branch office(s) and any other locations at which the applicant will engage in any business activity covered by this chapter.  All locations shall be within the United States of America or a territory of the United States of America, including Puerto Rico and the U.S. Virgin Islands. (d)  A copy of the certificate of incorporation, if a Mississippi corporation. (e)  Documentation satisfactory to the department as to a certificate of existence of authority to transact business lawfully in Mississippi from the Mississippi Secretary of State's office, if a limited liability company, partnership, trust or any other group of persons, however organized.  This paragraph does not pertain to applicants organized as an individual or as a sole proprietorship. (f)  If a foreign entity, a copy of a certificate of authority to conduct business in Mississippi and the address of the principal place of business of the foreign entity. (g)  Documentation of a minimum of two (2) years' experience directly related to mortgage activities by a person named as the qualifying individual of the company.  The qualifying individual shall be primarily responsible for the operations of the licensed mortgage broker or mortgage lender.  Only one (1) qualifying individual shall be named for Mississippi and this person shall be the qualifying individual for only one (1) licensee.  Evidence of experience shall include, where applicable: (i)  Copies of business licenses issued by governmental agencies. (ii)  Employment history of the person filing the application for at least two (2) years before the date of the filing of an application, including, but not limited to, job descriptions, length of employment, names, addresses and phone numbers for past employers. (iii)  Any other data and pertinent information as the department may require with respect to the applicant, its directors, principals, trustees, officers, members, contractors or agents.  A resume alone shall not be sufficient proof of employment history. (3)  The mortgage broker and mortgage lender applications shall be filed on the Nationwide Multistate Licensing System and Registry together with the following: (a)  The license fee specified in Section 81-18-15; (b)  An original or certified copy of a surety bond in favor of the State of Mississippi for the use, benefit and indemnity of any person who suffers any damage or loss as a result of the company's breach of contract or of any obligation arising therefrom or any violation of law; (c)  A set of fingerprints from any local law enforcement agency from the following applicants: (i)  All persons operating as a sole proprietorship that plan to conduct a mortgage-brokering or lending business in the State of Mississippi; (ii)  Partners in a partnership or principal owners of a limited liability company that own at least ten percent (10%) of the voting shares of the company; (iii)  Any shareholders owning ten percent (10%) or more of the outstanding shares of the corporation; (iv)  All executive officers of the applicant; (v)  All loan originators; and (vi)  The named qualifying individual of the company as required in Section 81-18-9(2)(g).  The applicant shall name only one (1) individual as the qualifying individual for the State of Mississippi; and (d)  At least one (1) individual shall be licensed as a loan originator at a licensed location. (4)  In connection with an application for licensing as a mortgage broker or lender under this chapter, the required stockholders, owners, directors and executive officers of the applicant shall, at a minimum, furnish to the Nationwide Multistate Licensing System and Registry information concerning the individual's identity, including: (a)  Fingerprints from any local law enforcement agency for submission to the Federal Bureau of Investigation and any governmental entity authorized to receive that information for a state, national and/or international criminal history background check; and (b)  Personal history and experience in a form prescribed by the Nationwide Multistate Licensing System and Registry, including the submission of authorization for the Nationwide Multistate Licensing System and Registry and the commissioner to obtain: (i)  An independent credit report obtained from a consumer-reporting agency described in Section 603(p) of the Fair Credit Reporting Act; and (ii)  Information related to any administrative, civil or criminal findings by any governmental jurisdiction. (5)  Upon receipt of an application for licensure, the department or designated third party shall conduct an investigation as it deems necessary to determine that the applicant and its officers, directors and principals are of * * * good character and ethical reputation; that the applicant demonstrates reasonable financial responsibility; and that the applicant has reasonable policies and procedures to receive and process customer grievances and inquiries promptly and fairly. (6)  The commissioner shall not license an applicant unless he is satisfied that the applicant will operate its mortgage activities in compliance with the laws, rules and regulations of this state and the United States. (7)  If an applicant satisfies the requirements of this chapter for a mortgage broker or mortgage lender license, the commissioner shall issue the license unless the commissioner finds any of the following: (a)  The applicant has had a mortgage lender, mortgage broker or mortgage servicer license revoked in any governmental jurisdiction, except that a subsequent formal vacation of the revocation shall not be deemed a revocation; or (b)  The applicant or its controlling persons has been convicted of, or pled guilty or nolo contendere to, (i) a * * *felony disqualifying crime as provided in the Fresh Start Act in a domestic, foreign or military court during the seven-year period preceding the date of application for licensing; or (ii) at any time preceding the date of application if such * * *felony crime involved an act of fraud, dishonesty, a breach of trust, or money laundering.  However, any pardon or expungement of a conviction shall not be a conviction for purposes of this subsection. (8)  Applicants for a mortgage loan originator license shall apply in a form as prescribed by the commissioner and shall be filed on the Nationwide Multistate Licensing System and Registry.  Each such form shall contain content as set forth by rules, regulations, instructions or procedures of the commissioner and may be changed or updated as necessary by the commissioner in order to carry out the purposes of this chapter.  The initial license of a mortgage loan originator shall be accompanied by a fee of Three Hundred Dollars ($300.00), to be paid to the Nationwide Multistate Licensing System and Registry, and any additional fees as required by the Nationwide Multistate Licensing System and Registry.  The commissioner shall not issue a mortgage loan originator license unless the commissioner makes at a minimum the following findings: (a)  The applicant has never had a mortgage loan originator license revoked in any governmental jurisdiction, except that a later formal vacation of that revocation shall not be deemed a revocation. (b)  The applicant has not been convicted of, or pled guilty or nolo contendere to, (i) a * * *felony disqualifying crime as provided in the Fresh Start Act in a domestic, foreign or military court during the seven-year period preceding the date of application for licensing; or (ii) at any time preceding the date of application if such * * *felony crime involved an act of fraud, dishonesty, a breach of trust or money laundering.  However, any pardon or expungement of a conviction shall not be a conviction for purposes of this subsection. (c)  The applicant has demonstrated financial responsibility, character and general fitness such as to command the confidence of the community and to warrant a determination that the mortgage loan originator will operate honestly, fairly and efficiently within the purposes of this chapter. (d)  The applicant has completed the prelicensing education requirement described in Section 81-18-14(1). (e)  The applicant has passed a written test that meets the test requirement described in Section 81-18-14(7). (f)  The applicant has met the surety bond requirement as provided in Section 81-18-11. (g)  This individual must work or be exclusively engaged to perform mortgage loan origination activities for a Mississippi licensed company and work or perform mortgage loan origination activities from the location licensed with the department or a remote location.  If the licensed loan originator resides and works or performs mortgage loan origination activities in Mississippi, then he or she may work or perform mortgage loan origination activities from any licensed location of the licensed company within the State of Mississippi or a remote location. However, an owner of a minimum of ten percent (10%) of a licensed company or the named qualifying individual on file with the department, who is a licensed loan originator with the department, may work from any licensed location of the licensed company within the State of Mississippi in the capacity of a loan originator as described in this chapter. (9)  In order to fulfill the purposes of this chapter, the commissioner is authorized to establish relationships or contracts with the Nationwide Multistate Licensing System and Registry or other entities designated by the Nationwide Multistate Licensing System and Registry to collect and maintain records and process transaction fees or other fees related to licensees or other persons subject to this chapter. (10)  In connection with an application for licensing as a mortgage loan originator, the applicant shall, at a minimum, furnish to the Nationwide Multistate Licensing System and Registry information concerning the applicant's identity, including: (a)  Fingerprints for submission to the Federal Bureau of Investigation, and any governmental agency or entity authorized to receive that information for a state, national and/or international criminal history background check; and (b)  Personal history and experience in a form prescribed by the Nationwide Multistate Licensing System and Registry, including the submission of authorization for the Nationwide Multistate Licensing System and Registry and the commissioner to obtain: (i)  An independent credit report obtained from a consumer-reporting agency described in Section 603(p) of the Fair Credit Reporting Act; and (ii)  Information related to any administrative, civil or criminal findings by any governmental jurisdiction. (11)  For the purposes of this section and in order to reduce the points of contact which the Federal Bureau of Investigation may have to maintain for purposes of subsection (10)(a) and (b)(ii) of this section, the commissioner may use the Nationwide Multistate Licensing System and Registry as a channeling agent for requesting information from and distributing information to the Department of Justice or any governmental agency. (12)  For the purposes of this section and in order to reduce the points of contact which the commissioner may have to maintain for purposes of subsection (10)(b)(i) and (ii) of this section, the commissioner may use the Nationwide Multistate Licensing System and Registry as a channeling agent for requesting and distributing information to and from any source so directed by the commissioner. SECTION 126.  Section 83-7-207, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 83-7-207.  (1)  The commissioner may suspend, revoke or refuse to renew the license of a viatical settlement provider, viatical settlement representative or viatical settlement broker if the commissioner finds that: (a)  There was any material misrepresentation in the application for the license; (b)  The licensee or any officer, partner or key management personnel has been convicted of fraudulent or dishonest practices, is subject to a final administrative action or is otherwise shown to be untrustworthy or incompetent; (c)  The viatical settlement provider demonstrates a pattern of unreasonable payments to viators; (d)  The licensee has been found guilty of, or has pleaded guilty or nolo contendere to, any * * * felony or to a misdemeanor involving fraud or moral turpitude, regardless of whether a judgment of conviction has been entered by the court disqualifying crime as provided in the Fresh Start; (e)  The viatical settlement provider has failed to honor contractual obligations set out in a viatical settlement contract; (f)  The licensee no longer meets the requirements for initial licensure; (g)  The viatical settlement provider has assigned, transferred or pledged a viaticated policy to a person other than a viatical settlement provider licensed in this state or a financing entity; or (h)  The licensee has violated any provisions of Sections 83-7-201 through 83-7-223. (2)  Before the commissioner shall deny a license application or suspend, revoke or refuse to renew the license of a viatical settlement provider, viatical settlement broker or viatical settlement representative, the commissioner shall conduct a hearing in accordance with Section 25-43-1.101 et seq. SECTION 127.  Section 83-17-71, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 83-17-71.  (1)  The commissioner may place on probation, suspend, revoke or refuse to issue or renew an insurance producer's license or may levy a civil penalty in an amount not to exceed One Thousand Dollars ($1,000.00) per violation and such penalty shall be deposited into the special fund of the State Treasury designated as the "Insurance Department Fund" for any one or more of the following causes: (a)  Providing incorrect, misleading, incomplete or materially untrue information in the license application; (b)  Violating any insurance laws, or violating any regulation, subpoena or order of the commissioner or of another state's commissioner; (c)  Obtaining or attempting to obtain a license through misrepresentation or fraud; (d)  Improperly withholding, misappropriating or converting any monies or properties received in the course of doing insurance business; (e)  Intentionally misrepresenting the terms of an actual or proposed insurance contract or application for insurance; (f)  Having been convicted of a * * *felony disqualifying crime as provided in the Fresh Start Act; (g)  Having admitted or been found to have committed any insurance unfair trade practice or fraud; (h)  Using fraudulent, coercive or dishonest practices or demonstrating incompetence, untrustworthiness or financial irresponsibility in the conduct of business in this state or elsewhere; (i)  Having an insurance producer license, or its equivalent, denied, suspended or revoked in any other state, province, district or territory; (j)  Forging another's name to an application for insurance or to any document related to an insurance transaction; (k)  Improperly using notes or any other reference material to complete an examination for an insurance license; (l)  Knowingly accepting insurance business from an individual who is not licensed; (m)  Failing to comply with an administrative or court order imposing a child support obligation; or (n)  Failing to pay state income tax or comply with any administrative or court order directing payment of state income tax. (2)  If the action by the commissioner is to nonrenew or to deny an application for a license, the commissioner shall notify the applicant or licensee and advise, in writing, the applicant or licensee of the reason for the denial or nonrenewal of the applicant's or licensee's license.  The applicant or licensee may make written demand upon the commissioner within ten (10) days for a hearing before the commissioner to determine the reasonableness of the commissioner's action.  The hearing shall be held within thirty (30) days. (3)  The license of a business entity may be suspended, revoked or refused if the commissioner finds, after hearing, that an individual licensee's violation was known or should have been known by one or more of the partners, officers or managers acting on behalf of the partnership or corporation and the violation was neither reported to the commissioner nor corrective action taken. (4)  In addition to, or in lieu of, any applicable denial, suspension or revocation of a license, a person may, after hearing, be subject to a civil fine not to exceed One Thousand Dollars ($1,000.00) per violation and such fine shall be deposited into the special fund in the State Treasury designated as the "Insurance Department Fund." (5)  The commissioner shall retain the authority to enforce the provisions of and impose any penalty or remedy authorized by this article and Title 83, Mississippi Code of 1972, against any person who is under investigation for or charged with a violation of this article or Title 83, Mississippi Code of 1972, even if the person's license or registration has been surrendered or has lapsed by operation of law. (6)  No licensee whose license has been revoked hereunder shall be entitled to file another application for a license as a producer within one (1) year from the effective date of such revocation or, if judicial review of such revocation is sought, within one (1) year from the date of final court order or decree affirming such revocation.  Such application, when filed, may be refused by the commissioner unless the applicant shows good cause why the revocation of his license shall not be deemed a bar to the issuance of a new license. (7)  Notwithstanding any other provision of this article to the contrary, a person licensed in this state as a nonresident producer whose license is denied, suspended or revoked in his or her home state shall also have his or her nonresident license denied, suspended or revoked in this state without prior notice or hearing. (8)  From and after July 1, 2016, the expenses of this agency shall be defrayed by appropriation from the State General Fund and all user charges and fees authorized under this section shall be deposited into the State General Fund as authorized by law. (9)  From and after July 1, 2016, no state agency shall charge another state agency a fee, assessment, rent or other charge for services or resources received by authority of this section. SECTION 128.  Section 83-17-75, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 83-17-75.  (1)  An insurance producer shall not act as an agent of an insurer unless the insurance producer becomes an appointed agent of that insurer.  An insurance producer who is not acting as an agent of an insurer is not required to become appointed. (2)  To appoint a producer as its agent, the appointing insurer shall file, in a format approved by the commissioner, a notice of appointment within fifteen (15) days from the date the agency contract is executed or the first insurance application is submitted.  An insurer may also elect to appoint a producer to all or some insurers within the insurer's holding company system or group by the filing of a single appointment request. (3)  Upon receipt of the notice of appointment, the commissioner shall verify within a reasonable time not to exceed thirty (30) days that the insurance producer is eligible for appointment.  If the insurance producer is determined to be ineligible for appointment, the commissioner shall notify the insurer within five (5) days of its determination. (4)  An insurer shall pay an appointment fee, in the amount and method of payment set forth in Section 83-5-73 for each insurance producer appointed by the insurer. (5)  An insurer shall remit, in a manner prescribed by the commissioner, a renewal appointment fee in the amount set forth in Section 83-5-73. (6)  Before the issuance of a license or certificate of authority, the commissioner shall require the company requesting appointment of the applicant as producer for the first time to furnish a certificate to the commissioner, verified by an executive officer or managing general or special agent of such company, that the company has duly investigated the * * *character and record of such person and has satisfied itself that such person is * * *of good moral character and is qualified, fit and trustworthy to act as its producer.  The Commissioner of Insurance may at any time require any company to obtain a credit report on a producer if the commissioner deems such request advisable.  Should such credit report reflect information regarding an offense or violation in relation to which the Department of Insurance has taken action, such information shall not render the applicant ineligible for a license if applicant has complied with the order of the commissioner regarding such offense. SECTION 129.  Section 83-17-421, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 83-17-421.  (1)  A license may be refused, or a license duly issued may be suspended or revoked or the renewal thereof refused by the commissioner if, after notice and hearing as hereinafter provided, he or she finds that the applicant for, or holder of, such license: (a)  Has * * * wilfully willfully violated any provision of the insurance laws of this state; or (b)  Has intentionally made a material misstatement in the application for such license; or (c)  Has obtained, or attempted to obtain, such license by fraud or misrepresentation; or (d)  Has misappropriated or converted to his or her own use or illegally withheld money belonging to an insurer or beneficiary; or (e)  Has otherwise demonstrated lack of trustworthiness or competence to act as an adjuster; or (f)  Has been guilty of fraudulent or dishonest practices or has been convicted of a * * * felony disqualifying crime as provided in the Fresh Act; or (g)  Has materially misrepresented the terms and conditions of insurance policies or contracts; or * * * wilfully willfully exaggerated prospective returns on investment features of policies or fails to identify himself or herself as an adjuster and in so doing receives a compensation for his or her participation in the sale of insurance; or (h)  Has made or issued, or caused to be made or issued, any statement misrepresenting or making incomplete comparisons regarding the terms or conditions of any insurance or annuity contract legally issued by any insurer, for the purpose of inducing or attempting to induce the owner of such contract to forfeit or surrender such contract or allow it to lapse for the purpose of replacing such contract with another; or (i)  Has obtained or attempted to obtain such license, not for the purpose of holding himself or herself out to the general public as an adjuster, but primarily for the purpose of soliciting, negotiating or procuring insurance or annuity contracts covering himself or herself or members of his or her family. (2)  Before any license shall be refused (except for failure to pass a required written examination) or suspended or revoked or the renewal thereof refused hereunder, the commissioner shall give notice of his or her intention so to do, by registered mail, to the applicant for or holder of such license and the insurer whom he or she represents or who desires that he or she be licensed, and shall set a date not less than twenty (20) days from the date of mailing such notice when the applicant or licensee and a duly authorized representative of the insurer may appear to be heard and produce evidence.  Such notice shall constitute automatic suspension of license if the person involved is a licensed adjuster. In the conduct of such hearing, the commissioner or any regular salaried employee specially designated by him or her for such purpose shall have power to administer oaths, to require the appearance of and examine any person under oath and to require the production of books, records or papers relevant to the inquiry upon his or her own initiative or upon the request of the applicant or licensee.  Upon the termination of such hearing, findings shall be reduced to writing and, upon approval by the commissioner, shall be filed in his or her office; and notice of the findings shall be sent by registered mail to the applicant or licensee and the insurer concerned. (3)  Where the grounds set out in subsection (1)(d) or (1)(g) are the grounds for any hearing, the commissioner may, in his or her discretion in lieu of the hearing provided for in subsection (2) of this section, file a petition to suspend or revoke any license authorized hereunder in a court of competent jurisdiction of the county or district in which the alleged offense occurred.  In such cases, subpoenas may be issued for witnesses, and mileage and witness fees paid as in other cases.  All costs of such cause shall be paid by the defendant, if found guilty, and if costs cannot be made and collected from the defendant, such costs shall be assessed against the company issuing the contract involved in such cause. (4)  No licensee whose license has been revoked hereunder shall be entitled to file another application for a license as an adjuster within one (1) year from the effective date of such revocation or, if judicial review of such revocation is sought, within one (1) year from the date of final court order or decree affirming such revocation.  Such application, when filed, may be refused by the commissioner unless the applicant shows good cause why the revocation of his or her license shall not be deemed a bar to the issuance of a new license. SECTION 130.  Section 83-17-519, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 83-17-519.  (1)  A license may be refused, or a license duly issued may be suspended or revoked or the renewal thereof refused by the commissioner, or the commissioner may levy a civil penalty in an amount not to exceed Five Thousand Dollars ($5,000.00) per violation, or both, and any such penalty shall be deposited into the special fund of the State Treasury designated as the "Insurance Department Fund," if, after notice and hearing as hereinafter provided, he finds that the applicant for, or holder of, such license: (a)  Has intentionally made a material misstatement in the application for such license; or (b)  Has obtained, or attempted to obtain, such license by fraud or misrepresentation; or (c)  Has misappropriated or converted to his own use or illegally withheld money belonging to another person or entity; or (d)  Has otherwise demonstrated lack of trustworthiness or competence to act as a public adjuster; or (e)  Has been guilty of fraudulent or dishonest practices or has been convicted of a * * *felony disqualifying crime as provided in the Fresh Start Act; or (f)  Has materially misrepresented the terms and conditions of insurance policies or contracts or failed to identify himself as a public adjuster; or (g)  Has obtained or attempted to obtain such license for a purpose other than holding himself out to the general public as a public adjuster; or (h)  Has violated any insurance laws, or any regulation, subpoena or order of the commissioner or of another state's commissioner of insurance. (2)  Before any license shall be refused (except for failure to pass a required written examination) or suspended or revoked or the renewal thereof refused hereunder, the commissioner shall give notice of his intention so to do, by certified mail, return receipt requested, to the applicant for or holder of such license, and shall set a date not less than twenty (20) days from the date of mailing such notice when the applicant or licensee may appear to be heard and produce evidence in opposition to such refusal, suspension or revocation.  Such notice shall constitute automatic suspension of license if the person involved is a licensed public adjuster.  In the conduct of such hearing, the commissioner or any regular salaried employee of the department specially designated by him for such purpose shall have the power to administer oaths, to require the appearance of and examine any person under oath, and to require the production of books, records or papers relevant to the inquiry upon his own initiative or upon the request of the applicant or licensee.  Upon the termination of such hearing, findings shall be reduced to writing and, upon approval by the commissioner, shall be filed in his office; and notice of the findings shall be sent by certified mail, return receipt requested, to the applicant or licensee. (3)  Where the grounds set out in subsection (1)(c) or (1)(f) of this section are the grounds for any hearing, the commissioner may, in his discretion in lieu of the hearing provided for in subsection (2) of this section, file a petition requesting the court to suspend or revoke any license authorized hereunder in a court of competent jurisdiction of the county or district in which the alleged offense occurred.  In such cases, subpoenas may be issued for witnesses, and mileage and witness fees paid as in other cases.  All costs of such cause shall be paid by the defendant, if the finding of the court be against him. (4)  No licensee whose license has been revoked hereunder shall be entitled to file another application for a license as a public adjuster within one (1) year from the effective date of such revocation or, if judicial review of such revocation is sought, within one (1) year from the date of final court order or decree affirming such revocation.  An application filed after such one-year period shall be refused by the commissioner unless the applicant shows good cause why the revocation of his license shall not be deemed a bar to the issuance of a new license. (5)  From and after July 1, 2016, the expenses of this agency shall be defrayed by appropriation from the State General Fund and all user charges and fees authorized under this section shall be deposited into the State General Fund as authorized by law. (6)  From and after July 1, 2016, no state agency shall charge another state agency a fee, assessment, rent or other charge for services or resources received by authority of this section. SECTION 131.  Section 83-21-19, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 83-21-19.  (1)  Surplus lines insurance may be placed by a surplus lines insurance producer if: (a)  Each insurer is an eligible surplus lines insurer; (b)  Each insurer is authorized to write the line of insurance in its domiciliary jurisdiction; and (c)  All other requirements as set forth by law are met. (2)  The Commissioner of Insurance, upon the biennial payment of a fee of One Hundred Dollars ($100.00) and submission of a completed license application on a form approved by the commissioner, may issue a surplus lines insurance producer license to a qualified holder of an insurance producer license with a property, casualty and/or personal lines line of authority, who is regularly commissioned to represent a fire and casualty insurance company licensed to do business in the state. (3)  The privilege license shall continue from the date of issuance until the last day of the month of the licensee's birthday in the second year following issuance or renewal of the license, with a minimum term of twelve (12) months. (4)  A nonresident person shall receive a surplus lines insurance producer license if: (a)  The person is currently licensed as a surplus lines insurance producer or equivalent and in good standing in his or her home state; (b)  The person has submitted the proper request for licensure and has paid the biennial fee of One Hundred Dollars ($100.00); and (c)  The person's home state awards nonresident surplus lines licenses to residents of this state on the same basis. (5)  The commissioner may verify a person's licensing status through the National Producer Database maintained by the National Association of Insurance Commissioners, its affiliates or subsidiaries. (6)  A nonresident surplus lines insurance producer licensee who moves from one (1) state to another state, or a resident surplus lines licensee who moves from this state to another state, shall file a change of address and provide certification from the new resident state within thirty (30) days of the change of legal residence.  No fee or license application is required. (7)  The commissioner may deny, suspend, revoke or refuse the license of a surplus lines insurance producer licensee and/or levy a civil penalty in an amount not to exceed Two Thousand Five Hundred Dollars ($2,500.00) per violation, after notice and hearing as provided hereunder, for one or more of the following grounds: (a)  Providing incorrect, misleading, incomplete or materially untrue information in the license application; (b)  Violating any insurance laws, or violating any regulation, subpoena or order of the commissioner or of another state's commissioner; (c)  Obtaining or attempting to obtain a license through misrepresentation or fraud; (d)  Improperly withholding, misappropriating or converting any monies or properties received in the course of doing the business of insurance; (e)  Intentionally misrepresenting the terms of an actual or proposed insurance contract or application for insurance; (f)  Having been convicted of a * * *felony disqualifying crime as provided in the Fresh Start Act; (g)  Having admitted or been found to have committed any insurance unfair trade practice or fraud; (h)  Using fraudulent, coercive or dishonest practices or demonstrating incompetence, untrustworthiness or financial irresponsibility in the conduct of business in this state or elsewhere; (i)  Having an insurance producer license, or its equivalent, denied, suspended or revoked in any other state, province, district or territory; (j)  Forging another's name to an application for insurance or to any document related to an insurance transaction; (k)  Improperly using notes or any other reference material to complete an examination for an insurance license; (l)  Knowingly accepting insurance business from an individual who is not licensed; (m)  Failing to comply with an administrative or court order imposing a child support obligation; or (n)  Failing to pay state income tax or comply with any administrative or court order directing payment of state income tax. (8)  If the action by the commissioner is to nonrenew, suspend, revoke or to deny an application for a license, the commissioner shall notify the applicant or licensee and advise, in writing, the applicant or licensee of the reason for the denial or nonrenewal of the applicant's or licensee's license.  The applicant or licensee may make written demand upon the commissioner within ten (10) days for a hearing before the commissioner to determine the reasonableness of the commissioner's action. The hearing shall be held within thirty (30) days. (9)  Every surplus lines insurance contract procured and delivered according to Sections 83-21-17 through 83-21-31 shall have stamped upon it in bold ten-point type, and bear the name of the surplus lines insurance producer who procured it, the following:  "NOTE:  This insurance policy is issued pursuant to Mississippi law covering surplus lines insurance.  The company issuing the policy is not licensed by the State of Mississippi, but is authorized to do business in Mississippi as a nonadmitted company.  The policy is not protected by the Mississippi Insurance Guaranty Association in the event of the insurer's insolvency."  No diminution of the license fee herein provided shall occur as to any license effective after January 1 of any year. SECTION 132.  Section 83-39-3, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 83-39-3.  (1)  No person shall act in the capacity of professional bail agent, soliciting bail agent or bail enforcement agent, as defined in Section 83-39-1, or perform any of the functions, duties or powers of the same unless that person shall be qualified and licensed as provided in this chapter.  The terms of this chapter shall not apply to any automobile club or association, financial institution, insurance company or other organization or association or their employees who execute bail bonds on violations arising out of the use of a motor vehicle by their members, policyholders or borrowers when bail bond is not the principal benefit of membership, the policy of insurance or of a loan to such member, policyholder or borrower. (2)  (a)  No license shall be issued or renewed except in compliance with this chapter, and none shall be issued except to an individual.  No firm, partnership, association or corporation, as such, shall be so licensed.  No professional bail agent shall operate under more than one (1) trade name.  A soliciting bail agent and bail enforcement agent shall operate only under the professional bail agent's name. No license shall be issued to or renewed for any person who has ever been convicted of a crime that the commissioner finds directly relates to the duties and responsibilities of the business of a professional bail agent, soliciting bail agent, or bail enforcement agent as provided in the Fresh Start Act, including, but not limited to, any felony that involves an act of fraud, dishonesty, or a breach of trust, or money laundering.  No license shall be issued to any person who is under twenty-one (21) years of age.  No person engaged as a law enforcement or judicial official or attorney shall be licensed hereunder.  A person who is employed in any capacity at any jail or corrections facility that houses state, county or municipal inmates who are or may be eligible for bail, whether the person is a public employee, independent contractor, or the employee of an independent contractor, may not be licensed under this section. (b)  (i)  No person who is a relative of either a sworn state, county or municipal law enforcement official or judicial official, or an employee, independent contractor or the contractor's employee of any police department, sheriff's department, jail or corrections facility that houses or holds federal, state, county or municipal inmates who are or may be eligible for bail, shall write a bond in the county where the law enforcement entity or court in which the person's relative serves is located.  "Relative" means a spouse, parent, grandparent, child, sister, brother, or a consanguineous aunt, uncle, niece or nephew.  Violation of this prohibition shall result in license revocation. (ii)  No person licensed under this chapter shall act as a personal surety agent in the writing of bail during a period he or she is licensed as a limited surety agent, as defined herein. (iii)  No person licensed under this chapter shall give legal advice or a legal opinion in any form. (3)  The department is vested with the authority to enforce this chapter.  The department may conduct investigations or request other state, county or local officials to conduct investigations and promulgate such rules and regulations as may be necessary for the enforcement of this chapter.  The department may establish monetary fines and collect such fines as necessary for the enforcement of such rules and regulations.  All fines collected shall be deposited in the Special Insurance Department Fund for the operation of that agency. (4)  (a)  Each license issued hereunder shall expire biennially on the last day of September of each odd-numbered year, unless revoked or suspended prior thereto by the department, or upon notice served upon the commissioner by the insurer that the authority of a limited surety agent to act for or on behalf of such insurer had been terminated, or upon notice served upon the commissioner that the authority of a soliciting bail agent or bail enforcement agent had been terminated by such professional bail agent. (b)  A soliciting bail agent or bail enforcement agent may, upon termination by a professional bail agent or upon his cessation of employment with a professional bail agent, be relicensed without having to comply with the provisions of subsection (7)(a) and (b) of this section, if he has held a license in his respective license category within ninety (90) days of the new application, meets all other requirements set forth in Section 83-39-5 and subsection (7)(b) of this section, and notifies the previous professional bail agent in writing that he is submitting an application for a new license. (5)  The department shall prepare and deliver to each licensee a license showing the name, address and classification of the licensee, and shall certify that the person is a licensed professional bail agent, being designated as a personal surety agent or a limited surety agent, a soliciting bail agent or a bail enforcement agent.  In addition, the license of a soliciting bail agent or bail enforcement agent, shall show the name of the professional bail agent and any other information as the commissioner deems proper. (6)  The commissioner, after a hearing under Section 83-39-17, may refuse to issue a privilege license for a soliciting bail agent to change from one (1) professional bail agent to another if he owes any premium or debt to the professional bail agent with whom he is currently licensed.  The commissioner, after a hearing under Section 83-39-17, shall refuse to issue a license for a limited surety agent if he owes any premium or debt to an insurer to which he has been appointed.  If a license has been granted to a limited surety agent or a soliciting bail agent who owed any premium or debt to an insurer or professional bail agent, the commissioner, after a hearing under Section 83-39-17, shall revoke the license. (7)  (a)  Before the issuance of any initial professional bail agent, soliciting bail agent or bail enforcement agent license, the applicant shall submit proof of successful completion of forty (40) hours of prelicensing education approved by the Mississippi Insurance Department unless the applicant is currently licensed under this chapter on July 1, 2014, and has maintained that license in compliance with the continuing education requirements of subsection (8) of this section.  Any applicant who has met all continuing education requirements as set forth in subsection (8)(a) of this section and has been properly licensed under this chapter within ninety (90) days of submitting an application for a license shall not be subject to the prelicensing education requirement. (b)  All applicants for a professional bail agent, soliciting bail agent or bail enforcement agent license applying for an original license after July 1, 2014, shall successfully complete a limited examination by the department for the restricted lines of business before the license can be issued; however, this examination requirement shall not apply to any licensed bail soliciting agent and bail enforcement agent transferring to another professional bail agent license, any licensed bail soliciting agent applying for a bail enforcement agent license, and any licensed bail enforcement agent applying for a bail soliciting agent license.  An applicant shall only be required to successfully complete the limited examination once. (c)  Beginning on July 1, 2011, in order to assist the department in determining an applicant's suitability for a license under this chapter as provided in the Fresh Start Act, the applicant shall submit a set of fingerprints with the submission of an application for license.  The department shall forward the fingerprints to the Department of Public Safety for the purpose of conducting a criminal history record check.  If no disqualifying record is identified at the state level, the Department of Public Safety shall forward the fingerprints to the Federal Bureau of Investigation for a national criminal history record check. Fees related to the criminal history record check shall be paid by the applicant to the commissioner and the monies from such fees shall be deposited in the special fund in the State Treasury designated as the "Insurance Department Fund." (8)  (a)  Before the renewal of the license of any professional bail agent, soliciting bail agent or bail enforcement agent, the applicant shall submit proof of successful completion of continuing education hours as follows: (i)  There shall be no continuing education required for the first licensure year; (ii)  Except as provided in subparagraph (i), eight (8) hours of continuing education for each year or part of a year of the two-year license period, for a total of sixteen (16) hours per license period. (b)  If an applicant for renewal failed to obtain the required eight (8) hours for each year of the license period during the actual license year in which the education was required to be obtained, the applicant shall not be eligible for a renewal license but shall be required to obtain an original license and be subject to the education requirements set forth in subsection (7).  The commissioner shall not be required to comply with Section 83-39-17 in denying an application for a renewal license under this paragraph (b). (c)  The education hours required under this subsection (8) shall be approved by the Mississippi Insurance Department. (d)  The continuing education requirements under this subsection (8) shall not be required for renewal of a bail agent license for any applicant who is sixty-five (65) years of age and who has been licensed as a bail agent for a continuous period of twenty (20) years immediately preceding the submission of the application as evidenced by submission of an affidavit, under oath, on a form prescribed by the department, signed by the licensee attesting to satisfaction of the age, licensing, and experience requirements of this paragraph (d). (9)  No license as a professional bail agent shall be issued unless the applicant has been duly licensed by the department as a soliciting bail agent for a period of three (3) consecutive years immediately preceding the submission of the application. However, this subsection (9) shall not apply to any person who was licensed as a professional bail agent before July 1, 2011. (10)  A nonresident person may be licensed as a professional bail agent, bail soliciting agent or bail enforcement agent if: (a)  The person's home state awards licenses to residents of this state on the same basis; and (b)  The person has satisfied all requirements set forth in this chapter. (11)  On or before October 1, 2016, the Insurance Department shall establish a statewide Electronic Bondsmen Registry for all licenses, powers of appointment and powers of attorney requiring registration under this section. Once established, each professional bail agent, limited surety agent, bail soliciting agent, bail enforcement agent or insurance company writing bail bonds shall be required under this subsection (11) to register and maintain a record of each required license, power of appointment and power of attorney in the registry.  Failure to comply with this provision will subject the agent to the penalties provided in Section 83-39-29. (12)  From and after July 1, 2016, the expenses of this agency shall be defrayed by appropriation from the State General Fund and all user charges and fees authorized under this section shall be deposited into the State General Fund as authorized by law. (13)  From and after July 1, 2016, no state agency shall charge another state agency a fee, assessment, rent or other charge for services or resources received by authority of this section. SECTION 133.  Section 83-39-9, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 83-39-9.  The department upon receipt of the license application, the required fee * * *, and proof of good moral character and, in the case of a professional bail agent, an approved qualification bond in the required amount, shall issue to the applicant a license to do business as a professional bail agent, soliciting bail agent or bail enforcement agent as the case may be. No licensed professional bail agent shall have in his employ in the bail bond business any person who could not qualify for a license under this chapter, nor shall any licensed professional bail agent have as a partner or associate in such business any person who could not so qualify. SECTION 134.  Section 83-39-15, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 83-39-15.  (1)  The department may deny, suspend, revoke or refuse to renew, as may be appropriate, a license to engage in the business of professional bail agent, soliciting bail agent, or bail enforcement agent for any of the following reasons: (a)  Any cause for which the issuance of the license would have been refused had it then existed and been known to the department. (b)  Failure to post a qualification bond in the required amount with the department during the period the person is engaged in the business within this state or, if the bond has been posted, the forfeiture or cancellation of the bond. (c)  Material misstatement, misrepresentation or fraud in obtaining the license. (d)  Willful failure to comply with, or willful violation of, any provision of this chapter or of any proper order, rule or regulation of the department or any court of this state. (e)  Conviction of * * *felony or crime involving moral turpitude a disqualifying crime as provided in the Fresh Start Act. (f)  Default in payment to the court should any bond issued by such bail agent be forfeited by order of the court. (g)  Being elected or employed as a law enforcement or judicial official. (h)  Engaging in the practice of law. (i)  Writing a bond in violation of Section 83-39-3(2)(b)(i) and (ii). (j)  Giving legal advice or a legal opinion in any form. (k)  Acting as or impersonating a bail agent without a license. (l)  Use of any other trade name than what is submitted on a license application to the department. (m)  Issuing a bail bond that contains information intended to mislead a court about the proper delivery by personal service or certified mail of a writ of scire facias, judgment nisi or final judgment. (2)  In addition to the grounds specified in subsection (1) of this section, the department shall be authorized to suspend the license, registration or permit of any person for being out of compliance with an order for support, as defined in Section 93-11-153. The procedure for suspension of a license, registration or permit for being out of compliance with an order for support, and the procedure for the reissuance or reinstatement of a license, registration or permit suspended for that purpose, and the payment of any fees for the reissuance or reinstatement of a license, registration or permit suspended for that purpose, shall be governed by Section 93-11-157 or 93-11-163, as the case may be.  If there is any conflict between any provision of Section 93-11-157 or 93-11-163 and any provision of this chapter, the provisions of Section 93-11-157 or 93-11-163, as the case may be, shall control. (3)  In addition to the sanctions provided in this section, the department may assess an administrative fine in an amount not to exceed One Thousand Dollars ($1,000.00) per violation.  Such administrative fines shall be in addition to any criminal penalties assessed under Section 99-5-1. SECTION 135.  Section 83-49-11, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 83-49-11.  The commissioner may revoke or suspend or refuse to renew the license of any sponsor or representative of such sponsor when and if after investigation the commissioner finds that: (a)  Any license issued to such sponsor or representative of such sponsor was obtained by fraud; (b)  There was any misrepresentation in the application for the license; (c)  The sponsor or representative of such sponsor has otherwise shown itself untrustworthy or incompetent to act as a sponsor or representative of such sponsor; (d)  Such sponsor or representative of such sponsor has violated any of the provisions of this chapter or of the rules and regulations of the commissioner; (e)  The sponsor or representative of such sponsor has misappropriated, converted, illegally withheld, or refused to pay over upon proper demand any monies entrusted to the sponsor or representative of such sponsor in its fiduciary capacity belonging to an insurer or insured; (f)  The sponsor or representative of such sponsor is found to be in an unsound condition or in such condition as to render the future transaction of business in this state hazardous to the public; or (g)  The sponsor or representative of such sponsor is found guilty of fraudulent, deceptive, unfair or dishonest practices as defined in Section 83-5-35 or 83-5-45, Mississippi Code of 1972, or has been convicted of a * * *felony disqualifying crime as provided in the Fresh Start Act. Before any license shall be refused, suspended, revoked or the renewal thereof refused hereunder, the commissioner shall give notice of his intention so to do, by certified mail, return receipt requested, to the applicant for or holder of such license and to any sponsor whom such representative represents or who desires that he be licensed, and shall set a date not less than twenty (20) days from the date of mailing such notice when the applicant or licensee and a duly authorized representative of the sponsor may appear to be heard and produce evidence.  In the conduct of such hearing, the commissioner or any regular salaried employee specially designated by him for such purposes shall have power to administer oaths, to require the appearance of and examine any person under oath, and to require the production of books, records or papers relevant to the inquiry upon his own initiative or upon the request of the applicant or licensee.  Upon the termination of such hearing, findings shall be reduced to writing and, upon approval by the commissioner, shall be filed in his office; and notice of the findings shall be sent by certified mail to the applicant or licensee and the sponsor concerned. No licensee whose license has been revoked hereunder shall be entitled to file another application for a license as a sponsor or a representative of any sponsor within one (1) year from the effective date of such revocation.  Such application, when filed, may be refused by the commissioner unless the applicant shows good cause why the revocation of his license shall not be deemed a bar to the issuance of a new license. In lieu of revoking, suspending or refusing to renew the license for any of the causes enumerated in this section, after hearing as herein provided, the commissioner may place the sponsor on probation for a period of time not to exceed one (1) year, or may fine such sponsor not more than One Thousand Dollars ($1,000.00) for each offense, or both, when in his judgment he finds that the public interest would not be harmed by the continued operation of the sponsor.  The amount of any such penalty shall be paid by such sponsor to the commissioner for the use of the state.  At any hearing provided by this section, the commissioner shall have authority to administer oaths to witnesses.  Anyone testifying falsely, after having been administered such oath, shall be subject to the penalty of perjury. Any action of the commissioner taken pursuant to the provisions of this section shall be subject to review as may be provided in Section 83-17-125. SECTION 136.  Section 97-33-57, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 97-33-57.  (1)  The commission shall investigate the qualifications of each applicant and the merits of the application, with due expedition after the filing of the application, and shall make the following determinations: (a)  That the applicant is duly qualified to hold, operate and conduct bingo games under the provisions of Sections 97-33-51 through 97-33-203 and the rules and regulations of the commission governing same. (b)  That the member or members of the organization designated in the application to hold, operate, conduct, or assist in holding, operating, or conducting, the bingo games are bona fide active members of the organization * * * and of good moral character, who have never been convicted of * * *certain offenses as designated by the commission a disqualifying crime as provided in the Fresh Start Act. (c)  That bingo games are to be held, operated and conducted in accordance with the provisions of Sections 97-33-51 through 97-33-203 and in accordance with the rules and regulations of the commission governing same, and that the proceeds thereof are to be disposed of as provided by Sections 97-33-51 through 97-33-203. (2)  If the commission is satisfied that no commission, salary, compensation, reward or recompense whatever, except as otherwise provided in Section 97-33-69, will be paid or given to any person holding, operating or conducting any bingo game, it may issue a license to the applicant for the holding, operating and conducting of bingo games. (3)  No license for holding, operating or conducting bingo games that is issued under Sections 97-33-51 through 97-33-203 shall be effective for more than three (3) calendar years. (4)  The commission shall not issue a license to: (a)  Any person who has been convicted of * * *certain related offenses as established by the commission a disqualifying crime as provided in the Fresh Start Act or who presently has such a charge pending in any state or federal court; (b)  Any person who has ever been convicted of a gambling-related offense in any state or federal court; (c)  Any person who is or has ever been a professional gambler; (d)  Any firm, organization or corporation in which any person as described in paragraphs (a) through (c) is an officer or director, whether compensated or not, or in which such person has a direct or indirect financial interest; (e)  The commission may deny an application for licensure, refuse to renew a license, or suspend or revoke a license for any reason consistent with the purposes of Sections 97-33-51 through 97-33-203 which it deems to be in the interest of the public.  However, policies regarding such denial, suspension, revocation or refusal to renew shall be established by rule and regulation.  If the commission fails to act upon the license application within sixty (60) days of the date of filing of the application by the charitable organization, such application shall be deemed accepted. (5)  Any significant change in the information submitted on its application for licensure shall be filed by a licensee with the commission within ten (10) days of the change.  A significant change shall include, but not be limited to, any change in the officers, directors, managers, proprietors or persons having a direct or indirect financial interest in any licensed organization or entity. SECTION 137.  Section 97-33-315, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 97-33-315.  (1)  The executive director shall make appropriate investigations: (a)  To determine whether there has been any violation of Sections 97-33-301 through 97-33-317 or of any regulations adopted thereunder. (b)  To determine any facts, conditions, practices or matters which it may deem necessary or proper to aid in the enforcement of any such law or regulation. (c)  To aid in adopting regulations. (d)  To secure information as a basis for recommending legislation relating to Sections 97-33-301 through 97-33-317. (e)  To determine annual compliance with Sections 97-33-301 through 97-33-317. (2)  If after any investigation the executive director is satisfied that a license should be limited, conditioned, suspended or revoked, he shall initiate a hearing by filing a complaint with the commission and transmit therewith a summary of evidence in his possession bearing on the matter and the transcript of testimony at any investigative hearing conducted by or on behalf of the executive director to the licensee. (3)  Upon receipt of the complaint of the executive director, the commission shall review all matter presented in support thereof and shall appoint a hearing examiner to conduct further proceedings. (4)  After proceedings required by Sections 97-33-301 through 97-33-317, the hearing examiner may recommend that the commission take any or all of the following actions: (a)  As to operations at a licensed gaming establishment under Section 97-33-307(5): (i)  Limit, condition, suspend or revoke the license of any licensed gaming establishment or the individual license of any licensee without affecting the license of the establishment; and (ii)  Order an operator to exclude an individual licensee from the operation of the registered business or not to pay the licensee any remuneration for services or any profits, income or accruals on his investment in the licensed gaming establishment; (b)  Limit, condition, suspend or revoke any license granted to any applicant by the commission; (c)  Fine each licensee for any act or transaction for which commission approval was required or permitted, as provided in Section 97-33-309. (5)  The hearing examiner shall prepare a written decision containing his recommendation to the commission and shall serve it on all parties.  Any party disagreeing with the hearing examiner's recommendation may ask the commission to review the recommendation within ten (10) days of service of the recommendation.  The commission may hold a hearing to consider the recommendation whether there has been a request to review the recommendation or not. (6)  If the commission decides to review the recommendation, it shall give notice of that fact to all parties within thirty (30) days of the recommendation and shall schedule a hearing to review the recommendation.  The commission's review shall be de novo but shall be based upon the evidence presented before the hearing examiner. The commission may remand the case to the hearing examiner for the presentation of additional evidence upon a showing of good cause why the evidence could not have been presented at the previous hearing. (7)  If the commission does not decide to review the recommendation within thirty (30) days, the recommendation becomes the final order of the commission. (8)  If the commission limits, conditions, suspends or revokes any license, or imposes a fine, it shall issue its written order therefor after causing to be prepared and filed the hearing examiner's written decision upon which the order is based. (9)  Any limitation, condition, revocation, suspension or fine is effective until reversed upon judicial review, except that the commission may stay its order pending a rehearing or judicial review upon such terms and conditions as it deems proper. (10)  Judicial review of an order or decision of the commission may be had to the Chancery Court of the First Judicial District of Hinds County, Mississippi, as a case in equity. (11)  A license * * *is automatically may be revoked if the individual is convicted of a * * *felony in any court of this state, another state, or the United States or if the individual is convicted of a crime in any court of another state or the United States which, if committed in this state, would be a felony disqualifying crime as provided in the Fresh Start Act. An appeal from the conviction shall not act as a supersedeas to the revocation required by this subsection. SECTION 138.  Section 17-17-503, Mississippi Code of 1972, is brought forward as follows: 17-17-503.  (1)  Every applicant for issuance, reissuance or transfer of a permit for the treatment, processing, storage or disposal of solid waste at a commercial nonhazardous solid waste management facility or hazardous waste at a commercial hazardous waste management facility shall file with the Permit Board at the time the application is filed a disclosure statement.  The disclosure statement shall be sworn to or affirmed and subscribed and dated by the applicant.  The disclosure statement shall be filed on forms supplied by the department and shall contain the following information: (a)  (i)  If the applicant is an individual, the full name, business address, date of birth and social security number of the applicant; or (ii)  If the applicant is a business concern, the full name, business address, date of establishment, and federal employer identification number of the business concern, and the full names, business addresses, dates of birth and social security numbers of any officers, directors, partners or key employees thereof and all persons or business concerns holding equity in that business concern, or if the business concern is a publicly traded corporation, an individual holding more than five percent (5%), individuals related within third degree holding a cumulative of five percent (5%) or more or business concerns holding more than five percent (5%) of the equity in that business concern, except where the equity is held by an investment company which is publicly traded or a chartered lending institution, in which case the applicant need only supply the name and business address of the investment company or lending institution; (b)  The full names, business addresses, dates of birth and social security numbers of all officers, directors or partners of any business concern disclosed in the statement and the name and addresses of all persons holding any equity in any business concern so disclosed, if the business concern is a publicly traded corporation, an individual holding more than five percent (5%), individuals related within third degree holding a cumulative of five percent (5%) or more or business concerns holding more than five percent (5%) of the equity in that business concern, except where the equity is held by an investment company which is publicly traded or a chartered lending institution, in which case the applicant need only supply the name and business address of the investment company which is publicly traded or lending institution; (c)  A listing of all persons or business concerns holding debt liability in a nonpublicly traded applicant business concern.  If the applicant business concern is publicly traded, a listing of all individuals or business concerns holding more than five percent (5%), or individuals related within the third degree holding a cumulative of five (5%) or more debt liability in the applicant business concern.  In accordance with the debt liability disclosure requirements for applicants, any business concern disclosed pursuant to paragraph (b) shall provide a listing of debt liability holders.  The listing of debt liability holders shall include for each person or business concern the full name, business address, federal employer identification number, amount of debt liability held in United States dollars and the percentage of the total debt liability held.  For the purposes of this section, individuals and business concerns disclosed pursuant to this paragraph are not subject to further disclosure requirements and shall not be considered a "disclosed business concern" unless expressly requested by the Permit Board; (d)  The full name and business address of any company which collects, transports, treats, processes, stores or disposes of solid or hazardous waste in which the applicant holds an equity interest of five percent (5%) or more; (e)  A description of the business experience and credentials, including any past or present permits or licenses for the treatment, processing, storage or disposal of solid or hazardous waste possessed by the applicant, or if the applicant is a business concern, by the key employees, officers, directors or partners thereof; (f)  A listing and explanation of any notices of violation, prosecutions, administrative orders (whether by consent or otherwise) or license or permit suspensions or revocations, or enforcement actions of any sort by any state or federal authority within the five-year period immediately preceding the filing of the application, which are pending or have concluded in a finding of violation or entry of a consent agreement regarding any allegation of civil or criminal violation of any law, regulation or requirement related to the treatment, processing, storage or disposal of solid or hazardous waste by any person required to be disclosed in the statement and an itemized list by any person required to be disclosed in the statement of all final convictions of and pleas of guilty or nolo contendere to any crime punishable as a felony in any jurisdiction within the five-year period immediately preceding the filing of the application for the issuance, reissuance or transfer of a permit; (g)  A listing of any agencies outside of Mississippi which had regulatory responsibility over the applicant in connection with its treatment, processing, storage or disposal of solid or hazardous waste; and (h)  Any other information the Permit Board may require related to the disclosure statement as described above or the evaluation of such statement as described in Section 17-17-505. (2)  The disclosure statement shall be updated as required by the Permit Board, but not more frequently than annually. (3)  The provisions of subsections (6) and (7) of Section 17-17-27 shall be applicable to information submitted by the applicant to the Permit Board under this section. (4)  (a)  The provisions of this subsection shall apply only to applicants for permits involving the storage, treatment, processing or disposal of nonhazardous solid waste only. (b)  The Commission on Environmental Quality may waive the filing of disclosure information required by this section if the information regards the holder of less than five percent (5%) of the equity of the applicant or the holder of less than five percent (5%) of the equity in any business concern which holds equity in the applicant. (c)  In order to apply for the waiver, the applicant shall file a sworn petition requesting such waiver and allege either (i) that the information cannot be ascertained after reasonable and diligent search and inquiry, setting forth in the petition the facts and circumstances alleged to constitute the reasonable and diligent search and inquiry to obtain the information or (ii) the information required is not relevant or material, setting forth in the petition the facts and circumstances in support of the irrelevancy or immateriality of the information. (d)  The commission may waive the filing of such information if the commission finds and declares such information either (i) to be unobtainable after reasonable and diligent search and inquiry or (ii) to be irrelevant or immaterial to the review of the application and (iii) unnecessary to the discharge of its responsibilities with regard to such permit as set forth by law. (e)  Any applicant, other person or interested party aggrieved by an order of the commission waiving the filing of such information may appeal the decision of the commission in the manner provided in Section 49-17-41, Mississippi Code of 1972. SECTION 139.  Section 17-17-505, Mississippi Code of 1972, is brought forward as follows: 17-17-505.  (1)  The Permit Board may refuse to issue, reissue or transfer a permit for the treatment, processing, storage or disposal of solid waste at a commercial nonhazardous solid waste management facility or hazardous waste at a commercial hazardous waste management facility if the Permit Board finds that the applicant or any person required to be listed in the disclosure statement: (a)  Has misrepresented or concealed any material fact in the disclosure statement; (b)  Has obtained a permit from the Permit Board by misrepresentation or concealment of a material fact; (c)  Has been convicted of a felony or pleaded guilty or nolo contendere to a felony involving any federal or state laws, including environmental laws, within the five-year period immediately preceding the filing of the application for the issuance, reissuance or transfer of a permit; (d)  Has habitually violated any provisions of federal or state environmental laws, rules or regulations related to the management of solid or hazardous waste within the five-year period immediately preceding the filing of the application for the issuance, reissuance or transfer of a permit; (e)  Has been adjudicated in contempt of an order of any court enforcing any state or federal environmental laws within the five-year period immediately preceding the filing of the application for the issuance, reissuance or transfer of a permit; (f)  Has been convicted of or pleaded guilty or nolo contendere to bribery or attempting to bribe a public officer or employee of the federal government, or any state or local government in the United States, in the public officer's or employee's official capacity within the five-year period immediately preceding the filing of the application for the issuance, reissuance or transfer of a permit; or (g)  Has been convicted of or pleaded guilty or nolo contendere to collusion among bidders or prospective bidders in restraint of freedom of competition by agreement to bid a fixed price within the five-year period immediately preceding the filing of the application for the issuance, reissuance or transfer of a permit. (2)  In determining whether to issue, reissue or transfer a permit for the treatment, processing, storage or disposal of solid waste at a commercial nonhazardous solid waste management facility or hazardous waste at a commercial hazardous waste management facility, the Permit Board shall consider the facts and any mitigating factors including: (a)  The relevance of the offense to the business for which a permit is sought or the nature and responsibilities of the position which a convicted individual would hold; (b)  The nature and seriousness of the offense; (c)  The circumstances under which the offense occurred; (d)  The date of the offense; (e)  The ownership and management structure in place at the time of the offense. (3)  The Permit Board shall allow the applicant to submit evidence of rehabilitation and shall consider the applicant's efforts to prevent recurrence of unlawful activity in its determination under subsection (2) of this section.  Items to be considered by the Permit Board shall include: (a)  The applicant's record and history of implementing successful corrective actions undertaken to prevent or minimize the likelihood of recurrence of the offense; (b)  Whether the offense was an isolated or repeated incident; (c)  Whether the applicant cooperated with governmental bodies during investigations or voluntarily provided information regarding any offense under consideration; (d)  The number and types of permits held by the applicant, and the experience of the applicant in conducting its business; (e)  Implementation by the applicant of formal policies, training programs, or management controls to substantially minimize or prevent the occurrence of future violations or unlawful activities; (f)  Implementation by the applicant of an environmental compliance auditing program to assess and monitor compliance with environmental laws, rules, regulations and permit conditions; and (g)  The applicant's discharge of individuals or severance of the interest of or affiliation with responsible parties, who would otherwise cause the Permit Board to deny a permit. (4)  If the Permit Board finds pursuant to this section that mitigating factors exist or that the applicant has demonstrated rehabilitation, the Permit Board may issue, reissue or transfer the permit for the treatment, processing, storage or disposal of solid waste at a commercial nonhazardous solid waste management facility or hazardous waste at a commercial hazardous waste management facility. SECTION 140.  Section 19-25-19, Mississippi Code of 1972, is brought forward as follows: 19-25-19.  Every sheriff shall have power to appoint one or more deputies to assist him in carrying out the duties of his office, every such appointment to be in writing, to remove them at pleasure, and to fix their compensation, subject to the budget for the sheriff's office approved by the county board of supervisors. Such deputies shall have authority to do all the acts and duties enjoined upon their principals.  Every deputy sheriff, except such as may be appointed to do a particular act only, before he enters on the duties of office, shall take and subscribe an oath faithfully to execute the office of deputy sheriff, according to the best of his skill and judgment.  The appointment, with the certificate of the oath, shall be filed and preserved in the office of the clerk of the board of supervisors.  All sheriffs shall be liable for the acts of their deputies, and for money collected by them.  The circuit court, after a notice and a hearing, shall have power to remove such deputies and also bailiffs, upon a showing that the public interest will be served thereby.  Each deputy sheriff shall be at least twenty-one (21) years of age, a qualified elector of the State of Mississippi, and shall not have been convicted of a felony.  Prior to appointing any person a deputy sheriff, the sheriff shall determine that the proposed appointee is of good moral character and is capable of fairly and impartially enforcing the law of the State of Mississippi. SECTION 141.  Section 25-34-43, Mississippi Code of 1972, is brought forward as follows: 25-34-43.  (1)  The Secretary of State may deny, refuse to renew, revoke, suspend or impose a condition on a commission as notary public for any act or omission that demonstrates the individual lacks the honesty, integrity, competence or reliability to act as a notary public, including: (a)  Failure to comply with this chapter; (b)  A fraudulent, dishonest or deceitful misstatement or omission in the application for a commission as a notary public submitted to the Secretary of State; (c)  A conviction of any felony, including a plea of nolo contendere, of the applicant or notary public, unless released from incarceration more than ten (10) years before the commission is to take effect or, if no incarceration is ordered, more than ten (10) years from the conviction date have passed; (d)  A conviction, including a plea of nolo contendere, of the applicant or notary public for any crime determined by the Secretary of State to be of a nature incompatible with the duties of a notary public; (e)  Failure by the notary public to discharge any duty required of a notary public, whether required by this chapter, rules of the Secretary of State or any federal or state law; (f)  Use of false or misleading advertising or representation by the notary public representing that the notary has a duty, right or privilege that the notary does not have; (g)  Violation by the notary public of a rule of the Secretary of State regarding a notary public; (h)  Denial, refusal to renew, revocation, suspension or conditioning of a notary public commission in another state; (i)  Failure of the notary public to maintain an assurance as provided in Section 25-34-41(4); or (j)  Failure to maintain and protect the notary's journal as required by this chapter and any rules promulgated by the Secretary of State under this chapter. (2)  If the Secretary of State denies, refuses to renew, revokes, suspends or imposes conditions on a commission as a notary public, the applicant or notary public is entitled to file an appeal in proper form with the Secretary of State within forty-five (45) days after the Secretary of State's action, except that an applicant may not appeal when the Secretary of State, within five (5) years preceding the application, has: (a)  Denied or revoked for disciplinary reasons any previous application, commission or license of the applicant; or (b)  Made a finding under this chapter that the grounds for revocation of the applicant's commission existed. (3)  The authority of the Secretary of State to deny, refuse to renew, suspend, revoke or impose conditions on a commission as a notary public does not prevent a person from seeking and obtaining other criminal or civil remedies provided by law. SECTION 142.  Section 27-115-69, Mississippi Code of 1972, is brought forward as follows: 27-115-69.  (1)  The corporation may purchase, lease or lease-purchase such goods or services as are necessary for effectuating the purposes of this chapter.  The corporation shall not contract with any person or entity for the total operation and administration of the lottery, but it may make procurements which integrate such functions as lottery game design, lottery ticket distribution to retailers, supply of goods and services and advertising.  In all procurement decisions, the corporation shall take into account the particularly sensitive nature of the lottery and shall act to promote and ensure security, honesty, fairness and integrity in the operation and administration of the lottery and the objectives of raising net proceeds for the benefit of the public. (2)  The corporation shall investigate the financial responsibility, security and integrity of any lottery system vendor who submits a bid, proposal or offer.  At the time of submitting such bid, proposal or offer to the corporation, the corporation shall require the following items: (a)  A disclosure of the vendor's name and address and, as applicable, the name and address of the following: (i)  If the vendor is a corporation, the officers, directors and each stockholder in such corporation; however, in the case of owners of equity securities of a publicly traded corporation, only the names and addresses of those known to the corporation to own five percent (5%) or more of such securities need be disclosed. (ii)  If the vendor is a trust, the trustee and all persons entitled to receive income or benefits from the trust. (iii)  If the vendor is an association, the members, officers and directors. (iv)  If the vendor is a partnership or joint venture, all of the general partners, limited partners, or joint venturers. (b)  A disclosure of all the states and jurisdictions in which the vendor does business, and the nature of the business for each such state or jurisdiction. (c)  A disclosure of all the states and jurisdictions in which the vendor has contracts to supply gaming goods or services, including, but not limited to, lottery goods and services, and the nature of the goods or services involved for each such state or jurisdiction. (d)  A disclosure of all the states and jurisdictions in which the vendor has applied for, has sought renewal of, has received, has been denied, has pending, or has had revoked a gaming license of any kind, or had fines or penalties assessed on their license, contract, or operation, and the disposition of such in each such state or jurisdiction.  If any lottery license or contract has been revoked or has not been renewed or any lottery license or application has remained pending for more than six (6) months, then it shall be disclosed. (e)  A disclosure of the details of any finding of a plea, conviction or adjudication for guilt, in a state or federal court, of the vendor for any felony or any other criminal offense other than a traffic violation. (f)  A disclosure of the details of any bankruptcy, insolvency, reorganization, corporate or individual purchase or takeover of another corporation, including bonded indebtedness, or any pending litigation of the vendor. (g)  Such additional disclosures and information as the corporation may determine to be appropriate for the procurement involved.  If the vendor subcontracts any substantial portion of the work to be performed under the contract to a subcontractor, the vendor shall disclose all of the information required by this subsection for the subcontractor as if the subcontractor were itself a vendor. (3)  In no case shall the corporation enter into a contract for a procurement of any video lottery or video lottery terminal or any other illegal lottery device, and shall only enter into a contract for a procurement for any lottery system with a vendor who has complied with the disclosures required by the corporation and described in subsection (2) of this section, and any contract with such a vendor is void and unenforceable.  Any contract with a vendor who does not comply with such requirements for periodically updating such disclosures during the tenure of a contract as may be specified in such contract is voidable and may be terminated by the corporation.  The provisions of this section shall be construed broadly and liberally to achieve the ends of full disclosure of all information necessary to allow for a full and complete evaluation by the corporation of the competence, integrity, background and character of vendors. (4)  (a)  A contract shall not be entered into with any vendor who has been found guilty of a felony related to the security or integrity of the lottery in this or any other jurisdiction or with any vendor who is found to be in possession of any illegal lottery device. (b)  A contract shall not be entered into with any vendor who has not first obtained a signed tax clearance from the Commissioner of Revenue indicating that the vendor is current in filing all applicable tax returns and in payment of all taxes, interest and penalties owed to the State of Mississippi, excluding items under formal appeal pursuant to applicable statutes. (5)  The corporation may require that each vendor shall, at the execution of the contract with the corporation, post a performance bond or letter of credit from a bank acceptable to the corporation, in an amount established by the corporation subject to the provisions of Section 27-115-61.  In lieu of the bond, a vendor may, to assure the faithful performance of its obligations, deposit and maintain with the corporation securities that are interest-bearing or accruing and that are rated in one (1) of the three (3) highest classifications by an established nationally recognized investment rating service.  Securities eligible under this subsection are limited to: (a)  Certificates of deposit issued by solvent banks or savings associations approved by the corporation and which are organized and existing under the laws of this state or under the laws of the United States. (b)  United States bonds, notes, and bills for which the full faith and credit of the government of the United States is pledged for the payment of principal and interest. (c)  Corporate bonds approved by the corporation.  The corporation which issued the bonds shall not be an affiliate or subsidiary of the depositor.  Such securities shall be held in trust. (6)  Every contract entered into by the corporation pursuant to this section shall contain a provision for payment of liquidated damages to the corporation for any breach of contract by the vendor. (7)  Each vendor shall be qualified to do business in this state and shall file appropriate tax returns as provided by the laws of this state.  All contracts under this section shall be governed by the laws of this state. SECTION 143.  Section 37-9-17, Mississippi Code of 1972, is brought forward as follows: 37-9-17.  (1)  On or before April 1 of each year, the principal of each school shall recommend to the superintendent of the local school district the licensed employees or noninstructional employees to be employed for the school involved except those licensed employees or noninstructional employees who have been previously employed and who have a contract valid for the ensuing scholastic year.  If such recommendations meet with the approval of the superintendent, the superintendent shall recommend the employment of such licensed employees or noninstructional employees to the local school board, and, unless good reason to the contrary exists, the board shall elect the employees so recommended. If, for any reason, the local school board shall decline to elect any employee so recommended, additional recommendations for the places to be filled shall be made by the principal to the superintendent and then by the superintendent to the local school board as provided above.  The school board of any local school district shall be authorized to designate a personnel supervisor or another principal employed by the school district to recommend to the superintendent licensed employees or noninstructional employees; however, this authorization shall be restricted to no more than two (2) positions for each employment period for each school in the local school district.  Any noninstructional employee employed upon the recommendation of a personnel supervisor or another principal employed by the local school district must have been employed by the local school district at the time the superintendent was elected or appointed to office; a noninstructional employee employed under this authorization may not be paid compensation in excess of the statewide average compensation for such noninstructional position with comparable experience, as established by the State Department of Education.  The school board of any local school district shall be authorized to designate a personnel supervisor or another principal employed by the school district to accept the recommendations of principals or their designees for licensed employees or noninstructional employees and to transmit approved recommendations to the local school board; however, this authorization shall be restricted to no more than two (2) positions for each employment period for each school in the local school district. When the licensed employees have been elected as provided in the preceding paragraph, the superintendent of the district shall enter into a contract with such persons in the manner provided in this chapter. If, at the commencement of the scholastic year, any licensed employee shall present to the superintendent a license of a higher grade than that specified in such individual's contract, such individual may, if funds are available from the total funding formula funds of the district as provided for in Sections 37-151-200 through 37-151-215, or from district funds, be paid from such funds the amount to which such higher grade license would have entitled the individual, had the license been held at the time the contract was executed. (2) Superintendents/directors of schools under the purview of the State Board of Education, the superintendent of the local school district and any private firm under contract with the local public school district to provide substitute teachers to teach during the absence of a regularly employed schoolteacher shall require, through the appropriate governmental authority, that current criminal records background checks and current child abuse registry checks are obtained, and that such criminal record information and registry checks are on file for any new hires applying for employment as a licensed or nonlicensed employee at a school and not previously employed in such school under the purview of the State Board of Education or at such local school district prior to July 1, 2000.  In order to determine the applicant's suitability for employment, the applicant shall be fingerprinted.  If no disqualifying record is identified at the state level, the fingerprints shall be forwarded by the Department of Public Safety to the Federal Bureau of Investigation for a national criminal history record check.  The fee for such fingerprinting and criminal history record check shall be paid by the applicant, not to exceed Fifty Dollars ($50.00); however, the State Board of Education, the school board of the local school district or a private firm under contract with a local school district to provide substitute teachers to teach during the temporary absence of the regularly employed schoolteacher, in its discretion, may elect to pay the fee for the fingerprinting and criminal history record check on behalf of any applicant.  Under no circumstances shall a member of the State Board of Education, superintendent/director of schools under the purview of the State Board of Education, local school district superintendent, local school board member or any individual other than the subject of the criminal history record checks disseminate information received through any such checks except insofar as required to fulfill the purposes of this section.  Any nonpublic school which is accredited or approved by the State Board of Education may avail itself of the procedures provided for herein and shall be responsible for the same fee charged in the case of local public schools of this state.  The determination whether the applicant has a disqualifying crime, as set forth in subsection (3) of this section, shall be made by the appropriate governmental authority, and the appropriate governmental authority shall notify the private firm whether a disqualifying crime exists. (3)  If such fingerprinting or criminal record checks disclose a felony conviction, guilty plea or plea of nolo contendere to a felony of possession or sale of drugs, murder, manslaughter, armed robbery, rape, sexual battery, sex offense listed in Section 45-33-23(h), child abuse, arson, grand larceny, burglary, gratification of lust or aggravated assault which has not been reversed on appeal or for which a pardon has not been granted, the new hire shall not be eligible to be employed at such school.  Any employment contract for a new hire executed by the superintendent of the local school district or any employment of a new hire by a superintendent/director of a new school under the purview of the State Board of Education or by a private firm shall be voidable if the new hire receives a disqualifying criminal record check.  However, the State Board of Education or the school board may, in its discretion, allow any applicant aggrieved by the employment decision under this section to appear before the respective board, or before a hearing officer designated for such purpose, to show mitigating circumstances which may exist and allow the new hire to be employed at the school.  The State Board of Education or local school board may grant waivers for such mitigating circumstances, which shall include, but not be limited to:  (a) age at which the crime was committed; (b) circumstances surrounding the crime; (c) length of time since the conviction and criminal history since the conviction; (d) work history; (e) current employment and character references; (f) other evidence demonstrating the ability of the person to perform the employment responsibilities competently and that the person does not pose a threat to the health or safety of the children at the school. (4)  No local school district, local school district employee, member of the State Board of Education or employee of a school under the purview of the State Board of Education shall be held liable in any employment discrimination suit in which an allegation of discrimination is made regarding an employment decision authorized under this Section 37-9-17. (5)  The provisions of this section shall be fully applicable to licensed employees of the Mississippi School of the Arts (MSA), established in Section 37-140-3. SECTION 144.  Section 37-13-89, Mississippi Code of 1972, is brought forward as follows: 37-13-89.  (1)  In each school district within the state, there shall be employed the number of school attendance officers determined by the Office of Compulsory School Attendance Enforcement to be necessary to adequately enforce the provisions of the Mississippi Compulsory School Attendance Law; however, this number shall not exceed one hundred fifty-three (153) school attendance officers at any time. From and after July 1, 1998, all school attendance officers employed pursuant to this section shall be employees of the State Department of Education.  The State Department of Education shall employ all persons employed as school attendance officers by district attorneys before July 1, 1998, and shall assign them to school attendance responsibilities in the school district in which they were employed before July 1, 1998.  The first twelve (12) months of employment for each school attendance officer shall be the probationary period of state service. (2)  (a)  The State Department of Education shall obtain current criminal records background checks and current child abuse registry checks on all persons applying for the position of school attendance officer after July 2, 2002.  The criminal records information and registry checks must be kept on file for any new hires.  In order to determine an applicant's suitability for employment as a school attendance officer, the applicant must be fingerprinted.  If no disqualifying record is identified at the state level, the Department of Public Safety shall forward the fingerprints to the Federal Bureau of Investigation (FBI) for a national criminal history record check.  The applicant shall pay the fee, not to exceed Fifty Dollars ($50.00), for the fingerprinting and criminal records background check; however, the State Department of Education, in its discretion, may pay the fee for the fingerprinting and criminal records background check on behalf of any applicant.  Under no circumstances may a member of the State Board of Education, employee of the State Department of Education or any person other than the subject of the criminal records background check disseminate information received through any such checks except insofar as required to fulfill the purposes of this subsection. (b)  If the fingerprinting or criminal records check discloses a felony conviction, guilty plea or plea of nolo contendere to a felony of possession or sale of drugs, murder, manslaughter, armed robbery, rape, sexual battery, sex offense listed in Section 45-33-23(h), child abuse, arson, grand larceny, burglary, gratification of lust or aggravated assault which has not been reversed on appeal or for which a pardon has not been granted, the applicant is not eligible to be employed as a school attendance officer.  Any employment of an applicant pending the results of the fingerprinting and criminal records check is voidable if the new hire receives a disqualifying criminal records check. However, the State Board of Education, in its discretion, may allow an applicant aggrieved by an employment decision under this subsection to appear before the board, or before a hearing officer designated for that purpose, to show mitigating circumstances that may exist and allow the new hire to be employed as a school attendance officer.  The State Board of Education may grant waivers for mitigating circumstances, which may include, but are not necessarily limited to:  (i) age at which the crime was committed; (ii) circumstances surrounding the crime; (iii) length of time since the conviction and criminal history since the conviction; (iv) work history; (v) current employment and character references; and (vi) other evidence demonstrating the ability of the person to perform the responsibilities of a school attendance officer competently and that the person does not pose a threat to the health or safety of children. (c)  A member of the State Board of Education or employee of the State Department of Education may not be held liable in any employment discrimination suit in which an allegation of discrimination is made regarding an employment decision authorized under this section. (3)  Each school attendance officer shall possess a college degree with a major in a behavioral science or a related field or shall have no less than three (3) years combined actual experience as a school teacher, school administrator, law enforcement officer possessing such degree, and/or social worker; however, these requirements shall not apply to persons employed as school attendance officers before January 1, 1987.  School attendance officers also shall satisfy any additional requirements that may be established by the State Personnel Board for the position of school attendance officer. (4)  It shall be the duty of each school attendance officer to: (a)  Cooperate with any public agency to locate and identify all compulsory-school-age children who are not attending school; (b)  Cooperate with all courts of competent jurisdiction; (c)  Investigate all cases of nonattendance and unlawful absences by compulsory-school-age children not enrolled in a nonpublic school; (d)  Provide appropriate counseling to encourage all school-age children to attend school until they have completed high school; (e)  Attempt to secure the provision of social or welfare services that may be required to enable any child to attend school; (f)  Contact the home or place of residence of a compulsory-school-age child and any other place in which the officer is likely to find any compulsory-school-age child when the child is absent from school during school hours without a valid written excuse from school officials, and when the child is found, the officer shall notify the parents and school officials as to where the child was physically located; (g)  Contact promptly the home of each compulsory-school-age child in the school district within the officer's jurisdiction who is not enrolled in school or is not in attendance at public school and is without a valid written excuse from school officials; if no valid reason is found for the nonenrollment or absence from the school, the school attendance officer shall give written notice to the parent, guardian or custodian of the requirement for the child's enrollment or attendance; (h)  Collect and maintain information concerning absenteeism, dropouts and other attendance-related problems, as may be required by law or the Office of Compulsory School Attendance Enforcement; and (i)  Perform all other duties relating to compulsory school attendance established by the State Department of Education or district school attendance supervisor, or both. (5)  While engaged in the performance of his duties, each school attendance officer shall carry on his person a badge identifying him as a school attendance officer under the Office of Compulsory School Attendance Enforcement of the State Department of Education and an identification card designed by the State Superintendent of Public Education and issued by the school attendance officer supervisor.  Neither the badge nor the identification card shall bear the name of any elected public official. (6)  The State Personnel Board shall develop a salary scale for school attendance officers as part of the variable compensation plan.  The various pay ranges of the salary scale shall be based upon factors including, but not limited to, education, professional certification and licensure, and number of years of experience. School attendance officers shall be paid in accordance with this salary scale.  The minimum salaries under the scale shall be no less than the following: (a)  For school attendance officers holding a bachelor's degree or any other attendance officer who does not hold such a degree, the annual salary shall be based on years of experience as a school attendance officer or related field of service or employment, no less than as follows: Years of Experience Salary 0 - 4 years             $24,528.29 5 - 8 years 26,485.29 9 - 12 years 28,050.89 13 - 16 years 29,616.49 Over 17 years 31,182.09 (b)  For school attendance officers holding a license as a social worker, the annual salary shall be based on years of experience as a school attendance officer or related field of service or employment, no less than as follows: Years of Experience Salary 0 - 4 years             $25,558.29 5 - 8 years 27,927.29 9 - 12 years 29,822.49 13 - 16 years 31,717.69 17 - 20 years 33,612.89 Over 21 years 35,415.39 (c)  For school attendance officers holding a master's degree in a behavioral science or a related field, the annual salary shall be based on years of experience as a school attendance officer or related field of service or employment, no less than as follows: Years of Experience Salary 0 - 4 years             $26,382.29 5 - 8 years 29,008.79 9 - 12 years 31,109.99 13 - 16 years 33,211.19 17 - 20 years 35,312.39 Over 21 years 37,413.59 (7)  (a)  Each school attendance officer employed by a district attorney on June 30, 1998, who became an employee of the State Department of Education on July 1, 1998, shall be awarded credit for personal leave and major medical leave for his continuous service as a school attendance officer under the district attorney, and if applicable, the youth or family court or a state agency.  The credit for personal leave shall be in an amount equal to one-third (1/3) of the maximum personal leave the school attendance officer could have accumulated had he been credited with such leave under Section 25-3-93 during his employment with the district attorney, and if applicable, the youth or family court or a state agency. The credit for major medical leave shall be in an amount equal to one-half (1/2) of the maximum major medical leave the school attendance officer could have accumulated had he been credited with such leave under Section 25-3-95 during his employment with the district attorney, and if applicable, the youth or family court or a state agency. However, if a district attorney who employed a school attendance officer on June 30, 1998, certifies, in writing, to the State Department of Education that the school attendance officer had accumulated, pursuant to a personal leave policy or major medical leave policy lawfully adopted by the district attorney, a number of days of unused personal leave or major medical leave, or both, which is greater than the number of days to which the school attendance officer is entitled under this paragraph, the State Department of Education shall authorize the school attendance officer to retain the actual unused personal leave or major medical leave, or both, certified by the district attorney, subject to the maximum amount of personal leave and major medical leave the school attendance officer could have accumulated had he been credited with such leave under Sections 25-3-93 and 25-3-95. (b)  For the purpose of determining the accrual rate for personal leave under Section 25-3-93 and major medical leave under Section 25-3-95, the State Department of Education shall give consideration to all continuous service rendered by a school attendance officer before July 1, 1998, in addition to the service rendered by the school attendance officer as an employee of the department. (c)  In order for a school attendance officer to be awarded credit for personal leave and major medical leave or to retain the actual unused personal leave and major medical leave accumulated by him before July 1, 1998, the district attorney who employed the school attendance officer must certify, in writing, to the State Department of Education the hire date of the school attendance officer.  For each school attendance officer employed by the youth or family court or a state agency before being designated an employee of the district attorney who has not had a break in continuous service, the hire date shall be the date that the school attendance officer was hired by the youth or family court or state agency.  The department shall prescribe the date by which the certification must be received by the department and shall provide written notice to all district attorneys of the certification requirement and the date by which the certification must be received. (8)  (a)  School attendance officers shall maintain regular office hours on a year-round basis; however, during the school term, on those days that teachers in all of the school districts served by a school attendance officer are not required to report to work, the school attendance officer also shall not be required to report to work.  (For purposes of this subsection, a school district's school term is that period of time identified as the school term in contracts entered into by the district with licensed personnel.)  A school attendance officer shall be required to report to work on any day recognized as an official state holiday if teachers in any school district served by that school attendance officer are required to report to work on that day, regardless of the school attendance officer's status as an employee of the State Department of Education, and compensatory leave may not be awarded to the school attendance officer for working during that day.  However, a school attendance officer may be allowed by the school attendance officer's supervisor to use earned leave on such days. (b)  The State Department of Education annually shall designate a period of six (6) consecutive weeks in the summer between school years during which school attendance officers shall not be required to report to work.  A school attendance officer who elects to work at any time during that period may not be awarded compensatory leave for such work and may not opt to be absent from work at any time other than during the six (6) weeks designated by the department unless the school attendance officer uses personal leave or major medical leave accrued under Section 25-3-93 or 25-3-95 for such absence. (9)  The State Department of Education shall provide all continuing education and training courses that school attendance officers are required to complete under state law or rules and regulations of the department. SECTION 145.  Section 37-27-23, Mississippi Code of 1972, is brought forward as follows: 37-27-23.  The board of trustees of each county shall be the judges of the eligibility of all applicants for admission to any agricultural high school in the county.  They shall not permit any applicant to become a student therein, when in the opinion of the said trustees the moral and mental characteristics of the applicant are such as would prove detrimental to the good morals of the institution. SECTION 146.  Section 37-29-232, Mississippi Code of 1972, is brought forward as follows: 37-29-232.  (1)  For the purposes of this section: (a)  "Health care professional/vocational technical academic program" means an academic program in medicine, nursing, dentistry, occupational therapy, physical therapy, social services, nutrition services, speech therapy, or other allied-health professional whose purpose is to prepare professionals to render patient care services. (b)  "Health care professional/vocational technical student" means a student enrolled in a health care professional/vocational technical academic program. (2)  The dean or director of the health care professional/vocational technical academic program is authorized to ensure that criminal history record checks and fingerprinting are obtained on their students before the students begin any clinical rotation in a licensed health care entity and that the criminal history record check information and registry checks are on file at the academic institution.  In order to determine the student's suitability for the clinical rotation, the student shall be fingerprinted.  If no disqualifying record is identified at the state level, the fingerprints shall be forwarded by the Department of Public Safety, the Department of Health, or any other legally authorized entity to the FBI for a national criminal history record check.  The fee for the fingerprinting and criminal history record check shall be paid by the applicant, not to exceed Fifty Dollars ($50.00); however, the academic institution in which the student is enrolled, in its discretion, may elect to pay the fee for the fingerprinting and criminal history record check on behalf of any applicant.  Under no circumstances shall the academic institution representative or any individual other than the subject of the criminal history record checks disseminate information received through any such checks except insofar as required to fulfill the purposes of this section. (3)  If the fingerprinting or criminal history record checks disclose a felony conviction, guilty plea or plea of nolo contendere to a felony of possession or sale of drugs, murder, manslaughter, armed robbery, rape, sexual battery, sex offense listed in Section 45-33-23(h), child abuse, arson, grand larceny, burglary, gratification of lust or aggravated assault, or felonious abuse and/or battery of a vulnerable adult that has not been reversed on appeal or for which a pardon has not been granted, the student shall not be eligible to be admitted to the health care professional/vocational technical academic program of study.  Any preadmission agreement executed by the health care professional/vocational technical academic program shall be voidable if the student receives a disqualifying criminal history record check.  However, the administration of the health care professional/vocational technical academic program may, in its discretion, allow any applicant aggrieved by the admissions decision under this section to appear before an appeals committee or before a hearing officer designated for that purpose, to show mitigating circumstances that may exist and allow the student to be admitted to or continue in the program of study. The health care professional/vocational technical academic program may grant waivers for those mitigating circumstances, which shall include, but not be limited to:  (a) age at which the crime was committed; (b) circumstances surrounding the crime; (c) length of time since the conviction and criminal history since the conviction; (d) work history; (e) current employment and character references; (f) other evidence demonstrating the ability of the student to perform the clinical responsibilities competently and that the student does not pose a threat to the health or safety of patients in the licensed health care entities in which they will be conducting clinical experiences.  The health care professional/vocational technical academic program shall provide assurance to the licensed health care entity in which the clinical rotation is planned that the results of a health care professional/vocational technical student's criminal history record check would not prohibit the student from being able to conduct his or her clinical activities in the facility, institution, or organization.  The criminal history record check shall be valid for the course of academic study, provided that annual disclosure statements are provided to the health care professional/vocational technical academic program regarding any criminal activity that may have occurred during the student's tenure with the health care professional/vocational technical academic program.  The criminal history record check may be repeated at the discretion of the health care professional/vocational technical academic program based on information obtained during the annual disclosure statements.  In extenuating circumstances, if a criminal history record check is initiated and the results are not available at the time the clinical rotation begins, the academic institution in which the student is enrolled, at its discretion, may require a signed affidavit from the student assuring compliance with this section.  The affidavit will be considered void within sixty (60) days of its signature. (4)  Criminal history record checks that are done as part of the requirements for participation in the health care professional/vocational technical academic program may not be used for any other purpose than those activities associated with their program of study.  Students who may be employed as health care professionals outside of their program of study may be required to obtain additional criminal history record checks as part of their employment agreement. (5)  No health care professional/vocational technical academic program or academic program employee shall be held liable in any admissions discrimination suit in which an allegation of discrimination is made regarding an admissions decision authorized under this section. SECTION 147.  Section 41-29-107, Mississippi Code of 1972, is brought forward as follows: 41-29-107.  (1)  There is created within the Mississippi Department of Public Safety an office to be known as the Mississippi Bureau of Narcotics.  The office shall have a director who shall be appointed by the Commissioner of Public Safety.  The commissioner may assign to the appropriate offices of the department such powers and duties deemed appropriate to carry out the lawful functions of the Mississippi Bureau of Narcotics. (2)  The Commissioner of Public Safety is empowered to employ or appoint necessary agents.  The commissioner may also employ such secretarial, clerical and administrative personnel, including a duly licensed attorney, as necessary for the operation of the bureau, and shall have such quarters, equipment and facilities as needed.  The salary and qualifications of the attorney authorized by this section shall be fixed by the director, but the salary shall not exceed the salary authorized for an assistant attorney general who performs similar duties. (3)  The director and agents so appointed shall be citizens of the United States and of the State of Mississippi, and of good moral character.  The agents shall be not less than twenty-one (21) years of age at the time of such appointment.  In addition thereto, those appointed shall have satisfactorily completed at least two (2) years of college studies.  However, two (2) years of satisfactory service as a law enforcement officer and the completion of the prescribed course of study at a school operated by the Bureau of Narcotics and Dangerous Drugs, United States Justice Department, shall satisfy one (1) year of such college studies, and four (4) years of satisfactory service as a law enforcement officer and the completion of the prescribed course of study at such federal bureau school as stated heretofore shall fully satisfy the two (2) years of college requirement. During the period of the first twelve (12) months after appointment, any agent of the bureau shall be subject to dismissal at the will of the director.  After twelve (12) months' service, no agent of the bureau shall be subject to dismissal or otherwise have their salary adversely affected except for cause, and any such action against an agent shall be subject to and proceed under the laws, rules and regulations of the State Personnel Board. (4)  The Commissioner of Public Safety may assign members of the Mississippi Highway Safety Patrol, regardless of age, to the bureau; however, when any highway patrolman or other employee, agent or official of the Mississippi Department of Public Safety is assigned to duty with, or is employed by, the bureau, he shall not be subject to assignment or transfer to any other office or department within the Mississippi Department of Public Safety except by the commissioner.  Any highway patrolman assigned to duty with the bureau shall retain his status as a highway patrolman, but shall be under the supervision of the director.  For purposes of seniority within the Highway Safety Patrol and for purposes of retirement under the Mississippi Highway Safety Patrol Retirement System, highway patrolmen assigned to the bureau will be credited as if performing duty with the Highway Safety Patrol.  The commissioner may assign employees of the Highway Safety Patrol to the Mississippi Bureau of Narcotics and may assign agents of the bureau to the Highway Safety Patrol; however, any employees so assigned must meet all established requirements for the duties to which they are assigned. (5)  The Commissioner of Public Safety may enter into agreements with bureaus or departments of other states or of the United States for the exchange or temporary assignment of agents for special undercover assignments and for performance of specific duties. (6)  The Commissioner of Public Safety may assign agents of the bureau to such duty and to request and accept agents from such other bureaus or departments for such duty. SECTION 148.  Section 41-137-47, Mississippi Code of 1972, is brought forward as follows: 41-137-47.  (1)  The licensing agency is authorized to investigate, either on the basis of complaints filed with it or on its own initiative through compliance visits, reviews or audits, instances of suspected violations of any nature, including, but not limited to: (a)  Performing the duties and requirements set forth for licensees within the relevant statute and regulations; (b)  The providing of false information on an application or renewal for a license, incident to a hearing, or otherwise; (c)  The conviction of a licensee of a felony; (d)  The misappropriation of funds; and (e)  The inversion or diversion of medical cannabis or medical cannabis products, or of any other matter reflecting unfavorably upon the holder of a license under the act. (2)  On the basis of information developed during such an investigation, the licensing agency may exercise any number of compliance actions including: (a)  To revoke, suspend or refuse to renew any license issued by the licensing agency; (b)  Deny an application for a license; or (c)  Reprimand, fine and/or take any other actions in relation to a license, as the licensing agency may deem proper under the circumstances. (3)  The licensing agency may deny the application of any applicant who fails to meet the qualifications for obtaining such license under this chapter or any rules and regulations under this chapter. (4)  Whenever the results of such an investigation are filed, the licensee may request an administrative hearing on the matter.  If a licensee or applicant wishes to appeal the licensing agency's decision, the licensee or applicant shall file its administrative appeal within twenty (20) days of receipt of the initial notice. If such a hearing is requested, the licensing agency shall set a day for a hearing and shall notify the licensee that on the day fixed for hearing he or she may appear so that an administrative hearing may take place.  The licensing agency shall then conduct a hearing on the record pursuant to the licensing agency's rules and regulations governing such hearings, at which time the burden shall be on the licensee or applicant to prove that the agency's decision was: (a)  Unsupported by substantial evidence; (b)  Arbitrary or capricious; (c)  Beyond the power of the administrative agency to make; or (d)  Violated some statutory or constitutional right of the aggrieved party. If the licensee or applicant fails to appeal the initial notice within the prescribed time, the decision becomes final and cannot be further appealed. (5)  In cases where violations of this chapter have been substantiated, the licensing agency may assess a monetary penalty or recoupment of costs for those reasonable costs that are expended by the licensing agency in the investigation and conduct of a proceeding for the compliance issue that is the subject matter of the hearing, including, but not limited to, the costs of process service, court reporters, expert witnesses and investigations.  The licensing agency shall determine the amount of investigative fees and costs owed by a licensee based on an itemized accounting after the investigation has been officially completed and a final determination or action has been determined.  Upon final determination or action, the licensing agency shall give to the licensee an itemized accounting of the investigative fees and costs incurred.  The licensing agency may recommend denial of, or refusal to take final action to approve the renewal of a licensee unless all investigative fees and costs have been paid in full by the licensee. (6)  The licensing agency shall provide its initial notice of suspension, revocation, fine or other sanction by personal delivery or mailing by certified mail, signature required, to the medical cannabis establishment at the address on the registration certificate. A suspension shall not be for a longer period than six (6) months.  The licensing agency shall provide its initial notice of denial by personal delivery, mailing by certified mail, signature required, or by electronic mail to the applicant at the physical or electronic address listed in its application. (7)  A medical cannabis establishment may continue to possess and cultivate cannabis as otherwise authorized to do so under its license during a suspension, but it may not dispense, transfer or sell cannabis. (8)  The MDOH shall immediately revoke the registry identification card of any cardholder who sells or otherwise transfers medical cannabis to a person or other entity, and the cardholder shall be disqualified from further participation in the medical cannabis program under this chapter. (9)  Except as otherwise provided in subsection (8) of this section, the MDOH may revoke the registry identification card of any cardholder who knowingly commits a violation of this chapter. (10)  The hearing decision of the agency on a denial, revocation, suspension or fine is a final decision of the applicable agency subject to judicial review in accordance with Section 41-137-59. (11)  No license issued by the MDOH or MDOR shall be transferred by the license holder to any other person or entity except with the written consent of the applicable licensing agency. (12)  Any ongoing investigation by a licensing agency under this section shall be considered confidential and exempt from disclosure under the Mississippi Public Records Act of 1983, Sections 25-61-1 through 25-61-17. SECTION 149.  Section 43-13-121, Mississippi Code of 1972, is brought forward as follows: 43-13-121.  (1)  The division shall administer the Medicaid program under the provisions of this article, and may do the following: (a)  Adopt and promulgate reasonable rules, regulations and standards, with approval of the Governor, and in accordance with the Administrative Procedures Law, Section 25-43-1.101 et seq.: (i)  Establishing methods and procedures as may be necessary for the proper and efficient administration of this article; (ii)  Providing Medicaid to all qualified recipients under the provisions of this article as the division may determine and within the limits of appropriated funds; (iii)  Establishing reasonable fees, charges and rates for medical services and drugs; in doing so, the division shall fix all of those fees, charges and rates at the minimum levels absolutely necessary to provide the medical assistance authorized by this article, and shall not change any of those fees, charges or rates except as may be authorized in Section 43-13-117; (iv)  Providing for fair and impartial hearings; (v)  Providing safeguards for preserving the confidentiality of records; and (vi)  For detecting and processing fraudulent practices and abuses of the program; (b)  Receive and expend state, federal and other funds in accordance with court judgments or settlements and agreements between the State of Mississippi and the federal government, the rules and regulations promulgated by the division, with the approval of the Governor, and within the limitations and restrictions of this article and within the limits of funds available for that purpose; (c)  Subject to the limits imposed by this article and subject to the provisions of subsection (8) of this section, to submit a Medicaid plan to the United States Department of Health and Human Services for approval under the provisions of the federal Social Security Act, to act for the state in making negotiations relative to the submission and approval of that plan, to make such arrangements, not inconsistent with the law, as may be required by or under federal law to obtain and retain that approval and to secure for the state the benefits of the provisions of that law. No agreements, specifically including the general plan for the operation of the Medicaid program in this state, shall be made by and between the division and the United States Department of Health and Human Services unless the Attorney General of the State of Mississippi has reviewed the agreements, specifically including the operational plan, and has certified in writing to the Governor and to the executive director of the division that the agreements, including the plan of operation, have been drawn strictly in accordance with the terms and requirements of this article; (d)  In accordance with the purposes and intent of this article and in compliance with its provisions, provide for aged persons otherwise eligible for the benefits provided under Title XVIII of the federal Social Security Act by expenditure of funds available for those purposes; (e)  To make reports to the United States Department of Health and Human Services as from time to time may be required by that federal department and to the Mississippi Legislature as provided in this section; (f)  Define and determine the scope, duration and amount of Medicaid that may be provided in accordance with this article and establish priorities therefor in conformity with this article; (g)  Cooperate and contract with other state agencies for the purpose of coordinating Medicaid provided under this article and eliminating duplication and inefficiency in the Medicaid program; (h)  Adopt and use an official seal of the division; (i)  Sue in its own name on behalf of the State of Mississippi and employ legal counsel on a contingency basis with the approval of the Attorney General; (j)  To recover any and all payments incorrectly made by the division to a recipient or provider from the recipient or provider receiving the payments.  The division shall be authorized to collect any overpayments to providers sixty (60) days after the conclusion of any administrative appeal unless the matter is appealed to a court of proper jurisdiction and bond is posted.  Any appeal filed after July 1, 2015, shall be to the Chancery Court of the First Judicial District of Hinds County, Mississippi, within sixty (60) days after the date that the division has notified the provider by certified mail sent to the proper address of the provider on file with the division and the provider has signed for the certified mail notice, or sixty (60) days after the date of the final decision if the provider does not sign for the certified mail notice.  To recover those payments, the division may use the following methods, in addition to any other methods available to the division: (i)  The division shall report to the Department of Revenue the name of any current or former Medicaid recipient who has received medical services rendered during a period of established Medicaid ineligibility and who has not reimbursed the division for the related medical service payment(s).  The Department of Revenue shall withhold from the state tax refund of the individual, and pay to the division, the amount of the payment(s) for medical services rendered to the ineligible individual that have not been reimbursed to the division for the related medical service payment(s). (ii)  The division shall report to the Department of Revenue the name of any Medicaid provider to whom payments were incorrectly made that the division has not been able to recover by other methods available to the division.  The Department of Revenue shall withhold from the state tax refund of the provider, and pay to the division, the amount of the payments that were incorrectly made to the provider that have not been recovered by other available methods; (k)  To recover any and all payments by the division fraudulently obtained by a recipient or provider. Additionally, if recovery of any payments fraudulently obtained by a recipient or provider is made in any court, then, upon motion of the Governor, the judge of the court may award twice the payments recovered as damages; (l)  Have full, complete and plenary power and authority to conduct such investigations as it may deem necessary and requisite of alleged or suspected violations or abuses of the provisions of this article or of the regulations adopted under this article, including, but not limited to, fraudulent or unlawful act or deed by applicants for Medicaid or other benefits, or payments made to any person, firm or corporation under the terms, conditions and authority of this article, to suspend or disqualify any provider of services, applicant or recipient for gross abuse, fraudulent or unlawful acts for such periods, including permanently, and under such conditions as the division deems proper and just, including the imposition of a legal rate of interest on the amount improperly or incorrectly paid.  Recipients who are found to have misused or abused Medicaid benefits may be locked into one (1) physician and/or one (1) pharmacy of the recipient's choice for a reasonable amount of time in order to educate and promote appropriate use of medical services, in accordance with federal regulations. If an administrative hearing becomes necessary, the division may, if the provider does not succeed in his or her defense, tax the costs of the administrative hearing, including the costs of the court reporter or stenographer and transcript, to the provider.  The convictions of a recipient or a provider in a state or federal court for abuse, fraudulent or unlawful acts under this chapter shall constitute an automatic disqualification of the recipient or automatic disqualification of the provider from participation under the Medicaid program. A conviction, for the purposes of this chapter, shall include a judgment entered on a plea of nolo contendere or a nonadjudicated guilty plea and shall have the same force as a judgment entered pursuant to a guilty plea or a conviction following trial.  A certified copy of the judgment of the court of competent jurisdiction of the conviction shall constitute prima facie evidence of the conviction for disqualification purposes; (m)  Establish and provide such methods of administration as may be necessary for the proper and efficient operation of the Medicaid program, fully utilizing computer equipment as may be necessary to oversee and control all current expenditures for purposes of this article, and to closely monitor and supervise all recipient payments and vendors rendering services under this article. Notwithstanding any other provision of state law, the division is authorized to enter into a ten-year contract(s) with a vendor(s) to provide services described in this paragraph (m).  Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, the division is authorized to extend its Medicaid Management Information System, including all related components and services, and Decision Support System, including all related components and services, contracts in effect on June 30, 2020, for a period not to exceed two (2) years without complying with state procurement regulations; (n)  To cooperate and contract with the federal government for the purpose of providing Medicaid to Vietnamese and Cambodian refugees, under the provisions of Public Law 94-23 and Public Law 94-24, including any amendments to those laws, only to the extent that the Medicaid assistance and the administrative cost related thereto are one hundred percent (100%) reimbursable by the federal government.  For the purposes of Section 43-13-117, persons receiving Medicaid under Public Law 94-23 and Public Law 94-24, including any amendments to those laws, shall not be considered a new group or category of recipient; and (o)  The division shall impose penalties upon Medicaid only, Title XIX participating long-term care facilities found to be in noncompliance with division and certification standards in accordance with federal and state regulations, including interest at the same rate calculated by the United States Department of Health and Human Services and/or the Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services (CMS) under federal regulations. (2)  The division also shall exercise such additional powers and perform such other duties as may be conferred upon the division by act of the Legislature. (3)  The division, and the State Department of Health as the agency for licensure of health care facilities and certification and inspection for the Medicaid and/or Medicare programs, shall contract for or otherwise provide for the consolidation of on-site inspections of health care facilities that are necessitated by the respective programs and functions of the division and the department. (4)  The division and its hearing officers shall have power to preserve and enforce order during hearings; to issue subpoenas for, to administer oaths to and to compel the attendance and testimony of witnesses, or the production of books, papers, documents and other evidence, or the taking of depositions before any designated individual competent to administer oaths; to examine witnesses; and to do all things conformable to law that may be necessary to enable them effectively to discharge the duties of their office.  In compelling the attendance and testimony of witnesses, or the production of books, papers, documents and other evidence, or the taking of depositions, as authorized by this section, the division or its hearing officers may designate an individual employed by the division or some other suitable person to execute and return that process, whose action in executing and returning that process shall be as lawful as if done by the sheriff or some other proper officer authorized to execute and return process in the county where the witness may reside.  In carrying out the investigatory powers under the provisions of this article, the executive director or other designated person or persons may examine, obtain, copy or reproduce the books, papers, documents, medical charts, prescriptions and other records relating to medical care and services furnished by the provider to a recipient or designated recipients of Medicaid services under investigation.  In the absence of the voluntary submission of the books, papers, documents, medical charts, prescriptions and other records, the  Governor, the executive director, or other designated person may issue and serve subpoenas instantly upon the provider, his or her agent, servant or employee for the production of the books, papers, documents, medical charts, prescriptions or other records during an audit or investigation of the provider.  If any provider or his or her agent, servant or employee refuses to produce the records after being duly subpoenaed, the executive director may certify those facts and institute contempt proceedings in the manner, time and place as authorized by law for administrative proceedings.  As an additional remedy, the division may recover all amounts paid to the provider covering the period of the audit or investigation, inclusive of a legal rate of interest and a reasonable attorney's fee and costs of court if suit becomes necessary. Division staff shall have immediate access to the provider's physical location, facilities, records, documents, books, and any other records relating to medical care and services rendered to recipients during regular business hours. (5)  If any person in proceedings before the division disobeys or resists any lawful order or process, or misbehaves during a hearing or so near the place thereof as to obstruct the hearing, or neglects to produce, after having been ordered to do so, any pertinent book, paper or document, or refuses to appear after having been subpoenaed, or upon appearing refuses to take the oath as a witness, or after having taken the oath refuses to be examined according to law, the executive director shall certify the facts to any court having jurisdiction in the place in which it is sitting, and the court shall thereupon, in a summary manner, hear the evidence as to the acts complained of, and if the evidence so warrants, punish that person in the same manner and to the same extent as for a contempt committed before the court, or commit that person upon the same condition as if the doing of the forbidden act had occurred with reference to the process of, or in the presence of, the court. (6)  In suspending or terminating any provider from participation in the Medicaid program, the division shall preclude the provider from submitting claims for payment, either personally or through any clinic, group, corporation or other association to the division or its fiscal agents for any services or supplies provided under the Medicaid program except for those services or supplies provided before the suspension or termination.  No clinic, group, corporation or other association that is a provider of services shall submit claims for payment to the division or its fiscal agents for any services or supplies provided by a person within that organization who has been suspended or terminated from participation in the Medicaid program except for those services or supplies provided before the suspension or termination.  When this provision is violated by a provider of services that is a clinic, group, corporation or other association, the division may suspend or terminate that organization from participation. Suspension may be applied by the division to all known affiliates of a provider, provided that each decision to include an affiliate is made on a case-by-case basis after giving due regard to all relevant facts and circumstances.  The violation, failure or inadequacy of performance may be imputed to a person with whom the provider is affiliated where that conduct was accomplished within the course of his or her official duty or was effectuated by him or her with the knowledge or approval of that person. (7)  The division may deny or revoke enrollment in the Medicaid program to a provider if any of the following are found to be applicable to the provider, his or her agent, a managing employee or any person having an ownership interest equal to five percent (5%) or greater in the provider: (a)  Failure to truthfully or fully disclose any and all information required, or the concealment of any and all information required, on a claim, a provider application or a provider agreement, or the making of a false or misleading statement to the division relative to the Medicaid program. (b)  Previous or current exclusion, suspension, termination from or the involuntary withdrawing from participation in the Medicaid program, any other state's Medicaid program, Medicare or any other public or private health or health insurance program.  If the division ascertains that a provider has been convicted of a felony under federal or state law for an offense that the division determines is detrimental to the best interest of the program or of Medicaid beneficiaries, the division may refuse to enter into an agreement with that provider, or may terminate or refuse to renew an existing agreement. (c)  Conviction under federal or state law of a criminal offense relating to the delivery of any goods, services or supplies, including the performance of management or administrative services relating to the delivery of the goods, services or supplies, under the Medicaid program, any other state's Medicaid program, Medicare or any other public or private health or health insurance program. (d)  Conviction under federal or state law of a criminal offense relating to the neglect or abuse of a patient in connection with the delivery of any goods, services or supplies. (e)  Conviction under federal or state law of a criminal offense relating to the unlawful manufacture, distribution, prescription or dispensing of a controlled substance. (f)  Conviction under federal or state law of a criminal offense relating to fraud, theft, embezzlement, breach of fiduciary responsibility or other financial misconduct. (g)  Conviction under federal or state law of a criminal offense punishable by imprisonment of a year or more that involves moral turpitude, or acts against the elderly, children or infirm. (h)  Conviction under federal or state law of a criminal offense in connection with the interference or obstruction of any investigation into any criminal offense listed in paragraphs (c) through (i) of this subsection. (i)  Sanction for a violation of federal or state laws or rules relative to the Medicaid program, any other state's Medicaid program, Medicare or any other public health care or health insurance program. (j)  Revocation of license or certification. (k)  Failure to pay recovery properly assessed or pursuant to an approved repayment schedule under the Medicaid program. (l)  Failure to meet any condition of enrollment. (8)  (a)  As used in this subsection (8), the following terms shall be defined as provided in this paragraph, except as otherwise provided in this subsection: (i) "Committees" means the Medicaid Committees of the House of Representatives and the Senate, and "committee" means either one of those committees. (ii)  "State Plan" means the agreement between the State of Mississippi and the federal government regarding the nature and scope of Mississippi's Medicaid Program. (iii)  "State Plan Amendment" means a change to the State Plan, which must be approved by the Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services (CMS) before its implementation. (b)  Whenever the Division of Medicaid proposes a State Plan Amendment, the division shall give notice to the chairmen of the committees at least thirty (30) calendar days before the proposed State Plan Amendment is filed with CMS.  The division shall furnish the chairmen with a concise summary of each proposed State Plan Amendment along with the notice, and shall furnish the chairmen with a copy of any proposed State Plan Amendment upon request.  The division also shall provide a summary and copy of any proposed State Plan Amendment to any other member of the Legislature upon request. (c)  If the chairman of either committee or both chairmen jointly object to the proposed State Plan Amendment or any part thereof, the chairman or chairmen shall notify the division and provide the reasons for their objection in writing not later than seven (7) calendar days after receipt of the notice from the division.  The chairman or chairmen may make written recommendations to the division for changes to be made to a proposed State Plan Amendment. (d)  (i)  The chairman of either committee or both chairmen jointly may hold a committee meeting to review a proposed State Plan Amendment.  If either chairman or both chairmen decide to hold a meeting, they shall notify the division of their intention in writing within seven (7) calendar days after receipt of the notice from the division, and shall set the date and time for the meeting in their notice to the division, which shall not be later than fourteen (14) calendar days after receipt of the notice from the division. (ii)  After the committee meeting, the committee or committees may object to the proposed State Plan Amendment or any part thereof.  The committee or committees shall notify the division and the reasons for their objection in writing not later than seven (7) calendar days after the meeting.  The committee or committees may make written recommendations to the division for changes to be made to a proposed State Plan Amendment. (e)  If both chairmen notify the division in writing within seven (7) calendar days after receipt of the notice from the division that they do not object to the proposed State Plan Amendment and will not be holding a meeting to review the proposed State Plan Amendment, the division may proceed to file the proposed State Plan Amendment with CMS. (f)  (i)  If there are any objections to a proposed rate change or any part thereof from either or both of the chairmen or the committees, the division may withdraw the proposed State Plan Amendment, make any of the recommended changes to the proposed State Plan Amendment, or not make any changes to the proposed State Plan Amendment. (ii)  If the division does not make any changes to the proposed State Plan Amendment, it shall notify the chairmen of that fact in writing, and may proceed to file the State Plan Amendment with CMS. (iii)  If the division makes any changes to the proposed State Plan Amendment, the division shall notify the chairmen of its actions in writing, and may proceed to file the State Plan Amendment with CMS. (g)  Nothing in this subsection (8) shall be construed as giving the chairmen or the committees any authority to veto, nullify or revise any State Plan Amendment proposed by the division.  The authority of the chairmen or the committees under this subsection shall be limited to reviewing, making objections to and making recommendations for changes to State Plan Amendments proposed by the division. (i)  If the division does not make any changes to the proposed State Plan Amendment, it shall notify the chairmen of that fact in writing, and may proceed to file the proposed State Plan Amendment with CMS. (ii)  If the division makes any changes to the proposed State Plan Amendment, the division shall notify the chairmen of the changes in writing, and may proceed to file the proposed State Plan Amendment with CMS. (h)  Nothing in this subsection (8) shall be construed as giving the chairmen of the committees any authority to veto, nullify or revise any State Plan Amendment proposed by the division.  The authority of the chairmen of the committees under this subsection shall be limited to reviewing, making objections to and making recommendations for suggested changes to State Plan Amendments proposed by the division. SECTION 150.  Section 45-1-25, Mississippi Code of 1972, is brought forward as follows: 45-1-25.  The Director of the Mississippi Forensics Laboratory which has been established by the Commissioner of Public Safety under the authority of Section 45-1-17 shall be a person who is experienced in forensics laboratory operations, knowledgeable of the criminal justice system, and who shall have the following minimum qualifications: (a)  Graduation from an accredited four-year college or university with major course work in forensic science, chemistry, biology, commercial science or physics. (b)  At least five (5) years' full-time employment in a forensics laboratory, with supervisory or administrative responsibility. (c)  Thorough knowledge of the utilization of forensics laboratory services and their relation to the investigating law enforcement officers. (d)  Thorough knowledge of techniques employed in processing of physical evidence. (e)  Membership in professional organizations promoting advancement of forensic science. (f)  Proven effectiveness as a manager and administrator. Unusual strength in one or more of the above qualifications may compensate for failure to exactly satisfy paragraph (b) of this section. The Director of the Forensics Laboratory may only be removed by the Commissioner of Public Safety upon proof of his inability to serve due to illness, administrative or managerial ineffectiveness, incompetence, malfeasance, dereliction of duty or moral turpitude. SECTION 151.  Section 49-15-21, Mississippi Code of 1972, is brought forward as follows: 49-15-21.  (1)  The executive director shall appoint the necessary enforcement officers for the administration of this chapter.  The salary of all enforcement officers employed shall be as determined by the State Personnel Board.  However, the members of the Enforcement Officers' Reserve Unit created in subsection (4) shall serve without pay, and shall not be employees of the State of Mississippi for purposes of the State Personnel System, the Workers' Compensation Law, the Public Employees' Retirement System or the State Employees Life and Health Insurance Plan. (2)  All enforcement officers shall be experienced and qualified persons thoroughly familiar with the seafood business and shall be at least twenty-one (21) years of age and be a high school graduate or its equivalent.  The enforcement officers shall diligently enforce all laws and regulations for the protection, propagation, preservation or conservation of all saltwater aquatic life of the State of Mississippi, and they are hereby constituted peace officers of the State of Mississippi, with full police power and jurisdiction to enforce all laws of the State of Mississippi, inclusive of all federal laws within the jurisdiction of the State of Mississippi and waters and resources under management of the state, and all regulations adopted and promulgated by the department. Enforcement officers may exercise such powers in any county of the State of Mississippi and on any waters of the state, and they are hereby authorized to carry firearms or other weapons, concealed or otherwise, and they shall investigate all persons, corporations and otherwise who are alleged to have violated any laws, and make affidavits, arrests and serve papers of any court of competent jurisdiction, in like manner as is provided for sheriffs and deputy sheriffs, when the same shall be in connection with the enforcement of the seafood laws of the State of Mississippi and such other laws and regulations of this state as the department may designate.  The enforcement officers may seize at any time aquatic life caught, taken or transported in a manner contrary to the laws of this state, and may confiscate and dispose of the same.  Any net or other paraphernalia used or employed in connection with a violation may be seized, and forfeiture proceedings may be instituted. Enforcement officers may draft the aid of captains, crews and boats or licensed vessels to enforce this chapter and may, without warrant, board and search vessels or vehicles.  The application for any license or permit from the department to catch, fish, take, transport or handle or process any form of aquatic life, or the taking, catching, transporting or handling or processing of any and all aquatic life in this state shall constitute acquiescence and agreement upon the part of the owners, captains and crews, employers and dealers to the provisions of this chapter and the agreement that enforcement officers may exercise the authority granted under the provisions hereof. (3)  Prior to entering into performance of their duties or delegations or as soon after appointment as possible, each enforcement officer, at the expense of the department, shall attend and complete an appropriate curriculum in the field of law enforcement at the Mississippi Law Enforcement Officers' Training Academy or other law enforcement training program approved under Section 45-6-7.  However, members of the Enforcement Officers' Reserve Unit created in subsection (4) of this section may attend the Mississippi Law Enforcement Officers' Training Academy at the expense of the department if it deems the training necessary or desirable.  No enforcement officer shall be entitled to payment of salary after the first twelve (12) months in office if he has either failed to attend the academy or has failed to comply with other qualifications or successfully complete any law enforcement qualification examinations as the director deems necessary.  The enforcement officers shall, on a periodic basis, be required to attend additional advanced courses in law enforcement in order that they will be properly improved and trained in the modern, technical advances of law enforcement. (4)  (a)  There is hereby created an Enforcement Officers' Reserve Unit, hereinafter termed "the reserve," to assist the enforcement officers in the performance of their duties under this chapter.  The reserve shall consist of volunteers who are approved by the Executive Director of the Department of Marine Resources or his designee.  The members of the reserve shall serve without pay.  Reserve officers shall be in such numbers as determined by the enforcement needs, with the maximum strength of reserve officers limited to the same number as enforcement officers. (b)  To be eligible for membership in the reserve, an applicant must be twenty-one (21) years of age, be a high school graduate or its equivalent, be in good physical condition, have a Mississippi driver's license, be in good standing with the community, be available for training and duty, not be a member of any police, auxiliary police, civil defense, or private security agency, have never been convicted of a felony, and have one (1) of the following: (i)  An honorable discharge or honorable separation certificate from one (1) of the United States military services; (ii)  Three (3) years of responsible post-high school work experience that required the ability to deal effectively with individuals and groups of persons; (iii)  Successful completion of sixty (60) semester hours at an accredited college or university; or (iv)  The qualifications as are outlined in this section for enforcement officers. Members of the immediate family of enforcement officers shall not be eligible for the reserve unless a special waiver is granted. Upon acceptance into the reserve, members shall receive a temporary appointment for one (1) year. During this year of temporary status, members must successfully complete the required training and must qualify on the same firearms course as enforcement officers. (c)  The reserve shall be under the leadership and direction of the executive director or his designee.  The training of the reserve shall be conducted by an enforcement officer.  The reserve shall meet at least once each month for the purpose of training and transacting any business as may come before it.  The executive director shall be notified in writing of all meetings of the reserve and the time and place of the meetings shall be recorded with the executive director. The executive director shall prepare a reserve officer's manual with the advice and consent of the department.  The manual shall include, but is not limited to, the following:  activities and operations, training, administration and duties.  During active service, the reserve shall be under the direction of the executive director or his designated representative.  When a reserve officer is on active duty and assigned to a specific enforcement officer, he shall be under the direct supervision of that officer.  Reserve officers serve at the discretion of the executive director and may be dismissed by him.  Reserve officers shall furnish their own uniforms and other personal equipment if the executive director does not provide such items. (d)  The executive director may require members of the Enforcement Officers' Reserve Unit to attend officer reserve training programs conducted by county or municipal agencies. (e)  The executive director may issue uniforms to such reserve officers and may authorize the issuance of any state equipment necessary for the reserve officers to adequately assist law enforcement officers.  The executive director may develop a reserve officer identification system to accomplish the issuance of such items in accordance with the State Auditor guidelines. (f)  If the executive director determines that a member of the Enforcement Officers' Reserve Unit may attend a training program as authorized under this section, it shall require that reserve officer to sign an agreement, prior to attending a training program, which shall stipulate that if the reserve officer accepts employment from any other public or private law enforcement agency within three (3) years after completion of his training program, the reserve officer or the respective hiring law enforcement agency shall reimburse the department for the total cost of his training program.  By October 1 of each year, the department shall provide the Conservation and Water Resources Committee of the Mississippi House of Representatives and the Ports and Marine Resources Committee of the Mississippi Senate a listing which contains each name and the respective cost of training each reserve officer received during the previous year. SECTION 152.  Section 57-21-7, Mississippi Code of 1972, is brought forward as follows: 57-21-7.  The chief executive officer of the laboratory shall be the State Chemist. (a)  Qualifications: The State Chemist shall be an individual who has earned the Doctor of Philosophy degree or its equivalent at a recognized university or college qualified to grant such degrees.  The major field of his or her training should be preferably in traditional or applied fields of chemistry or biochemistry, but other disciplines may be acceptable if the individual has experience qualifying him or her otherwise.  He or she should also have knowledge by training or experience of agricultural, industrial or health-related fields.  The candidate for State Chemist must be acceptable as a faculty member in a department of the university appropriate to his or her earned doctorate degree. (b)  Appointment: The State Chemist shall be appointed by the president of the university, with the advice and consent of the Senate, for a term of six (6) years; and the said State Chemist shall serve for said six-year term and until his successor shall have been appointed and qualified.  However, it is provided that the said State Chemist may be removed from office by the Board of Trustees of State Institutions of Higher Learning upon the demonstration of his inability to serve due to illness, incompetence, malfeasance in office, dereliction of duty or moral turpitude.  The Board of Trustees of State Institutions of Higher Learning shall fix the annual salary of the State Chemist, who shall be paid from the budget of the Mississippi State Chemical Laboratory or from the budget of the university, or from both, whichever is deemed desirable by the Board of Trustees of State Institutions of Higher Learning. (c)  Status: The State Chemist shall simultaneously hold an appointment as professor in a department of the university appropriate to the discipline of their doctorate degree.  He or she may be granted tenure as a faculty member in accordance with the rules current at the university upon his or her appointment.  As a state regulatory official, the duties of the State Chemist are service in nature. However, as time permits, the State Chemist may teach or direct research as part of his or her professional duties, and may serve in other administrative positions as deemed desirable with the consent and approval of the president of the university and the board of trustees.  He or she shall receive appropriate reimbursement for such services. (d)  Responsibility: The State Chemist shall be responsible to and shall report to the president of the university or a designee of the president. (e)  Duties: The State Chemist shall: 1.  Serve as the chief executive officer and director of the State Chemical Laboratory. 2.  Recommend the appointment, discharge, annual salaries, duties, and titles of administrative, technical and support personnel and staff of the laboratory to assist him or her in carrying out its authorized functions. 3.  Prepare and submit budget requests for the laboratory to the appropriate agency, subject to approval by the president of the university and the board of trustees.  The State Chemist shall present such requests before the Legislative Budget Office and legislative committees.  He or she shall prepare an annual budget for operation of the laboratory from appropriated or special funds or other income available, and shall make monthly, quarterly and other reports of such income and expenditures to the appropriate agencies as required by law. 4.  Maintain an inventory of laboratory equipment and report it appropriately to the proper agencies as required by law. 5.  Prepare annual or biennial reports and special reports as needed of laboratory activities, programs and recommendations.  Such reports shall be submitted to governmental heads and agencies as required by statutes, to the president of the university, the Board of Trustees of State Institutions of Higher Learning, and to the chief executive officer of each agency with which it cooperates. 6.  Serve on such state or national agencies, commissions, boards, organizations or committees as required by law. 7.  Conduct other business necessary and desirable for proper discharge of his or her responsibilities to the state or as may be stipulated here or elsewhere in the laws of Mississippi. SECTION 153.  Section 63-17-118, Mississippi Code of 1972, is brought forward as follows: 63-17-118.  (1)  Upon any termination, cancellation, refusal to continue, or refusal to renew any franchise or any discontinuation of any line or make of motor vehicle or parts essential to such line or make, the manufacturer or distributor shall pay reasonable compensation to the motor vehicle dealer as follows: (a)  (i)  The motor vehicle dealer's net cost for any new, unused, undamaged, unregistered, unmodified and unsold vehicle with a gross vehicle weight rating of sixteen thousand (16,000) pounds or less of the current and prior model year with less than seven hundred fifty (750) miles on the odometer that is in the motor vehicle dealer's inventory and was purchased from the manufacturer or another motor vehicle dealer of the same line or make in the ordinary course of business. (ii)  The motor vehicle dealer's net cost for any new, unused, undamaged, unregistered, unmodified and unsold vehicle with a gross vehicle weight rate of more than sixteen thousand (16,000) pounds of the current and prior model year that is in the motor vehicle dealer's inventory and was purchased from the manufacturer or another motor vehicle dealer of the same line or make in the ordinary course of business. (iii)  The manufacturer or distributor shall have no obligation to repurchase a motor vehicle if the motor vehicle has been modified to the extent that the modifications are so significant as to void the manufacturer's warranty or has been substantially altered to the prejudice of the manufacturer or distributor.  The manufacturer or distributor shall have no obligation to repurchase any parts used to modify the motor vehicle that were not produced by or for the manufacturer or distributor. (b)  The motor vehicle dealer's net cost of each new, unused and undamaged part or accessory listed in the manufacturer or distributor's current parts catalog and in the original, resalable merchandising packages.  In the case of sheet metal, a comparable substitute for the original package shall be sufficient.  New or reconditioned core parts shall be valued at their core value, listed in the original vehicle manufacturer's or distributor's current parts catalog.  If the part or accessory was purchased by the motor vehicle dealer from another authorized same line or make motor vehicle dealer in the ordinary course of business, the manufacturer shall purchase the part or accessory for the price in the current parts catalog.  The motor vehicle dealer shall maintain accurate records regarding the actual purchase price of parts that the manufacturer or distributor is required to purchase under this paragraph. (c)  In addition to the costs referenced in paragraphs (a) and (b) of this subsection, the manufacturer shall pay the motor vehicle dealer an additional five percent (5%) charge based on the total compensation due under this section for handling, packing, storing and loading of any parts subject to repurchase pursuant to this section and the manufacturer shall pay for shipping the vehicles subject to repurchase from the location of the motor vehicle dealer to the location directed by the manufacturer. (d)  The manufacturer shall pay the motor vehicle dealer the amounts specified in this subsection within ninety (90) days after the tender of the property, subject to the motor vehicle dealer providing evidence of good and clear title upon return of property to the manufacturer.  The manufacturer shall remove the property from the motor vehicle dealer's premises within one hundred eighty (180) days after the tender of the property. (2)  In the event a manufacturer or distributor cancels, refuses to continue, or refuses to renew any franchise or discontinues any line or make or parts essential to such line or make, in addition to the compensation provided in subsection (1) of this section, the manufacturer or distributor shall pay reasonable compensation to the motor vehicle dealer as follows: (a)  In the event a motor vehicle dealer leases the dealership facilities, then the manufacturer shall be liable for twelve (12) months payment of the gross rent or the remainder of the term of the lease, whichever is less.  If the dealership facilities are not leased, then the manufacturer shall be liable for the equivalent of twelve (12) months payment of gross rent based upon the fair market value of the dealership facilities.  The gross rent shall be paid only to the extent that the dealership premises are recognized in the franchise and only if they are used solely for performance in accordance with the franchise and not substantially in excess of those facilities recommended by the manufacturer or distributor.  If the facility is used for the operations of more than one (1) franchise, the gross rent compensation shall only include the prorated value of the square footage used exclusively for the terminated franchise or line or make at the time of termination.  This paragraph shall not apply to a termination, cancellation or nonrenewal due to a sale of the assets or stock of the motor vehicle dealership.  In addition to the gross rent, the manufacturer is required to pay the dealer the net cost of any upgrades or other alterations made by the motor vehicle dealer to the dealership facilities which were required in writing by the manufacturer and made by the motor vehicle dealer within two (2) years prior to the effective date of termination.  Nothing in this paragraph shall be construed to relieve a motor vehicle dealer of its obligation to mitigate damages upon termination, cancellation, or nonrenewal.  As used in this paragraph "gross rent" is the monthly rent plus the monthly cost of insurance and taxes. (b)  The manufacturer shall pay the motor vehicle dealer for the value of twelve (12) months of any outstanding amounts on any leases or the remaining amount of the lease, whichever is less, of computer hardware or software that is exclusively used to manage and report data of the terminated line or make to the manufacturer or distributor for financial reporting requirements. (c)  The manufacturer shall pay the motor vehicle dealer for the value of twelve (12) months or the remaining amount of the lease, whichever is less of any outstanding amounts on any manufacturer or distributor required equipment leases, service contracts, and sign leases. (d)  The fair market value of each undamaged sign owned by the motor vehicle dealer which bears a trademark or trade name used or claimed by the manufacturer if the sign was purchased from, or purchased at a requirement of, the manufacturer, plus the costs of installing the sign and the costs of purchasing and installing any pole upon which the sign is located.  During the first three (3) years after its purchase, the fair market value of each sign shall be the motor vehicle dealer's net costs of purchasing the sign.  Thereafter, the fair market value of the sign shall be the greater of its actual market value or its depreciated value on the books of the motor vehicle dealer. (e)  The fair market value of all tools, data processing programs and equipment and automotive service equipment owned by the motor vehicle dealer which are exclusively used for the line or make being terminated and which were required in writing and designated as equipment, tools, data processing programs and equipment, and automotive service equipment and purchased from, or purchased as a requirement of, the manufacturer if the equipment, tools, programs and equipment are in usable and good condition, except for reasonable wear and tear.  During the first three (3) years after their purchase, the fair market value of each item of equipment, tools, programs, and equipment shall be the motor vehicle dealer's net cost associated with purchasing the items. Thereafter, the fair market value of each item shall be the greater of its actual market value or its depreciated value on the books of the motor vehicle dealer. (f)  In addition to the other payments set forth in this section, if a termination, cancellation, or nonrenewal is premised upon the manufacturer discontinuing the sale in this state of a line or make that was the subject of the franchise, then the manufacturer shall also be liable to the motor vehicle dealer for an amount at least equivalent to the fair market value of the motor vehicle dealer's franchise for the discontinued line or make as of: (i)  The date immediately preceding the date the manufacturer announces the action which results in termination, cancellation, or nonrenewal; or (ii)  The day twelve (12) months prior to the date on which the notice of termination, cancellation, or nonrenewal is issued, whichever amount is higher. At the motor vehicle dealer's option, the manufacturer may avoid paying fair market value of the motor vehicle franchise to the motor vehicle dealer under this paragraph if the manufacturer, or another motor vehicle manufacturer pursuant to an agreement with the manufacturer, offers the motor vehicle dealer a replacement motor vehicle franchise with terms substantially similar to that offered to other same line or make motor vehicle dealers. (g)  The manufacturer shall pay the motor vehicle dealer the amounts specified in this subsection along with any other amounts that may be due to the motor vehicle dealer under the franchise agreement within ninety (90) days after the tender of the property, subject to the motor vehicle dealer providing evidence of good and clear title upon return of the property to the manufacturer.  The manufacturer shall remove the property within one hundred eighty (180) days after the tender of the property from the motor vehicle dealer's premises.  Unless previous arrangements have been made and agreed upon, the motor vehicle dealer is under no obligation to provide insurance for the property left after one hundred eighty (180) days. (3)  This section shall not apply to any sale, exchange, inheritance, gift or other transfer of ownership, stock, assets, management, or any other rights of the motor vehicle dealer, or to any termination for good cause, including, but not limited to, a conviction for a felony involving moral turpitude, for failure to conduct business for seven (7) consecutive business days or eight (8) business days out of any fifteen-day business period, for insolvency of the motor vehicle dealer or for loss of license to sell motor vehicles, or where there is a failure by the new motor vehicle dealer to comply with a provision of the franchise which provision is both reasonable and of a material significance to the franchise relationship provided that the dealer has been notified in writing of the failure. (4)  This section shall not apply to motor homes. SECTION 154.  Section 63-17-205, Mississippi Code of 1972, is brought forward as follows: 63-17-205.  (1)  Manufacturer or distributor termination.  (a)  A manufacturer or distributor, directly or through any authorized officer, agent or employee, may not terminate, cancel or fail to renew a manufacturer-dealer agreement without good cause.  If the manufacturer or distributor terminates, cancels or fails to renew the manufacturer-dealer agreement without good cause, the manufacturer or distributor must comply with Section 63-17-207.  If the manufacturer or distributor terminates, cancels or fails to renew the manufacturer-dealer agreement for good cause, Section 63-17-207 does not apply. (b)  The manufacturer or distributor has the burden of showing good cause for terminating, canceling or failing to renew a manufacturer-dealer agreement with a dealer.  For purposes of determining whether there is good cause for the proposed action, any of the following factors may be considered: (i)  The extent of the affected dealer's penetration in the area of sales responsibility. (ii)  The nature and extent of the dealer's investment in its business. (iii)  The adequacy of the dealer's service facilities, equipment, parts, supplies and personnel. (iv)  The effect of the proposed action on the community. (v)  The extent and quality of the dealer's service under recreational vehicle warranties. (vi)  The failure to follow agreed-upon procedures or standards related to the overall operation of the dealership. (vii)  The dealer's performance under the terms of its manufacturer-dealer agreement. (c)  Except as otherwise provided in this section, a manufacturer or distributor shall provide a dealer with at least ninety (90) days' prior written notice of termination, cancellation or nonrenewal of the manufacturer-dealer agreement if the dealer is being terminated for good cause. (i)  The notice must state all reasons for the proposed termination, cancellation or nonrenewal and must further state that if, within thirty (30) days following receipt of the notice the dealer provides to the manufacturer or distributor a written notice of intent to cure all claimed deficiencies, the dealer will then have ninety (90) days following receipt of the notice to rectify the deficiencies. If the deficiencies are rectified within ninety (90) days, the manufacturer's or distributor's notice is voided.  If the dealer fails to provide the notice of intent to cure the deficiencies in the prescribed time period, the termination, cancellation or nonrenewal takes effect thirty (30) days after the dealer's receipt of the notice unless the dealer has new and untitled inventory on hand that may be disposed of pursuant to Section 63-17-207. (ii)  The notice period may be reduced to thirty (30) days if the manufacturer's or distributor's grounds for termination, cancellation or nonrenewal are due to any of the following good cause factors: 1.  A dealer or one (1) of its owners being convicted of, or entering a plea of nolo contendere to, a felony; 2.  The abandonment or closing of the business operations of the dealer for ten (10) consecutive business days without contacting the manufacturer prior to the closing unless the closing is due to an act of God, strike, labor difficulty, or other cause over which the dealer has no control; 3.  A significant misrepresentation by the dealer materially affecting the business relationship; 4.  A suspension or revocation of the dealer's license, or refusal to renew the dealer's license; 5.  A material violation of Sections 63-17-201 through 63-17-221 which is not cured within thirty (30) days after the written notice by the manufacturer; or 6.  A declaration by the dealer of bankruptcy, insolvency or the occurrence of an assignment for the benefit of creditors or bankruptcy. (d)  The notice provisions of this subsection (1) do not apply if the reason for termination, cancellation or nonrenewal is the dealer's insolvency, the occurrence of an assignment for the benefit of creditors, or bankruptcy. (2)  Dealer termination. (a)  A dealer may terminate or cancel its manufacturer-dealer agreement with a manufacturer or distributor with or without good cause by giving thirty (30) days' written notice.  If the termination or cancellation is for good cause, the notice must state all reasons for the proposed termination or cancellation and must further state that if, within thirty (30) days following receipt of the notice, the manufacturer or distributor provides to the dealer a written notice of intent to cure all claimed deficiencies, the manufacturer or distributor will then have ninety (90) days following receipt of the original notice to rectify the deficiencies.  If the deficiencies are rectified within ninety (90) days, the dealer's notice is voided.  If the manufacturer or distributor fails to provide the notice of intent to cure the deficiencies in the time period prescribed in the original notice of termination or cancellation, the pending termination or cancellation shall take effect thirty (30) days after the manufacturer's or distributor's receipt of the original notice. (b)  If the dealer terminates, cancels or fails to renew the manufacturer-dealer agreement without good cause, the terms of Section 63-17-207 do not apply.  If the dealer terminates, cancels or fails to renew the manufacturer-dealer agreement with good cause, Section 63-17-207 applies.  The dealer has the burden of showing good cause.  Any of the following items shall be deemed "good cause" for the proposed termination, cancellation or nonrenewal action by a dealer: (i)  A manufacturer being convicted of, or entering a plea of nolo contendere to, a felony. (ii)  The business operations of the manufacturer have been abandoned or closed for ten (10) consecutive business days without contacting the dealer prior to the closing unless the closing is due to an act of God, strike, labor difficulty, or other cause over which the manufacturer has no control. (iii)  A significant misrepresentation by the manufacturer materially affecting the business relationship. (iv)  A material violation of Sections 63-17-201 through 63-17-221 that is not cured within thirty (30) days after written notice by the dealer. (v)  A declaration by the manufacturer of bankruptcy, insolvency, or the occurrence of an assignment for the benefit of creditors or bankruptcy. SECTION 155.  Section 63-17-209, Mississippi Code of 1972, is brought forward as follows: 63-17-209.  (1)  If a dealer desires to make a change in ownership by the sale of the business assets, stock transfer, or otherwise, the dealer shall give the manufacturer or distributor written notice at least fifteen (15) business days before the closing, including all supporting documentation as may be reasonably required by the manufacturer or distributor to determine if an objection to the sale may be made.  In the absence of a breach by the selling dealer of its dealer agreement or this chapter, the manufacturer or distributor shall not object to the proposed change in ownership unless the prospective transferee: (a)  Has previously been terminated by the manufacturer for breach of its dealer agreement; (b)  Has been convicted of a felony or any crime of fraud, deceit, or moral turpitude; (c)  Lacks any license required by law; (d)  Does not have an active line of credit sufficient to purchase a manufacturer's product; or (e)  Has undergone in the last ten (10) years bankruptcy, insolvency, a general assignment for the benefit of creditors, or the appointment of a receiver, trustee or conservator to take possession of the transferee's business or property.  This paragraph (e) can be waived if the prospective transferee meets all of the requirements of this section and if the prospective transferee fully qualifies under the manufacturer's or lender's financial criteria. (2)  If the manufacturer or distributor objects to a proposed change of ownership, the manufacturer or distributor shall give written notice of its reasons to the dealer within ten (10) business days after receipt of the dealer's notification and complete documentation.  The manufacturer or distributor has the burden of proof with regard to its objection.  If the manufacturer or distributor does not give timely notice of its objection, the change or sale shall be deemed approved. (3)  It is unlawful for a manufacturer or distributor to fail to provide a dealer an opportunity to designate, in writing, a family member as a successor to the dealership in the event of the death, incapacity or retirement of the dealer.  It is unlawful to prevent or refuse to honor the succession to a dealership by a family member of the deceased, incapacitated or retired dealer unless the manufacturer or distributor has provided to the dealer written notice of its objections within ten (10) business days after receipt of the dealer's modification of the dealer's succession plan.  In the absence of a breach of the dealer agreement, the manufacturer may object to the succession for the following reasons only: (a)  Conviction of the successor of a felony or any crime of fraud, deceit or moral turpitude; (b)  Bankruptcy or insolvency of the successor during the past ten (10) years.  This paragraph (b) can be waived if the prospective successor meets all the requirements of this section and if the prospective successor fully qualifies under the manufacturer's or lender's financial criteria; (c)  Prior termination by the manufacturer of the successor for breach of a dealer agreement; (d)  The lack of an active line of credit for the successor sufficient to purchase the manufacturer's product; or (e)  The lack of any license for the successor required by law. (4)  The manufacturer or distributor has the burden of proof regarding its objection.  However, a family member may not succeed to a dealership if the succession involves, without the manufacturer's or distributor's consent, a relocation of the business or an alteration of the terms and conditions of the manufacturer-dealer agreement. SECTION 156.  Section 67-7-11, Mississippi Code of 1972, is brought forward as follows: 67-7-11.  (1)  Except as otherwise provided for in this chapter, a supplier shall not amend or modify an agreement; cause a wholesaler to resign from an agreement; or cancel, terminate, fail to renew or refuse to continue under an agreement, unless the supplier has complied with all of the following: (a)  Has satisfied the applicable notice requirements of this section. (b)  Has acted in good faith. (c)  Has good cause for the amendment, modification, cancellation, termination, nonrenewal, discontinuance or forced resignation. (2)  In any action challenging such amendment, modification, termination, cancellation, nonrenewal or discontinuance, the supplier shall have the burden of proving that it has acted in good faith, that the notice requirements under this section have been complied with, and that there was good cause for the amendment, modification, termination, cancellation, nonrenewal or discontinuance. (3)  Except as otherwise provided in this section, and in addition to the time limits set forth in subsection (4)(d) of this section, the supplier shall furnish written notice of the amendment, modification, termination, cancellation, nonrenewal or discontinuance of an agreement to the wholesaler not less than thirty (30) days before the effective date of the amendment, modification, termination, cancellation, nonrenewal or discontinuance.  The notice shall be by certified mail and shall contain all of the following: (a)  A statement of intention to amend, modify, terminate, cancel, nonrenew or discontinue the agreement. (b)  A statement of the reason for the amendment, modification, termination, cancellation, nonrenewal or discontinuance. (c)  The date on which the amendment, modification, termination, cancellation, nonrenewal or discontinuance takes effect. (4)  Good cause shall exist for the purposes of a termination, cancellation, nonrenewal or discontinuance under subsection (1)(c) of this section when all of the following occur: (a)  There is a failure by the wholesaler to comply with a provision of the agreement which is both reasonable and of material significance to the business relationship between the wholesaler and the supplier. (b)  The supplier first acquired knowledge of the failure described in subparagraph (a) not more than twenty-four (24) months before the date notification was given pursuant to subsection (3) of this section. (c)  The wholesaler was given notice by the supplier of failure to comply with this agreement. (d)  The wholesaler has been afforded thirty (30) days in which to submit a plan of corrective action to comply with the agreement and an additional ninety (90) days to cure such noncompliance in accordance with the plan. (5)  Notwithstanding subsections (1) and (3) of this section, a supplier may terminate, cancel, fail to renew or discontinue an agreement immediately upon written notice given in the manner and containing the information required by subsection (3)(a), (b) and (c) of this section if any of the following occur: (a)  Insolvency of the wholesaler, the filing of any petition by or against the wholesaler under any bankruptcy or receivership law or the assignment for the benefit of creditors or dissolution or liquidation of the wholesaler which materially affects the wholesaler's ability to remain in business. (b)  Revocation or suspension of the wholesaler's state or federal license by the appropriate regulatory agency whereby the wholesaler cannot service the wholesaler's sales territory for more than thirty-one (31) days. (c)  The wholesaler, or a partner or an individual who owns ten percent (10%) or more of the partnership or stock of a corporate wholesaler, has been convicted of a felony under the United States Code or the laws of any state which reasonably may adversely affect the good will or interest of the wholesaler or supplier. However, an existing stockholder or stockholders, or partner or partners, or a designated member or members, shall have, subject to the provisions of this chapter, the right to purchase the partnership interest or the stock of the offending partner or stockholder prior to the conviction of the offending partner or stockholder, and if the sale is completed prior to conviction the provisions of this subparagraph shall not apply. (d)  There was fraudulent conduct relating to a material matter on the part of the wholesaler in dealings with the supplier or its product, except that the supplier shall have the burden of proving fraudulent conduct relating to a material matter on the part of the wholesaler in any legal action challenging such termination. (e)  The wholesaler failed to confine to the designated sales territory its sales of a brand or brands to retailers except that this subsection does not apply if there is a dispute between two (2) or more wholesalers as to the boundaries of the assigned territory, and the boundaries cannot be determined by a reading of the description contained in the agreements between the supplier and the wholesalers. (f)  A wholesaler has failed to pay for light wine, light spirit product or beer ordered and delivered in accordance with established terms and the wholesaler fails to make full payment within five (5) business days after receipt of written notice of the delinquency and demand for immediate payment from the supplier. (g)  A wholesaler intentionally has made a transfer of wholesaler's business, other than a transfer to a designated member without prior written notice to the supplier. (h)  A wholesaler intentionally has made a transfer of wholesaler's business, other than a transfer to a designated member, although the wholesaler has prior to said transfer received from supplier a timely notice of disapproval of said transfer in accordance with this chapter. (i)  The wholesaler intentionally ceases to carry on business with respect to any of supplier's brand or brands previously serviced by wholesaler in its territory designated by the supplier, unless such cessation is due to force majeure or to labor dispute and the wholesaler has made good faith efforts to overcome such events.  Provided, however, this shall affect only that brand or brands with respect to which the wholesaler ceased to carry on business. (6)  Notwithstanding subsections (1), (3) and (5) of this section, a supplier may terminate, cancel, not renew or discontinue an agreement upon not less than thirty (30) days prior written notice if the supplier discontinues production or discontinues distribution in this state of all the brands sold by the supplier to the wholesaler, except that nothing in this section shall prohibit a supplier from:  (a) upon not less than thirty (30) days notice, discontinuing the distribution of any particular brand or package of light wine, light spirit product or beer; or (b) conducting test marketing of a new brand of light wine, light spirit product or beer which is not currently being sold in this state, except that the supplier has notified the department in writing of its plans to test market, which notice shall describe the market area in which the test shall be conducted; the name or names of the wholesaler or wholesalers who will be selling the light wine, light spirit product or beer; the name or names of the brand of light wine, light spirit product or beer being tested; and the period of time, not to exceed eighteen (18) months, during which the testing will take place. SECTION 157.  Section 67-7-13, Mississippi Code of 1972, is brought forward as follows: 67-7-13.  (1)  Upon written notice of intent to transfer the wholesaler's business, any individual owning or deceased individual who owned an interest in a wholesaler may transfer the wholesaler's business to a designated member, or to any other person who meets the nondiscriminatory material and reasonable qualifications and standards required by the supplier for similarly situated wholesalers.  The consent or approval of the supplier shall not be required of any transfer of the wholesaler's business, including the assignment of the wholesaler's rights under the agreement, to a designated member or shall not be withheld or unreasonably delayed to a proposed transferee who meets such nondiscriminatory, material and reasonable qualifications and standards.  Such designated member or transferee shall in no event be qualified as a transferee, without the written approval or consent of the supplier, where such proposed transferee shall have been involved in the following: (a)  Insolvency, filing of any voluntary or involuntary petition under any bankruptcy or receivership law, or execution of any assignment for the benefit of creditors; or (b)  Revocation or suspension of a special occupational tax license by the regulatory agency of the United States government or any state, whereby service was interrupted for more than thirty-one (31) days; or (c)  Conviction of the proposed transferee or any owner thereof of a felony under the United States Code or the laws of any state which reasonably may adversely affect the good will or interest of the wholesaler or supplier; or (d)  Had an agreement involuntarily terminated, cancelled, not renewed or discontinued by a supplier for good cause. (2)  The supplier shall not interfere with, prevent or unreasonably delay the transfer of the wholesaler's business, including an assignment of wholesaler's rights under the agreement, if the proposed transferee is a designated member, or if the transferee other than a designated member meets such nondiscriminatory, material and reasonable qualifications and standards required by the supplier for similarly situated wholesalers.  Where the transferee is other than a designated member, the supplier may in good faith and for good cause related to the reasonable qualifications refuse to accept the transfer of the wholesaler's business or the assignment of the wholesaler's rights under the agreement. SECTION 158.  Section 73-15-201, Mississippi Code of 1972, is brought forward as follows: 73-15-201.  The Nurse Licensure Compact is enacted into law and entered into by this state with any and all states legally joining in the compact in accordance with its term, in the form substantially as follows: ARTICLE I. Findings and declaration of purpose. (a) The party states find that: 1. The health and safety of the public are affected by the degree of compliance with and the effectiveness of enforcement activities related to state nurse licensure laws; 2. Violations of nurse licensure and other laws regulating the practice of nursing may result in injury or harm to the public; 3. The expanded mobility of nurses and the use of advanced communication technologies as part of our nation's health care delivery system require greater coordination and cooperation among states in the areas of nurse licensure and regulation; 4. New practice modalities and technology make compliance with individual state nurse licensure laws difficult and complex; 5. The current system of duplicative licensure for nurses practicing in multiple states is cumbersome and redundant for both nurses and states; and 6. Uniformity of nurse licensure requirements throughout the states promotes public safety and public health benefits. (b) The general purposes of this compact are to: 1. Facilitate the states' responsibility to protect the public's health and safety; 2. Ensure and encourage the cooperation of party states in the areas of nurse licensure and regulation; 3. Facilitate the exchange of information between party states in the areas of nurse regulation, investigation and adverse actions; 4. Promote compliance with the laws governing the practice of nursing in each jurisdiction; 5. Invest all party states with the authority to hold a nurse accountable for meeting all state practice laws in the state in which the patient is located at the time care is rendered through the mutual recognition of party state licenses; 6. Decrease redundancies in the consideration and issuance of nurse licenses; and 7. Provide opportunities for interstate practice by nurses who meet uniform licensure requirements. ARTICLE II. Definitions. As used in this compact: (a) "Adverse action" means any administrative, civil, equitable or criminal action permitted by a state's laws which is imposed by a licensing board or other authority against a nurse, including actions against an individual's license or multistate licensure privilege such as revocation, suspension, probation, monitoring of the licensee, limitation on the licensee's practice, or any other encumbrance on licensure affecting a nurse's authorization to practice, including issuance of a cease and desist action. (b) "Alternative program" means a nondisciplinary monitoring program approved by a licensing board. (c) "Coordinated licensure information system" means an integrated process for collecting, storing and sharing information on nurse licensure and enforcement activities related to nurse licensure laws that is administered by a nonprofit organization composed of and controlled by licensing boards. (d) "Current significant investigative information" means: 1. Investigative information that a licensing board, after a preliminary inquiry that includes notification and an opportunity for the nurse to respond, if required by state law, has reason to believe is not groundless and, if proved true, would indicate more than a minor infraction; or 2. Investigative information that indicates that the nurse represents an immediate threat to public health and safety regardless of whether the nurse has been notified and had an opportunity to respond. (e) "Encumbrance" means a revocation or suspension of, or any limitation on, the full and unrestricted practice of nursing imposed by a licensing board. (f) "Home state" means the party state which is the nurse's primary state of residence. (g) "Licensing board" means a party state's regulatory body responsible for issuing nurse licenses. (h) "Multistate license" means a license to practice as a registered or a licensed practical/vocational nurse (LPN/VN) issued by a home state licensing board that authorizes the licensed nurse to practice in all party states under a multistate licensure privilege. (i) "Multistate licensure privilege" means a legal authorization associated with a multistate license permitting the practice of nursing as either a registered nurse (RN) or LPN/VN in a remote state. (j) "Nurse" means RN or LPN/VN, as those terms are defined by each party state's practice laws. (k) "Party state" means any state that has adopted this compact. (l) "Remote state" means a party state, other than the home state. (m) "Single-state license" means a nurse license issued by a party state that authorizes practice only within the issuing state and does not include a multistate licensure privilege to practice in any other party state. (n) "State" means a state, territory or possession of the United States and the District of Columbia. (o) "State practice laws" means a party state's laws, rules and regulations that govern the practice of nursing, define the scope of nursing practice, and create the methods and grounds for imposing discipline. "State practice laws" do not include requirements necessary to obtain and retain a license, except for qualifications or requirements of the home state. ARTICLE III. General provisions and jurisdiction. (a) A multistate license to practice registered or licensed practical/vocational nursing issued by a home state to a resident in that state will be recognized by each party state as authorizing a nurse to practice as a registered nurse (RN) or as a licensed practical/vocational nurse (LPN/VN), under a multistate licensure privilege, in each party state. (b) A state must implement procedures for considering the criminal history records of applicants for initial multistate license or licensure by endorsement.  Such procedures shall include the submission of fingerprints or other biometric-based information by applicants for the purpose of obtaining an applicant's criminal history record information from the Federal Bureau of Investigation and the agency responsible for retaining that state's criminal records. (c) Each party state shall require the following for an applicant to obtain or retain a multistate license in the home state: 1. Meets the home state's qualifications for licensure or renewal of licensure, as well as, all other applicable state laws; 2. (i)  Has graduated or is eligible to graduate from a licensing board-approved RN or LPN/VN prelicensure education program; or (ii) Has graduated from a foreign RN or LPN/VN prelicensure education program that (a) has been approved by the authorized accrediting body in the applicable country and (b) has been verified by an independent credentials review agency to be comparable to a licensing board-approved prelicensure education program; 3. Has, if a graduate of a foreign prelicensure education program not taught in English or if English is not the individual's native language, successfully passed an English proficiency examination that includes the components of reading, speaking, writing and listening; 4. Has successfully passed a National Council Licensure Examination-Registered Nurse (NCLEX-RN®) or National Council Licensure Examination-Practical Nurse (NCLEX-PN®) Examination or recognized predecessor, as applicable; 5. Is eligible for or holds an active, unencumbered license; 6. Has submitted, in connection with an application for initial licensure or licensure by endorsement, fingerprints or other biometric data for the purpose of obtaining criminal history record information from the Federal Bureau of Investigation and the agency responsible for retaining that state's criminal records; 7. Has not been convicted or found guilty, or has entered into an agreed disposition, of a felony offense under applicable state or federal criminal law; 8. Has not been convicted or found guilty, or has entered into an agreed disposition, of a misdemeanor offense related to the practice of nursing as determined on a case-by-case basis; 9. Is not currently enrolled in an alternative program; 10. Is subject to self-disclosure requirements regarding current participation in an alternative program; and 11. Has a valid United States social security number. (d) All party states shall be authorized, in accordance with existing state due process law, to take adverse action against a nurse's multistate licensure privilege such as revocation, suspension, probation or any other action that affects a nurse's authorization to practice under a multistate licensure privilege, including cease and desist actions.  If a party state takes such action, it shall promptly notify the administrator of the coordinated licensure information system.  The administrator of the coordinated licensure information system shall promptly notify the home state of any such actions by remote states. (e) A nurse practicing in a party state must comply with the state practice laws of the state in which the client is located at the time service is provided.  The practice of nursing is not limited to patient care, but shall include all nursing practice as defined by the state practice laws of the party state in which the client is located.  The practice of nursing in a party state under a multistate licensure privilege will subject a nurse to the jurisdiction of the licensing board, the courts and the laws of the party state in which the client is located at the time service is provided. (f) Individuals not residing in a party state shall continue to be able to apply for a party state's single-state license as provided under the laws of each party state.  However, the single-state license granted to these individuals will not be recognized as granting the privilege to practice nursing in any other party state.  Nothing in this compact shall affect the requirements established by a party state for the issuance of a single-state license. (g) Any nurse holding a home state multistate license, on the effective date of this compact, may retain and renew the multistate license issued by the nurse's then-current home state, provided that: 1. A nurse, who changes primary state of residence after this compact's effective date, must meet all applicable Article III(c) requirements to obtain a multistate license from a new home state. 2. A nurse who fails to satisfy the multistate licensure requirements in subsection (c) of this article due to a disqualifying event occurring after this compact's effective date shall be ineligible to retain or renew a multistate license, and the nurse's multistate license shall be revoked or deactivated in accordance with applicable rules adopted by the Interstate Commission of Nurse Licensure Compact Administrators ("commission"). ARTICLE IV. Applications for licensure in a party state. (a) Upon application for a multistate license, the licensing board in the issuing party state shall ascertain, through the coordinated licensure information system, whether the applicant has ever held, or is the holder of, a license issued by any other state, whether there are any encumbrances on any license or multistate licensure privilege held by the applicant, whether any adverse action has been taken against any license or multistate licensure privilege held by the applicant and whether the applicant is currently participating in an alternative program. (b) A nurse may hold a multistate license, issued by the home state, in only one (1) party state at a time. (c) If a nurse changes primary state of residence by moving between two (2) party states, the nurse must apply for licensure in the new home state, and the multistate license issued by the prior home state will be deactivated in accordance with applicable rules adopted by the commission. 1. The nurse may apply for licensure in advance of a change in primary state of residence. 2. A multistate license shall not be issued by the new home state until the nurse provides satisfactory evidence of a change in primary state of residence to the new home state and satisfies all applicable requirements to obtain a multistate license from the new home state. (d) If a nurse changes primary state of residence by moving from a party state to a nonparty state, the multistate license issued by the prior home state will convert to a single-state license, valid only in the former home state. ARTICLE V. Additional authorities invested in party state licensing boards. (a) In addition to the other powers conferred by state law, a licensing board shall have the authority to: 1. Take adverse action against a nurse's multistate licensure privilege to practice within that party state. (i) Only the home state shall have the power to take adverse action against a nurse's license issued by the home state. (ii) For purposes of taking adverse action, the home state licensing board shall give the same priority and effect to reported conduct received from a remote state as it would if such conduct had occurred within the home state. In so doing, the home state shall apply its own state laws to determine appropriate action. 2. Issue cease and desist orders or impose an encumbrance on a nurse's authority to practice within that party state. 3. Complete any pending investigations of a nurse who changes primary state of residence during the course of such investigations.  The licensing board shall also have the authority to take appropriate action(s) and shall promptly report the conclusions of such investigations to the administrator of the coordinated licensure information system.  The administrator of the coordinated licensure information system shall promptly notify the new home state of any such actions. 4. Issue subpoenas for both hearings and investigations that require the attendance and testimony of witnesses, as well as, the production of evidence. Subpoenas issued by a licensing board in a party state for the attendance and testimony of witnesses or the production of evidence from another party state shall be enforced in the latter state by any court of competent jurisdiction, according to the practice and procedure of that court applicable to subpoenas issued in proceedings pending before it.  The issuing authority shall pay any witness fees, travel expenses, mileage and other fees required by the service statutes of the state in which the witnesses or evidence are located. 5. Obtain and submit, for each nurse licensure applicant, fingerprint or other biometric-based information to the Federal Bureau of Investigation for criminal background checks, receive the results of the Federal Bureau of Investigation record search on criminal background checks and use the results in making licensure decisions. 6. If otherwise permitted by state law, recover from the affected nurse the costs of investigations and disposition of cases resulting from any adverse action taken against that nurse. 7. Take adverse action based on the factual findings of the remote state, provided that the licensing board follows its own procedures for taking such adverse action. (b) If adverse action is taken by the home state against a nurse's multistate license, the nurse's multistate licensure privilege to practice in all other party states shall be deactivated until all encumbrances have been removed from the multistate license.  All home state disciplinary orders that impose adverse action against a nurse's multistate license shall include a statement that the nurse's multistate licensure privilege is deactivated in all party states during the pendency of the order. (c) Nothing in this compact shall override a party state's decision that participation in an alternative program may be used in lieu of adverse action. The home state licensing board shall deactivate the multistate licensure privilege under the multistate license of any nurse for the duration of the nurse's participation in an alternative program. ARTICLE VI. Coordinated licensure information system and exchange of information. (a) All party states shall participate in a coordinated licensure information system of all licensed registered nurses (RNs) and licensed practical/vocational nurses (LPNs/VNs).  This system will include information on the licensure and disciplinary history of each nurse, as submitted by party states, to assist in the coordination of nurse licensure and enforcement efforts. (b) The commission, in consultation with the administrator of the coordinated licensure information system, shall formulate necessary and proper procedures for the identification, collection and exchange of information under this compact. (c) All licensing boards shall promptly report to the coordinated licensure information system any adverse action, any current significant investigative information, denials of applications (with the reasons for such denials) and nurse participation in alternative programs known to the licensing board regardless of whether such participation is deemed nonpublic or confidential under state law. (d) Current significant investigative information and participation in nonpublic or confidential alternative programs shall be transmitted through the coordinated licensure information system only to party state licensing boards. (e) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, all party state licensing boards contributing information to the coordinated licensure information system may designate information that may not be shared with nonparty states or disclosed to other entities or individuals without the express permission of the contributing state. (f) Any personally identifiable information obtained from the coordinated licensure information system by a party state licensing board shall not be shared with nonparty states or disclosed to other entities or individuals except to the extent permitted by the laws of the party state contributing the information. (g) Any information contributed to the coordinated licensure information system that is subsequently required to be expunged by the laws of the party state contributing that information shall also be expunged from the coordinated licensure information system. (h) The compact administrator of each party state shall furnish a uniform data set to the compact administrator of each other party state, which shall include, at a minimum: 1. Identifying information; 2. Licensure data; 3. Information related to alternative program participation; and 4. Other information that may facilitate the administration of this compact, as determined by commission rules. (i) The compact administrator of a party state shall provide all investigative documents and information requested by another party state. ARTICLE VII. Establishment of the Interstate Commission of Nurse Licensure Compact administrators. (a) The party states hereby create and establish a joint public entity known as the Interstate Commission of Nurse Licensure Compact Administrators. 1. The commission is an instrumentality of the party states. 2. Venue is proper, and judicial proceedings by or against the commission shall be brought solely and exclusively, in a court of competent jurisdiction where the principal office of the commission is located.  The commission may waive venue and jurisdictional defenses to the extent it adopts or consents to participate in alternative dispute resolution proceedings. 3. Nothing in this compact shall be construed to be a waiver of sovereign immunity. (b) Membership, voting and meetings. 1. Each party state shall have and be limited to one (1) administrator.  The head of the state licensing board or designee shall be the administrator of this compact for each party state.  Any administrator may be removed or suspended from office as provided by the law of the state from which the administrator is appointed.  Any vacancy occurring in the commission shall be filled in accordance with the laws of the party state in which the vacancy exists. 2. Each administrator shall be entitled to one (1) vote with regard to the promulgation of rules and creation of bylaws and shall otherwise have an opportunity to participate in the business and affairs of the commission.  An administrator shall vote in person or by such other means as provided in the bylaws.  The bylaws may provide for an administrator's participation in meetings by telephone or other means of communication. 3. The commission shall meet at least once during each calendar year. Additional meetings shall be held as set forth in the bylaws or rules of the commission. 4. All meetings shall be open to the public, and public notice of meetings shall be given in the same manner as required under the rulemaking provisions in Article VIII. 5. The commission may convene in a closed, nonpublic meeting if the commission must discuss: (i) Noncompliance of a party state with its obligations under this compact; (ii) The employment, compensation, discipline or other personnel matters, practices or procedures related to specific employees or other matters related to the commission's internal personnel practices and procedures; (iii) Current, threatened or reasonably anticipated litigation; (iv) Negotiation of contracts for the purchase or sale of goods, services or real estate; (v) Accusing any person of a crime or formally censuring any person; (vi) Disclosure of trade secrets or commercial or financial information that is privileged or confidential; (vii) Disclosure of information of a personal nature where disclosure would constitute a clearly unwarranted invasion of personal privacy; (viii) Disclosure of investigatory records compiled for law enforcement purposes; (ix) Disclosure of information related to any reports prepared by or on behalf of the commission for the purpose of investigation of compliance with this compact; or (x) Matters specifically exempted from disclosure by federal or state statute. 6. If a meeting, or portion of a meeting, is closed pursuant to this provision, the commission's legal counsel or designee shall certify that the meeting may be closed and shall reference each relevant exempting provision.  The commission shall keep minutes that fully and clearly describe all matters discussed in a meeting and shall provide a full and accurate summary of actions taken, and the reasons therefor, including a description of the views expressed.  All documents considered in connection with an action shall be identified in such minutes.  All minutes and documents of a closed meeting shall remain under seal, subject to release by a majority vote of the commission or order of a court of competent jurisdiction. (c) The commission shall, by a majority vote of the administrators, prescribe bylaws or rules to govern its conduct as may be necessary or appropriate to carry out the purposes and exercise the powers of this compact, including, but not limited to: 1. Establishing the fiscal year of the commission; 2. Providing reasonable standards and procedures: (i) For the establishment and meetings of other committees; and (ii) Governing any general or specific delegation of any authority or function of the commission; 3. Providing reasonable procedures for calling and conducting meetings of the commission, ensuring reasonable advance notice of all meetings and providing an opportunity for attendance of such meetings by interested parties, with enumerated exceptions designed to protect the public's interest, the privacy of individuals, and proprietary information, including trade secrets.  The commission may meet in closed session only after a majority of the administrators vote to close a meeting in whole or in part.  As soon as practicable, the commission must make public a copy of the vote to close the meeting revealing the vote of each administrator, with no proxy votes allowed; 4. Establishing the titles, duties and authority and reasonable procedures for the election of the officers of the commission; 5. Providing reasonable standards and procedures for the establishment of the personnel policies and programs of the commission.  Notwithstanding any civil service or other similar laws of any party state, the bylaws shall exclusively govern the personnel policies and programs of the commission; and 6. Providing a mechanism for winding up the operations of the commission and the equitable disposition of any surplus funds that may exist after the termination of this compact after the payment or reserving of all of its debts and obligations; (d) The commission shall publish its bylaws and rules, and any amendments thereto, in a convenient form on the website of the commission. (e) The commission shall maintain its financial records in accordance with the bylaws. (f) The commission shall meet and take such actions as are consistent with the provisions of this compact and the bylaws. (g) The commission shall have the following powers: 1. To promulgate uniform rules to facilitate and coordinate implementation and administration of this compact.  The rules shall have the force and effect of law and shall be binding in all party states; 2. To bring and prosecute legal proceedings or actions in the name of the commission, provided that the standing of any licensing board to sue or be sued under applicable law shall not be affected; 3. To purchase and maintain insurance and bonds; 4. To borrow, accept or contract for services of personnel, including, but not limited to, employees of a party state or nonprofit organizations; 5. To cooperate with other organizations that administer state compacts related to the regulation of nursing, including, but not limited to, sharing administrative or staff expenses, office space or other resources; 6. To hire employees, elect or appoint officers, fix compensation, define duties, grant such individuals appropriate authority to carry out the purposes of this compact, and to establish the commission's personnel policies and programs relating to conflicts of interest, qualifications of personnel and other related personnel matters; 7. To accept any and all appropriate donations, grants and gifts of money, equipment, supplies, materials and services, and to receive, utilize and dispose of the same; provided that at all times the commission shall avoid any appearance of impropriety or conflict of interest; 8. To lease, purchase, accept appropriate gifts or donations of, or otherwise to own, hold, improve or use, any property, whether real, personal or mixed; provided that at all times the commission shall avoid any appearance of impropriety; 9. To sell, convey, mortgage, pledge, lease, exchange, abandon or otherwise dispose of any property, whether real, personal or mixed; 10. To establish a budget and make expenditures; 11. To borrow money; 12. To appoint committees, including advisory committees comprised of administrators, state nursing regulators, state legislators or their representatives, and consumer representatives, and other such interested persons; 13. To provide and receive information from, and to cooperate with, law enforcement agencies; 14. To adopt and use an official seal; and 15. To perform such other functions as may be necessary or appropriate to achieve the purposes of this compact consistent with the state regulation of nurse licensure and practice. (h) Financing of the commission. 1. The commission shall pay, or provide for the payment of, the reasonable expenses of its establishment, organization and ongoing activities. 2. The commission may also levy on and collect an annual assessment from each party state to cover the cost of its operations, activities and staff in its annual budget as approved each year.  The aggregate annual assessment amount, if any, shall be allocated based upon a formula to be determined by the commission, which shall promulgate a rule that is binding upon all party states. 3. The commission shall not incur obligations of any kind prior to securing the funds adequate to meet the same; nor shall the commission pledge the credit of any of the party states, except by, and with the authority of, such party state. 4. The commission shall keep accurate accounts of all receipts and disbursements. The receipts and disbursements of the commission shall be subject to the audit and accounting procedures established under its bylaws.  However, all receipts and disbursements of funds handled by the commission shall be audited yearly by a certified or licensed public accountant, and the report of the audit shall be included in and become part of the annual report of the commission. (i) Qualified immunity, defense and indemnification. 1. The administrators, officers, executive director, employees and representatives of the commission shall be immune from suit and liability, either personally or in their official capacity, for any claim for damage to or loss of property or personal injury or other civil liability caused by or arising out of any actual or alleged act, error or omission that occurred, or that the person against whom the claim is made had a reasonable basis for believing occurred, within the scope of commission employment, duties or responsibilities; provided that nothing in this paragraph shall be construed to protect any such person from suit or liability for any damage, loss, injury or liability caused by the intentional, willful or wanton misconduct of that person. 2. The commission shall defend any administrator, officer, executive director, employee or representative of the commission in any civil action seeking to impose liability arising out of any actual or alleged act, error or omission that occurred within the scope of commission employment, duties or responsibilities, or that the person against whom the claim is made had a reasonable basis for believing occurred within the scope of commission employment, duties or responsibilities; provided that nothing herein shall be construed to prohibit that person from retaining his or her own counsel; and provided further that the actual or alleged act, error or omission did not result from that person's intentional, willful or wanton misconduct. 3. The commission shall indemnify and hold harmless any administrator, officer, executive director, employee or representative of the commission for the amount of any settlement or judgment obtained against that person arising out of any actual or alleged act, error or omission that occurred within the scope of commission employment, duties or responsibilities, or that such person had a reasonable basis for believing occurred within the scope of commission employment, duties or responsibilities, provided that the actual or alleged act, error or omission did not result from the intentional, willful or wanton misconduct of that person. ARTICLE VIII. Rulemaking. (a) The commission shall exercise its rulemaking powers pursuant to the criteria set forth in this article and the rules adopted thereunder.  Rules and amendments shall become binding as of the date specified in each rule or amendment and shall have the same force and effect as provisions of this compact. (b) Rules or amendments to the rules shall be adopted at a regular or special meeting of the commission. (c) Prior to promulgation and adoption of a final rule or rules by the commission, and at least sixty (60) days in advance of the meeting at which the rule will be considered and voted upon, the commission shall file a notice of proposed rulemaking: 1. On the website of the commission; and 2. On the website of each licensing board or the publication in which each state would otherwise publish proposed rules. (d) The notice of proposed rulemaking shall include: 1. The proposed time, date and location of the meeting in which the rule will be considered and voted upon; 2. The text of the proposed rule or amendment, and the reason for the proposed rule; 3. A request for comments on the proposed rule from any interested person; and 4. The manner in which interested persons may submit notice to the commission of their intention to attend the public hearing and any written comments. (e) Prior to adoption of a proposed rule, the commission shall allow persons to submit written data, facts, opinions and arguments, which shall be made available to the public. (f) The commission shall grant an opportunity for a public hearing before it adopts a rule or amendment. (g) The commission shall publish the place, time and date of the scheduled public hearing. 1. Hearings shall be conducted in a manner providing each person who wishes to comment a fair and reasonable opportunity to comment orally or in writing. All hearings will be recorded, and a copy will be made available upon request. 2. Nothing in this section shall be construed as requiring a separate hearing on each rule.  Rules may be grouped for the convenience of the commission at hearings required by this section. (h) If no one appears at the public hearing, the commission may proceed with promulgation of the proposed rule. (i) Following the scheduled hearing date, or by the close of business on the scheduled hearing date if the hearing was not held, the commission shall consider all written and oral comments received. (j) The commission shall, by majority vote of all administrators, take final action on the proposed rule and shall determine the effective date of the rule, if any, based on the rulemaking record and the full text of the rule. (k) Upon determination that an emergency exists, the commission may consider and adopt an emergency rule without prior notice, opportunity for comment or hearing, provided that the usual rulemaking procedures provided in this compact and in this section shall be retroactively applied to the rule as soon as reasonably possible, in no event later than ninety (90) days after the effective date of the rule.  For the purposes of this provision, an emergency rule is one that must be adopted immediately in order to: 1. Meet an imminent threat to public health, safety or welfare; 2. Prevent a loss of commission or party state funds; or 3. Meet a deadline for the promulgation of an administrative rule that is required by federal law or rule. (l) The commission may direct revisions to a previously adopted rule or amendment for purposes of correcting typographical errors, errors in format, errors in consistency or grammatical errors.  Public notice of any revisions shall be posted on the website of the commission.  The revision shall be subject to challenge by any person for a period of thirty (30) days after posting.  The revision may be challenged only on grounds that the revision results in a material change to a rule.  A challenge shall be made in writing, and delivered to the commission, prior to the end of the notice period.  If no challenge is made, the revision will take effect without further action.  If the revision is challenged, the revision may not take effect without the approval of the commission. ARTICLE IX. Oversight, dispute resolution and enforcement. (a) Oversight: 1. Each party state shall enforce this compact and take all actions necessary and appropriate to effectuate this compact's purposes and intent. 2. The commission shall be entitled to receive service of process in any proceeding that may affect the powers, responsibilities or actions of the commission, and shall have standing to intervene in such a proceeding for all purposes.  Failure to provide service of process in such proceeding to the commission shall render a judgment or order void as to the commission, this compact or promulgated rules. (b) Default, technical assistance and termination: 1. If the commission determines that a party state has defaulted in the performance of its obligations or responsibilities under this compact or the promulgated rules, the commission shall: (i) Provide written notice to the defaulting state and other party states of the nature of the default, the proposed means of curing the default or any other action to be taken by the commission; and (ii) Provide remedial training and specific technical assistance regarding the default. 2. If a state in default fails to cure the default, the defaulting state's membership in this compact may be terminated upon an affirmative vote of a majority of the administrators, and all rights, privileges and benefits conferred by this compact may be terminated on the effective date of termination.  A cure of the default does not relieve the offending state of obligations or liabilities incurred during the period of default. 3. Termination of membership in this compact shall be imposed only after all other means of securing compliance have been exhausted.  Notice of intent to suspend or terminate shall be given by the commission to the Governor of the defaulting state and to the executive officer of the defaulting state's licensing board and each of the party states. 4. A state whose membership in this compact has been terminated is responsible for all assessments, obligations and liabilities incurred through the effective date of termination, including obligations that extend beyond the effective date of termination. 5. The commission shall not bear any costs related to a state that is found to be in default or whose membership in this compact has been terminated unless agreed upon in writing between the commission and the defaulting state. 6. The defaulting state may appeal the action of the commission by petitioning the United States District Court for the District of Columbia or the federal district in which the commission has its principal offices.  The prevailing party shall be awarded all costs of such litigation, including reasonable attorneys' fees. (c) Dispute resolution: 1. Upon request by a party state, the commission shall attempt to resolve disputes related to the compact that arise among party states and between party and nonparty states. 2. The commission shall promulgate a rule providing for both mediation and binding dispute resolution for disputes, as appropriate. 3. In the event the commission cannot resolve disputes among party states arising under this compact: (i) The party states may submit the issues in dispute to an arbitration panel, which will be comprised of individuals appointed by the compact administrator in each of the affected party states and an individual mutually agreed upon by the compact administrators of all the party states involved in the dispute. (ii) The decision of a majority of the arbitrators shall be final and binding. (d) Enforcement: 1. The commission, in the reasonable exercise of its discretion, shall enforce the provisions and rules of this compact. 2. By majority vote, the commission may initiate legal action in the United States District Court for the District of Columbia or the federal district in which the commission has its principal offices against a party state that is in default to enforce compliance with the provisions of this compact and its promulgated rules and bylaws. The relief sought may include both injunctive relief and damages.  In the event judicial enforcement is necessary, the prevailing party shall be awarded all costs of such litigation, including reasonable attorneys' fees. 3. The remedies herein shall not be the exclusive remedies of the commission.  The commission may pursue any other remedies available under federal or state law. ARTICLE X. Effective date, withdrawal and amendment. (a) This compact shall become effective and binding on the earlier of the date of legislative enactment of this compact into law by no less than twenty-six (26) states or December 31, 2018.  All party states to this compact, that also were parties to the prior Nurse Licensure Compact, superseded by this compact, ("prior compact"), shall be deemed to have withdrawn from the prior compact within six (6) months after the effective date of this compact. (b) Each party state to this compact shall continue to recognize a nurse's multistate licensure privilege to practice in that party state issued under the prior compact until such party state has withdrawn from the prior compact. (c) Any party state may withdraw from this compact by enacting a statute repealing the same.  A party state's withdrawal shall not take effect until six (6) months after enactment of the repealing statute. (d) A party state's withdrawal or termination shall not affect the continuing requirement of the withdrawing or terminated state's licensing board to report adverse actions and significant investigations occurring prior to the effective date of such withdrawal or termination. (e) Nothing contained in this compact shall be construed to invalidate or prevent any nurse licensure agreement or other cooperative arrangement between a party state and a nonparty state that is made in accordance with the other provisions of this compact. (f) This compact may be amended by the party states.  No amendment to this compact shall become effective and binding upon the party states unless and until it is enacted into the laws of all party states. (g) Representatives of nonparty states to this compact shall be invited to participate in the activities of the commission, on a nonvoting basis, prior to the adoption of this compact by all states. ARTICLE XI. Construction and severability. This compact shall be liberally construed so as to effectuate the purposes thereof. The provisions of this compact shall be severable, and if any phrase, clause, sentence or provision of this compact is declared to be contrary to the Constitution of any party state or of the United States, or if the applicability thereof to any government, agency, person or circumstance is held invalid, the validity of the remainder of this compact and the applicability thereof to any government, agency, person or circumstance shall not be affected thereby.  If this compact shall be held to be contrary to the Constitution of any party state, this compact shall remain in full force and effect as to the remaining party states and in full force and effect as to the party state affected as to all severable matters. SECTION 159.  Section 73-34-35, Mississippi Code of 1972, is brought forward as follows: 73-34-35.  (1)  An application for licensure or renewal may be denied, and the rights of any licensed appraiser or licensed certified real estate appraiser may be revoked or suspended, or the holder of the license may be otherwise disciplined, in accordance with the provisions of this chapter for any of the following acts or omissions: (a)  Failing to meet the minimum qualifications for licensure established under this chapter; (b)  Procuring or attempting to procure licensure under this chapter by knowingly making a false statement, submitting false information or making a material misrepresentation in an application filed with the board or procuring or attempting to procure licensure through any form of fraud or misrepresentation; (c)  Paying money other than the fees provided for by this chapter to any member or employee of the board to procure licensure under this chapter; (d)  An act or omission in the practice of real estate appraising which constitutes dishonesty, fraud or misrepresentation with the intent to substantially benefit the licensee or another person or with the intent to substantially injure another person; (e)  Entry of a final civil or criminal judgment against a licensee on grounds of fraud, misrepresentation or deceit; (f)  Conviction, including a conviction based upon a plea or finding of guilty, of a crime which is substantially related to the qualifications, functions or duties of a person developing real estate appraisals and communicating real estate appraisals to others; (g)  Engaging in the business of real estate appraising under an assumed or fictitious name not properly registered in this state; (h)  Paying a finder's fee or a referral fee; (i)  Making a false or misleading statement in that portion of a written appraisal report that deals with professional qualifications or in any testimony concerning professional qualifications; (j)  Issuing an appraisal on any real property in which the appraiser has an interest through fee simple ownership, leasehold, rental agreement or auction agreement; (k)  Taking a listing for the sale of a property within ninety (90) days of appraising such property, except as may be otherwise agreed upon by all parties and disclosed in the listing agreement; or (l)  Any act or conduct, whether the same or of a different character than specified above, which constitutes or demonstrates bad faith, incompetency or untrustworthiness; or dishonest, fraudulent or improper dealing; or any other violation of the provisions of this chapter and of rules and regulations established by the board. (2)  In accordance with the laws of this state, and to the extent permitted by any applicable federal legislation or regulation, the board may censure an appraisal management company, conditionally or unconditionally suspend or revoke any registration issued under this chapter, or deny renewal of any registration issued under this chapter, or levy fines or impose civil penalties not to exceed Five Thousand Dollars ($5,000.00), if after appropriate investigation the board concludes that an appraisal management company is attempting to perform, has performed, or has attempted to perform any of the following acts: (a)  Committed any act in violation of this chapter; (b)  Violated any rule or regulation adopted by the board in the interest of the public and consistent with the provisions of this chapter; or (c)  Procured a registration for itself or any other person by fraud, misrepresentation or deceit. (3)  In order to promote voluntary compliance, encourage appraisal management companies to correct errors promptly, and ensure a fair and consistent approach to enforcement, the board is authorized to impose fines or civil penalties that are reasonable in light of the nature, extent and severity of the violation.  The board is also authorized to take action against an appraisal management company's registration, if at all, only after less severe sanctions have proven insufficient to ensure behavior consistent with this chapter.  When deciding whether to impose a sanction permitted by subsection (2), determining the sanction that is most appropriate in a specific instance, or making any other discretionary decision regarding the enforcement of this chapter, the board shall consider whether an appraisal management company: (a)  Has an effective program reasonably designed to ensure compliance with this chapter; (b)  Has taken prompt and appropriate steps to correct and prevent the recurrence of any detected violations; and (c)  Has independently reported to the board any significant violations or potential violations of this chapter, before an imminent threat of disclosure or investigation and within a reasonably prompt time after becoming aware of their occurrence. (4)  In addition to the reasons specified in subsection (1) of this section, the board shall be authorized to suspend the license of any licensee for being out of compliance with an order for support, as defined in Section 93-11-153.  The procedure for suspension of a license for being out of compliance with an order for support, and the procedure for the reissuance or reinstatement of a license suspended for that purpose, and the payment of any fees for the reissuance or reinstatement of a license suspended for that purpose, shall be governed by Section 93-11-157 or 93-11-163, as the case may be.  If there is any conflict between any provision of Section 93-11-157 or 93-11-163 and any provision of this chapter, the provisions of Section 93-11-157 or 93-11-163, as the case may be, shall control. SECTION 160.  Section 75-35-301, Mississippi Code of 1972, is brought forward as follows: 75-35-301.  The commissioner may (for such period, or indefinitely, as he deems necessary to effectuate the purposes of this chapter) refuse to provide, or withdraw, inspection service under Article 1 of this chapter with respect to any establishment if he determines, after opportunity for a hearing is accorded to the applicant for, or recipient of, such service, that such applicant or recipient is unfit to engage in any business requiring inspection under Article 1 because the applicant or recipient, or anyone responsibly connected with the applicant or recipient, has been convicted, in any federal or state court, of (1) any felony, or (2) more than one violation of any law, other than a felony, based upon the acquiring, handling, or distributing of unwholesome, mislabeled, or deceptively packaged food or upon fraud in connection with transactions in food. This section shall not affect in any way other provisions of this chapter for withdrawal of inspection services under Article 1 from establishments failing to maintain sanitary conditions or to destroy condemned carcasses, parts, meat or meat food products. For the purpose of this section, a person shall be deemed to be responsibly connected with the business if he was a partner, officer, director, holder, or owner of ten per centum (10%) or more of its voting stock or employee in a managerial or executive capacity. The determination and order of the commissioner with respect thereto under this section shall be final and conclusive unless the affected applicant for, or recipient of, inspection service files application for judicial review within thirty (30) days after the effective date of such order in the appropriate court as provided in Section 75-35-15. Judicial review of any such order shall be upon the record made before the commissioner upon which the determination and order are based. SECTION 161.  Section 81-3-5, Mississippi Code of 1972, is brought forward as follows: 81-3-5.  Five or more persons of full age and of good moral and sound business character may organize themselves into a banking corporation. Banking corporations may be created for the purpose of conducting and carrying on a bank and trust company business, such trust company business to be limited as herein provided, and to establish offices of loan and deposit to be known as savings banks, or to establish banks having departments for carrying on all of the above classes of business; and said banking corporations may, under the provisions of the banking laws of Mississippi, establish branch banks and branch offices within territorial limitations as hereinafter provided in Chapter 7 of this title. No private individual, or partnership, or association of persons other than a corporation shall be allowed to conduct any type of banking business within this state. SECTION 162.  Section 81-13-1, Mississippi Code of 1972, is brought forward as follows: 81-13-1.  (1)  Any seven (7) persons who are residents of the State of Mississippi of full age and of good moral and sound business character eligible under this chapter to become members of a credit union may prepare in duplicate articles of association and incorporation, and sign the same and cause the same to be acknowledged by one (1) of the signers before an officer competent to take acknowledgments to the effect that the same has been signed and executed by all of the signers. Before any credit union may be organized and formed, the prospective incorporators shall give notice to the Department of Banking and Consumer Finance by petition to the Commissioner of Banking and Consumer Finance of their desire to engage in business as a credit union and shall at the time file with the commissioner two (2) copies of the proposed articles of incorporation, duly sworn to by one (1) of the prospective incorporators. (2)  Upon receipt of a petition for a certificate of incorporation to form a credit union and such additional information as may be required by the commissioner, the commissioner shall promptly give consideration to the petition and make an examination of the proposed articles of incorporation to determine if they meet all requirements of the law.  The commissioner shall then make an investigation to determine that the prerequisites of this chapter have been complied with and that: (a)  The character, responsibility and general fitness of the persons named in the petition are such as to command confidence and warrant belief that the business of the proposed credit union will be honestly and efficiently conducted in accordance with the intent and purpose of this chapter and that the proposed credit union will have qualified management; (b)  There is need for the proposed credit union to serve the proposed field of membership, which shall be specific in detail; and (c)  The anticipated volume and type of business and field of membership of the proposed credit union is such as to indicate profitable operation within a reasonable time. When the commissioner has completed the examination and made his investigation, he shall record his preliminary findings and recommendations in writing. (3)  The commissioner shall consider the findings and shall hear such oral testimony as he may wish, and may also receive information and hear testimony bearing upon the approval of the organization and operation of the new credit union.  When the commissioner has completed the examination and investigation, the commissioner shall record the findings in writing and render a decision as to whether or not said credit union should be authorized to do business.  If the decision is favorable, the incorporators shall then present one (1) of said copies of the articles of association and incorporation, with a recording fee of Ten Dollars ($10.00) to the Secretary of State of the State of Mississippi who shall receive and file the same, whereupon said persons entering into said articles shall be and become an incorporated credit union association under the laws of the State of Mississippi, without individual liability for debts, obligation or other liabilities of said association, in excess of such membership fees as remain due and unpaid by said members, respectively, and may sue and be sued in the name of said association.  The Secretary of State shall record the said articles in his office and return the original so recorded to said association.  The association shall file articles for record in the office of the clerk of the chancery court in the county where the principal place of business is located. (4)  If the commissioner shall deny the application for such charter, he shall notify the applicant in writing of such denial and shall include in such notification the reason or reasons for such denial.  When any application for a charter is denied, the applicant shall have the right to a hearing thereon by and before the commissioner by filing, within thirty (30) days after the date of the receipt of the notification of denial, a written petition with the commissioner requesting such hearing.  Upon the filing of any such request, the commissioner shall fix a date for the hearing, which date shall not be later than thirty (30) days from the date of the filing of the request, and notice shall be given to the public of the fact that such hearing will be held by the publication of a notice in some newspaper published in the county where the business is proposed to be conducted not less than ten (10) days before the date of the hearing, which notice shall specify the date, time, place and purpose of the hearing, said hearing to be in the office of the commissioner in Jackson, Mississippi.  If there is no newspaper published in the county where the business is proposed to be conducted, such notice shall be placed in a newspaper having general circulation in such county. (5)  All such hearings shall be held and conducted in the office of the commissioner, and the applicant and any and all other interested persons may appear and present such evidence as shall be relevant and material and the commissioner may cause the production and presentation of such evidence as deemed relevant and material.  At all such hearings the applicant shall have the right to be represented by counsel and to examine and cross-examine any and all witnesses that may testify at such hearing.  For the purpose of compelling the attendance of witnesses at such hearing the commissioner shall have the power to issue subpoenas therefor in the same manner as subpoenas are issued in circuit courts.  All witnesses who shall testify at any such hearing shall be sworn in the same manner as witnesses are sworn in the circuit courts and shall be subject to penalties for perjury as is otherwise provided under the laws of this state. (6)  At all such hearings the commissioner shall cause the evidence presented to be taken down and a record made thereof and the commissioner shall make a written finding and decision with reference to the question presented and shall cause same to be included in the record.  The original of said record shall be kept as a permanent record by the commissioner and a copy thereof shall be furnished to the applicant.  If the application for the charter shall be denied as a result of such hearing, the applicant may obtain a review of such denial by filing a petition for the review of such denial within thirty (30) days from the date of such denial to the circuit court of the county in which it is sought to organize such credit union.  The review by said court shall be on the record made before the commissioner and copies of all applications, bonds and other papers and documents of every kind filed with the commissioner in connection with the application and said hearing shall be included in said record along with the transcript of the evidence. (7)  The corporate existence of an association shall begin on the date the certificate of incorporation is issued to the credit union, and such existence shall be perpetual unless terminated in accordance with the provisions of this chapter. (8)  At any time the commissioner determines that a credit union ceases to offer normal credit union services to its members as a result of a merger, voluntary liquidation, involuntary liquidation or any other cause, the commissioner shall be authorized to pay the required fee to record the cancellation of the charter of the credit union in the county where originally recorded and in the Secretary of State's office. SECTION 163.  Section 81-25-107, Mississippi Code of 1972, is brought forward as follows: 81-25-107.  (1)  A foreign bank making an application under this chapter for a license to establish and maintain a Mississippi state branch or Mississippi state agency shall deliver to the commissioner: (a)  At least two (2) (or more as the commissioner may require by regulation) duplicate originals of the foreign bank's application; and (b)  At least two (2) (or more as the commissioner may require by regulation) copies of its charter or articles of incorporation and all amendments thereto, duly authenticated by the proper officer of the country of such foreign bank's organization. (2)  The commissioner shall issue a license to a foreign bank to establish and maintain a Mississippi state branch or Mississippi state agency if he or she finds that: (a)  The foreign bank is of good character and sound financial standing; (b)  The management of the foreign bank and the proposed management of the Mississippi state branch or Mississippi state agency are adequate; (c)  The convenience and needs of persons to be served by the proposed Mississippi state branch or Mississippi state agency will be promoted; and (d)  The foreign bank satisfies such other standards as the commissioner may establish by regulation. (3)  If the commissioner determines to issue a license to a foreign bank to establish and maintain a Mississippi state branch or Mississippi state agency, he or she shall, when all fees have been paid as required under this chapter: (a)  Endorse on each document filed as part of the application the word "Filed," and the date of the filing thereof and return to the foreign bank a copy of each document so endorsed; (b)  File in his or her office one (1) of such duplicate originals of the application and copies of the charter or articles of incorporation and amendments thereto; and (c)  Issue a license to establish and maintain a Mississippi state branch or Mississippi state agency to such foreign bank. (4)  Each license issued to a foreign bank to establish and maintain a Mississippi state branch or Mississippi state agency shall state fully the name of the foreign bank to which such license is issued, and all such other information as the commissioner may require by regulation or order. (5)  The commissioner may, by regulation or order, prescribe abbreviated application procedures and standards applicable to applications by foreign banks that have already established an initial Mississippi state branch or agency, subsequently to establish additional intrastate Mississippi state branches or agencies, as the case may be. SECTION 164.  Section 81-25-123, Mississippi Code of 1972, is brought forward as follows: 81-25-123.  (1)  A foreign bank making an application for a license to establish and maintain a Mississippi representative office shall deliver to the commissioner two (2) (or more as the commissioner may require by regulation) duplicate originals of the foreign banks application. (2)  The commissioner shall issue a license to a foreign bank to establish and maintain a Mississippi representative office if he or she finds that: (a)  The foreign bank is of good character and sound financial standing; (b)  The management of the foreign banks and the proposed management of the Mississippi representative office are adequate; and (c)  The convenience and needs of persons to be served by the proposed Mississippi representative office will be promoted. (3)  If the commissioner determines to issue a license to a foreign bank to establish and maintain a Mississippi representative office, he or she shall, when all fees have been paid as required under this chapter: (a)  Endorse on each duplicate original of the application the word "Filed," and the date of the filing thereof and return to the foreign bank one (1) such duplicate original so endorsed; (b)  File in his or her office one (1) of such duplicate originals of the application; and (c)  Issue a license to establish and maintain a Mississippi representative office to such foreign bank. (4)  Each license issued to a foreign bank to establish and maintain a Mississippi representative office shall state fully the name of the foreign bank to which such license is issued, the address or addresses at which such Mississippi representative office is to be located and all such other information as the commissioner may require by regulation. SECTION 165.  Section 83-1-191, Mississippi Code of 1972, is brought forward as follows: 83-1-191.  (1)  There is established within the Department of Insurance a Comprehensive Hurricane Damage Mitigation Program.  This section does not create an entitlement for property owners or obligate the state in any way to fund the inspection or retrofitting of residential property or commercial property in this state.  Implementation of this program is subject to the availability of funds that may be appropriated by the Legislature for this purpose.  The program may develop and implement a comprehensive and coordinated approach for hurricane damage mitigation that may include the following: (a)  Cost-benefit study on wind hazard mitigation construction measures.  The performance of a cost-benefit study to establish the most appropriate wind hazard mitigation construction measures for both new construction and the retrofitting of existing construction for both residential and commercial facilities within the wind-borne debris regions of Mississippi as defined by the International Building Code.  The recommended wind construction techniques shall be based on both the newly adopted Mississippi building code sections for wind load design and the wind-borne debris region.  The list of construction measures to be considered for evaluation in the cost-benefit study shall be based on scientifically established and sound, but common, construction techniques that go above and beyond the basic recommendations in the adopted building codes.  This allows residents to utilize multiple options that will further reduce risk and loss and still be awarded for their endeavors with appropriate wind insurance discounts.  It is recommended that existing accepted scientific studies that validate the wind hazard construction techniques benefits and effects be taken into consideration when establishing the list of construction techniques that homeowners and business owners can employ.  This will ensure that only established construction measures that have been studied and modeled as successful mitigation measures will be considered to reduce the chance of including risky or unsound data that will cost both the property owner and state unnecessary losses.  The cost-benefit study shall be based on actual construction cost data collected for several types of residential construction and commercial construction materials, building techniques and designs that are common to the region.  The study shall provide as much information as possible that will enhance the data and options provided to the public, so that homeowners and business owners can make informed and educated decisions as to their level of involvement.  Based on the construction data, modeling shall be performed on a variety of residential and commercial designs, so that a broad enough representative spectrum of data can be obtained.  The data from the study will be utilized in a report to establish tables reflecting actuarially appropriate levels of wind insurance discounts (in percentages) for each mitigation construction technique/combination of techniques.  This report will be utilized as a guide for the Department of Insurance and the insurance industry for developing actuarially appropriate discounts, credits or other rate differentials, or appropriate reductions in deductibles, for properties on which fixtures or construction techniques demonstrated to reduce the amount of loss in a windstorm have been installed or implemented.  Additional data that will enhance the program, such as studies to reflect property value increases for retrofitting or building to the established wind hazard mitigation construction techniques and cost comparison data collected to establish the value of this program against the investment required to include the mitigation measures, also may be provided. (b)  Wind certification and hurricane mitigation inspections. (i)  Home-retrofit inspections of site-built, residential property, including single-family, two-family, three-family or four-family residential units, and a set of representative commercial facilities may be offered to determine what mitigation measures are needed and what improvements to existing residential properties are needed to reduce the property's vulnerability to hurricane damage.  A state program may be established within the Department of Insurance to provide homeowners and business owners wind certification and hurricane mitigation inspections.  The inspections provided to homeowners and business owners, at a minimum, must include: 1.  A home inspection and report that summarizes the results and identifies corrective actions a homeowner may take to mitigate hurricane damage. 2.  A range of cost estimates regarding the mitigation features. 3.  Insurer-specific information regarding premium discounts correlated to recommended mitigation features identified by the inspection. 4.  A hurricane resistance rating scale specifying the home's current as well as projected wind resistance capabilities. This data may be provided by trained and certified inspectors in standardized reporting formats and forms to ensure all data collected during inspections is equivalent in style and content that allows construction data, estimates and discount information to be easily assimilated into a database.  Data pertaining to the number of inspections and inspection reports may be stored in a state database for evaluation of the program's success and review of state goals in reducing wind hazard loss in the state. (ii)  To qualify for selection by the department as a provider of wind certification and hurricane mitigation inspections services, the entity shall, at a minimum, and on a form and in the manner prescribed by the commissioner: 1.  Use wind certification and hurricane mitigation inspectors who: a.  Have prior experience in residential and/or commercial construction or inspection and have received specialized training in hurricane mitigation procedures through the state certified program.  In order to qualify for training in the inspection process, the individual should be either a licensed building code official, a licensed contractor or inspector in the State of Mississippi, or a civil engineer. b.  Have undergone drug testing and background checks. c.  Have been certified through a state mandated training program, in a manner satisfactory to the department, to conduct the inspections. d.  Have not been convicted of a felony crime of violence or of a sexual offense; have not received a first-time offender pardon or nonadjudication order for a felony crime of violence or of a sexual offense; or have not entered a plea of guilty or nolo contendere to a felony charge of violence or of a sexual offense. e. Submit a statement authorizing the Commissioner of Insurance to order fingerprint analysis or any other analysis or documents deemed necessary by the commissioner for the purpose of verifying the criminal history of the individual.  The commissioner shall have the authority to conduct criminal history verification on a local, state or national level, and shall have the authority to require the individual to pay for the costs of such criminal history verification. 2.  Provide a quality assurance program including a reinspection component. 3.  Have data collection equipment and computer systems, so that data can be submitted electronically to the state's database of inspection reports, insurance certificates, and other industry information related to this program.  It is mandatory that all inspectors provide original copies to the property owner of any inspection reports, estimates, etc., pertaining to the inspection and keep a copy of all inspection materials on hand for state audits. (c)  Financial grants to retrofit properties.  Financial grants may be used to encourage single-family, site-built, owner-occupied, residential property owners or commercial property owners to retrofit their properties to make them less vulnerable to hurricane damage.  No financial grant made under this section shall exceed Ten Thousand Dollars ($10,000.00) per recipient. (d)  Education and consumer awareness.  Multimedia public education, awareness and advertising efforts designed to specifically address mitigation techniques may be employed, as well as a component to support ongoing consumer resources and referral services.  In addition, all insurance companies shall provide notification to their clients regarding the availability of this program, participation details, and directions to the state website promoting the program, along with appropriate contact phone numbers to the state agency administrating the program.  The notification to the clients must be sent by the insurance company within thirty (30) days after filing their insurance discount schedules with the Department of Insurance. (e)  Advisory council.  There is created an advisory council to provide advice and assistance to the program administrator with regard to his or her administration of the program.  The advisory council shall consist of: (i)  An agent, selected by the Independent Insurance Agents of Mississippi. (ii)  Two (2) representatives of residential property insurers, selected by the Department of Insurance. (iii)  One (1) representative of homebuilders, selected by the Home Builders Association of Mississippi. (iv)  The Chairman of the House Insurance Committee, or his designee. (v)  The Chairman of the Senate Insurance Committee, or his designee. (vi)  The Executive Director of the Mississippi Windstorm Underwriting Association, or his designee. (vii)  The Director of the Mississippi Emergency Management Agency, or his designee. Members appointed under subparagraphs (i) and (ii) shall serve at the pleasure of the Department of Insurance.  All other members shall serve as voting ex officio members. Members of the advisory council who are not legislators, state officials or state employees shall be compensated at the per diem rate authorized by Section 25-3-69, and shall be reimbursed in accordance with Section 25-3-41, for mileage and actual expenses incurred in the performance of their duties. Legislative members of the advisory council shall be paid from the contingent expense funds of their respective houses in the same manner as provided for committee meetings when the Legislature is not in session; however, no per diem or expense for attending meetings of the advisory council may be paid while the Legislature is in session.  No advisory council member may incur per diem, travel or other expenses unless previously authorized by vote, at a meeting of the council, which action shall be recorded in the official minutes of the meeting.  Nonlegislative members shall be paid from any funds made available to the advisory council for that purpose. (f)  Rules and regulations.  The Department of Insurance may adopt rules and regulations governing the Comprehensive Hurricane Damage Mitigation Program.  The department also may adopt rules and regulations establishing priorities for grants provided under this section based on objective criteria that gives priority to reducing the state's probable maximum loss from hurricanes. However, pursuant to this overall goal, the department may further establish priorities based on the insured value of the dwelling, whether or not the dwelling is insured by the Mississippi Windstorm Underwriting Association and whether or not the area under consideration has sufficient resources and the ability to perform the retrofitting required. (2)  Nothing in this section shall prohibit the Department of Insurance from entering into an agreement with any other appropriate state agency to assist with or perform any of the duties set forth hereunder. (3)  The Department of Insurance shall issue a request for proposals to contract with a third party for the administration of the Comprehensive Hurricane Damage Mitigation Program.  The contract for the third-party administrator shall be funded from monies in the Comprehensive Hurricane Damage Mitigation Program Fund created in subsection (4) of this section, and that amount shall not exceed one percent (1%) of the funds appropriated to the Department of Insurance for the program. If the third-party administrator selected through the request for proposals is replaced or is otherwise changed, the Department of Insurance shall notify the Chairs of the House and Senate Appropriations and Insurance Committees. (4)  There is created a special fund in the State Treasury to be known as the Comprehensive Hurricane Damage Mitigation Program Fund.  The fund shall consist of any monies from any source that are designated or made available for deposit into the fund.  The Department of Insurance may apply for any federal or private grants to provide additional funds for the special fund.  Monies in the fund shall be expended by the Department of Insurance, upon appropriation by the Legislature, for the purposes as provided in this section.  Unexpended amounts remaining in the fund at the end of a fiscal year shall not lapse into the State General Fund, and any interest earned or investment earnings on amounts in the fund shall be deposited into such fund. (5)  This section shall stand repealed from and after July 1, 2028. SECTION 166.  Section 83-11-225, Mississippi Code of 1972, is brought forward as follows: 83-11-225.  The commissioner may revoke, suspend, or refuse to continue the certificate of authority of an automobile club whenever, after a hearing and for cause shown, he determines that any of the following circumstances exist: (a)  The club has violated any provision of this article; (b)  It is found by the commissioner to be in such financial condition that its further transaction of automobile club service in this state would be hazardous to its members and the automobile club service-buying public in this state, or that it is insolvent; (c)  It refuses to remove, discharge, or terminate its relationship with a director or officer who has been convicted of any crime involving fraud, dishonesty, or like moral turpitude; (d)  It customarily or in the regular course of business compels claimants under its service contracts either to accept less than the amount due them or fewer services, or to bring suit against it to secure full payment of the amount of all services due; (e)  It conducts its business outside this state in such manner as unjustly to discriminate against or prejudice the interests of the people of this state; (f)  It is affiliated with and is under the same general management or interlocking directorate or ownership as another automobile club which transacts business in this state which does not have a certificate of authority therefor; (g)  It exceeds its charter powers of its certificate of authority; (h)  It refuses to be examined, or if its directors, managing officers, employees, or representatives refuse to submit to examination by the commissioner when required by him, or refuses to perform any legal obligation relative to the examination, the time and place of the examination to be specified by the commissioner. SECTION 167.  Section 83-11-239, Mississippi Code of 1972, is brought forward as follows: 83-11-239.  The commissioner may suspend, revoke, or refuse to renew any club agents registration for any of the following causes: (a)  If the club agent violated any of the provisions or requirements of this article; (b)  If the club agent has misappropriated, converted to his own use, or has illegally withheld monies required to be held in the fiduciary capacity; (c)  If the club agent has materially misrepresented the terms or effect of any contract or has engaged in any fraudulent transaction; (d)  If in the conduct of his affairs he has shown himself to be incompetent, untrustworthy, or a source of injury and loss to the automobile club service-buying public; (e)  If the club agent has been convicted after registration of a crime involving moral turpitude. SECTION 168.  Section 99-19-35, Mississippi Code of 1972, is brought forward as follows: 99-19-35.  A person convicted of bribery, burglary, theft, arson, obtaining money or goods under false pretenses, perjury, forgery, embezzlement, or bigamy, shall not be allowed to practice medicine or dentistry, or be appointed to hold or perform the duties of any office of profit, trust, or honor, unless after full pardon for the same. SECTION 169.  This act shall take effect and be in force from and after July 1, 2026.